UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
(Mark One)
☒ ANNUAL REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE
SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2021
OR
☐ TRANSITION REPORT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13 OR 15(d) OF THE
SECURITIES EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the transition period from                     to                     
Commission file number: 001-16751
ANTHEM, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Indiana  35-2145715
(State or other jurisdiction of
incorporation or organization) (I.R.S. Employer Identification Number)
220 Virginia Avenue
Indianapolis, Indiana 46204
(Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code)
Registrant’s telephone number, including area code: (800) 331-1476
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class Trading symbol(s) Name of each exchange on which r egister ed
Common Stock, Par Value $0.01 ANTM New York Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: NONE
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act.  Yes  x No  ¨
Indicate by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act.  Yes  ¨ No  x
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports), and
(2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days.  Yes  x No  ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to
Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter) during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was
required to submit such files).  Yes  x No  ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, a smaller reporting
company, or an emerging growth company. See the definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company,”
and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act.
Large accelerated filer ☒ Accelerated filer ☐
Non-accelerated filer ☐ Smaller reporting company ☐
Emerging growth company ☐
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for
complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act. ¨
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant has filed a report on and attestation to its management’s assessment of the effectiveness of
its internal control over financial reporting under Section 404(b) of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act (15 U.S.C. 7262(b)) by the registered public
accounting firm that prepared or issued its audit report. x
Indicate by check mark whether the registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act).  Yes   ☐   No x
The aggregate market value of the voting and non-voting common equity held by non-affiliates of the registrant (assuming solely for the
purposes of this calculation that all directors and executive officers of the registrant are “affiliates”) as of June 30, 2021 was approximately
$93,007,966,095.
As of February 3, 2022, 241,304,369 shares of the registrant’s common stock were outstanding.
 DOCUMENTS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE
Part III of this Annual Report on Form 10-K incorporates by reference information from the registrant’s Definitive Proxy Statement for
the Annual Meeting of Shareholders to be held May 18, 2022.
Anthem, Inc.
 
Annual Report on Form 10-K
For the Year Ended December 31, 2021
 
Table of Contents
 
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS 3
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS 23
ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED SEC STAFF COMMENTS 38
ITEM 2. PROPERTIES 38
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS 38
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES 38
PART II
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND
ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES 39
ITEM 6. [RESERVED] 40
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATIONS 41
ITEM 7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK 66
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA 68
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND
FINANCIAL DISCLOSURE 138
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES 138
ITEM 9B. OTHER INFORMATION 141
ITEM 9C. DISCLOSURE REGARDING FOREIGN JURISDICTIONS THAT PREVENT INSPECTIONS 141
PART III
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE 141
ITEM 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION 141
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND
RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS 141
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE 142
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES 142
PART IV
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES 143
ITEM 16. FORM 10-K SUMMARY 147
SIGNATURES 154
-1-
References in this Annual Report on Form 10-K to the terms “we,” “our,” “us,” “Anthem” or the “Company” refer to Anthem,
Inc., an Indiana corporation, and, unless the context otherwise requires, its direct and indirect subsidiaries. References to the term
“states” include the District of Columbia, unless the context otherwise requires.
CAUTIONARY STATEMENT REGARDING FORWARD-LOOKING STATEMENTS
This Annual Report on Form 10-K, including Part II, Item 7, “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations,” contains certain forward-looking statements within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.
Forward-looking statements reflect our views about future events and financial performance and are generally not historical facts. Words such
as “expect,” “feel,” “believe,” “will,” “may,” “should,” “anticipate,” “intend,” “estimate,” “project,” “forecast,” “plan” and similar
expressions are intended to identify forward-looking statements. These statements include, but are not limited to: financial projections and
estimates and their underlying assumptions; statements regarding plans, objectives and expectations with respect to future operations,
products and services; and statements regarding future performance. Such statements are subject to certain risks and uncertainties, many of
which are difficult to predict and generally beyond our control, that could cause actual results to differ materially from those expressed in, or
implied or projected by, the forward-looking statements. You are cautioned not to place undue reliance on these forward-looking statements
that speak only as of the date hereof. You are also urged to carefully review and consider the various risks and other disclosures discussed in
our reports filed with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission from time to time, which attempt to advise interested parties of the
factors that affect our business. Except to the extent otherwise required by federal securities laws, we do not undertake any obligation to
republish revised forward-looking statements to reflect events or circumstances after the date hereof. These risks and uncertainties include,
but are not limited to: the impact of large scale medical emergencies, such as public health epidemics and pandemics, including COVID-19,
and catastrophes; trends in healthcare costs and utilization rates; our ability to secure sufficient premium rates, including regulatory approval
for and implementation of such rates; the impact of federal, state and international law and regulation, including ongoing changes in the
Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, as amended; changes in economic
and market conditions, as well as regulations that may negatively affect our liquidity and investment portfolios; our ability to contract with
providers on cost-effective and competitive terms; competitive pressures and our ability to adapt to changes in the industry and develop and
implement strategic growth opportunities; reduced enrollment; the impact of a cyber-attack or other cyber security breach resulting in
unauthorized disclosure of member or employee sensitive or confidential information, including the impact and outcome of any
investigations, inquiries, claims and litigation related thereto; risks and uncertainties regarding Medicare and Medicaid programs, including
those related to non-compliance with the complex regulations imposed thereon; our ability to maintain and achieve improvement in Centers
for Medicare and Medicaid Services Star ratings and other quality scores and funding risks with respect to revenue received from
participation therein; a negative change in our healthcare product mix; costs and other liabilities associated with litigation, government
investigations, audits or reviews; risks and uncertainties related to our pharmacy benefit management (“PBM”) business, including non-
compliance by any party with the PBM services agreement between us and CaremarkPCS Health, L.L.C.; medical malpractice or professional
liability claims or other risks related to healthcare and PBM services provided by our subsidiaries; general risks associated with mergers,
acquisitions, joint ventures and strategic alliances; changes in tax laws; possible impairment of the value of our intangible assets if future
results do not adequately support goodwill and other intangible assets; possible restrictions in the payment of dividends from our subsidiaries
and increases in required minimum levels of capital; our ability to repurchase shares of our common stock and pay dividends on our common
stock due to the adequacy of our cash flow and earnings and other considerations; the potential negative effect from our substantial amount of
outstanding indebtedness; a downgrade in our financial strength ratings; the effects of any negative publicity related to the health benefits
industry in general or us in particular; failure to effectively maintain and modernize our information systems; events that may negatively
affect our licenses with the Blue Cross and Blue Shield Association; intense competition to attract and retain employees; risks associated with
our international operations; and various laws and provisions in our governing documents that may prevent or discourage takeovers and
business combinations.
-2-
PART I
ITEM 1. BUSINESS.
General
At Anthem, our purpose – to improve the health of humanity – is central to who we are. It inspires all we do and is the driving
force behind our unique approach to health. We know to meaningfully improve health we must take a broader view. That is why our
foundational approach looks at whole health and its most critical drivers: social, behavioral and physical. We believe in working
together to achieve our goals of improving lives and communities, simplifying healthcare and expecting more. We strive to accomplish
these goals through a collaborative focus on execution and delivering for those we serve in order to become a lifetime, trusted health
partner. With an unyielding commitment to meeting the needs of our diverse customers, we are guided by the following values:
•Leadership – Redefine what is possible
•Community – Committed, connected, invested
•Integrity – Do the right thing, with a spirit of excellence
•Agility – Delivery today, transform tomorrow
•Diversity – Open your hearts and minds
In pursuing our strategy and becoming a lifetime, trusted health partner, we intend to transform healthcare by taking a whole
health approach and providing trusted and caring solutions, delivering quality products and services that give customers access to the
care they need and removing barriers to health.
We are one of the largest health benefits companies in the United States in terms of medical membership, serving greater than 45
million medical members through our affiliated health plans as of December 31, 2021. We offer a broad spectrum of network-based
managed care risk-based plans to Individual, Group, Medicaid and Medicare markets. In addition, we provide a broad array of
managed care services to fee-based customers, including claims processing, stop loss insurance, provider network access, medical
management, care management and wellness programs, actuarial services and other administrative services. We also provide services
to the federal government in connection with our Federal Health Products & Services business, which administers the Federal
Employees Health Benefits (“FEHB”) Program. We provide an array of specialty services both to our subsidiary health plans and also
unaffiliated health plans, including pharmacy benefit management (“PBM”) services and dental, vision, life, disability and
supplemental health insurance benefits, as well as integrated health services.
We are an independent licensee of the Blue Cross and Blue Shield Association (“BCBSA”), an association of independent health
benefit plans. We serve our members as the Blue Cross licensee for California and as the Blue Cross and Blue Shield (“BCBS”)
licensee for Colorado, Connecticut, Georgia, Indiana, Kentucky, Maine, Missouri (excluding 30 counties in the Kansas City area),
Nevada, New Hampshire, New York (in the New York City metropolitan area and upstate New York), Ohio, Virginia (excluding the
Northern Virginia suburbs of Washington, D.C.) and Wisconsin. In a majority of these service areas, we do business as Anthem Blue
Cross, Anthem Blue Cross and Blue Shield, and Empire Blue Cross Blue Shield or Empire Blue Cross. We also conduct business
through arrangements with other BCBS licensees as well as other strategic partners. Through our subsidiaries, we also serve customers
in numerous states and Puerto Rico as AIM Specialty Health, Amerigroup, Aspire Health, Beacon, CareMore, Freedom Health,
HealthLink, HealthSun, MMM, Optimum HealthCare, Simply Healthcare, and/or UniCare. PBM services are offered through our
IngenioRx, Inc. (“IngenioRx”) subsidiary. We are licensed to conduct insurance operations in all 50 states, the District of Columbia
and Puerto Rico through our subsidiaries.
We believe healthcare is local and that we have the strong local presence required to understand and meet local customer needs
with regard to any product they are enrolled in with us. Further, we believe we are well-positioned to deliver what customers want:
innovative, choice-based and affordable products; distinctive service; simplified transactions; and better access to information for
quality care. Our local presence, combined with our national expertise, has created opportunities for collaborative programs that
reward physicians and hospitals for clinical quality and excellence. We feel that our commitment to health improvement and care
management provides added value to customers and healthcare professionals. Ultimately, we believe that practical and sustainable
improvements in healthcare must focus on improving healthcare quality while managing
-3-
costs for total affordability. We have implemented initiatives driving payment innovation and partnered with providers to lower cost
and improve the quality of healthcare for our members, and we continue to develop new and innovative ways to effectively manage
risk and engage our members. Further, we are expanding our financial arrangements with providers to include payment models that
encourage value-based care. We believe focusing on quality of care rather than volume of care is the foundation for improving patient
outcomes. Our value-based payment model supports patient-centered care by improving collaboration between providers and health
partners and delivering to our patients the right care, at the right time, in the right place. In addition, we are focused on achieving
efficiencies from our national scale while optimizing service performance for our customers. Finally, we expect to continue to
rationalize our portfolio of businesses and products and align our investments to capitalize on new opportunities to drive growth in our
existing markets and expand into new markets in the future.
Impact on Our Results of Operations
Our results of operations depend in large part on our ability to accurately predict and effectively manage healthcare costs through
effective contracting with providers of care to our members, product pricing, medical management and health and wellness programs,
including service coordination and case management for addressing complex and specialized healthcare needs, innovative product
design and our ability to maintain or achieve improvement in our Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (“CMS”) Star ratings.
CMS Star ratings affect Medicare Advantage plan reimbursements as well as our eligibility to earn quality-based bonus payments for
those plans. See “Regulation” below in this “Business” section for additional information on our CMS Star ratings. For additional
information on our networks and provider relations, product pricing and healthcare cost management programs, see “Pricing and
Underwriting of Our Products,” “Networks and Provider Relations,” “Medical Management Programs,” “Care Management and
Wellness Products and Programs” and “Healthcare Quality Initiatives” below in this “Business” section.
Advances in medical technology, increases in specialty drug costs, increases in hospital expenditures and other provider costs, the
aging of the population, other demographic characteristics and the COVID-19 pandemic continue to contribute to rising healthcare
costs. Our managed care plans and products are designed to encourage providers and members to participate in quality, cost-effective
health benefit programs by using the full range of our innovative medical management services, quality initiatives and financial
incentives. We believe our market position and high business retention rates will enable us to realize the long-term benefits of
investing in preventive and early detection programs. Our ability to provide cost-effective health benefits products and services is
enhanced through a disciplined approach to internal cost containment, prudent management of our risk exposure and successful
integration of acquired businesses. In addition, our ability to manage selling, general and administrative costs continues to be a driver
of our overall profitability.
The future results of our operations will also be impacted by certain external forces and resulting changes in our business model
and strategy. Changes to our business environment will continue as elected officials at the national and state levels enact, and both
elected officials and candidates for election propose, modifications to existing laws and regulations, including changes to taxes and
fees. For additional discussion, see “Regulation” below in this “Business” section and Part I, Item 1A “Risk Factors” in this Annual
Report on Form 10-K.
Our results of operations are also impacted by levels and mix of membership, which can change as a result of the quality and
pricing of our health benefits products and services, an aging population, economic conditions, changes in unemployment,
acquisitions, entry into new markets and expansions in or exits from existing markets. These membership trends could be negatively
impacted by various factors that could have a material adverse effect on our future results of operations such as general economic
downturns that result in business failures, failure to obtain new customers or retain existing customers, premium increases, benefit
changes or our exit from a specific market. See Part I, Item 1A “Risk Factors” and Part II, Item 7 “Management’s Discussion and
Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
We continue to enhance interactions with customers, providers, brokers, agents, employees and other stakeholders through digital
technology and improvements to internal operations. Our approach includes not only the sales and distribution of health benefits
products through digital technology, but also implementing advanced capabilities that improve services benefiting customers, agents,
brokers and providers while optimizing administrative costs. These enhancements can also help improve the quality, coordination and
safety of healthcare through increased communications between patients and their physicians.
-4-
Through our participation in various federal government programs, we generated approximately 20.7%, 20.3% and 20.7% of our
total consolidated revenues from agencies of the U.S. government for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019,
respectively. These revenues are contained in our Government Business segment as described below. An immaterial amount of our
total consolidated revenues is derived from activities outside of the U.S.
COVID-19
The COVID-19 pandemic continues to impact the global economy, cause market instability and uncertainty in the labor market
and put pressure on the healthcare system, and it has impacted, and will likely continue to impact, our membership, our benefit
expense and our member behavior, including how members access healthcare services. We continue to assist our customers, providers,
members and communities in addressing the effects of the COVID-19 pandemic, including by providing expanded benefit coverage
for COVID-19 diagnostic tests, treatment and vaccine administration and taking steps to increase vaccinations by enabling, educating
and encouraging vaccine acceptance among our members as well as in the communities in which we operate.
COVID-19 care, testing and vaccine administration, and the impact of new COVID-19 variants, have resulted in increased
medical costs for us in 2021. In 2021, our Medicaid membership continued to grow as a result of the temporary suspension of
eligibility recertification in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, which we expect will remain suspended at least until the second
quarter of 2022. Our Commercial fee-based membership decreased in 2021 due to in-group attrition likely attributable to the COVID-
19 pandemic. See Part II, Item 7, “Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Conditions and Results of Operations -
Business Trends - Medical Cost Trends” for a discussion of the impact of COVID-19 on our healthcare costs.
The COVID-19 pandemic continues to evolve and the full extent of its impact will depend on future developments, which are
highly uncertain and cannot be predicted at this time. We will continue to monitor the COVID-19 pandemic as well as resulting
legislative and regulatory changes to manage our response and assess and mitigate potential adverse impacts to our business. For
additional discussion regarding our risks related to the COVID-19 pandemic and our other risk factors, see Part I, Item 1A, “Risk
Factors” in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Reportable Segments
We manage our operations by customer type through four reportable segments: Commercial & Specialty Business, Government
Business, IngenioRx and Other. We regularly evaluate the appropriateness of our reportable segments, particularly in light of
organizational changes, merger and acquisition activity and changing laws and regulations.
Our Commercial & Specialty Business segment offers plans and services to our Individual, Group risk-based, Group fee-based
and BlueCard members. The Commercial & Specialty Business segment offers health products on a full-risk basis; provides a broad
array of administrative managed care services to our fee-based customers; and provides a variety of specialty and other insurance
products and services such as dental, vision, life, disability and supplemental health insurance benefits as described below.
Our Government Business segment includes our Medicare and Medicaid businesses, National Government Services (“NGS”) and
services provided to the federal government in connection with the FEHB business.
Our IngenioRx segment includes our PBM business. IngenioRx markets and offers PBM services to our affiliated health plan
customers, as well as to external customers outside of the health plans we own. IngenioRx has a comprehensive PBM services
portfolio, which includes services such as formulary management, pharmacy networks, prescription drug database, member services
and mail order capabilities.
Our Other segment includes our Diversified Business Group, which is our health services business focused on lowering the cost
and improving the quality of healthcare by enabling and creating new care delivery and payment models, with a special emphasis on
serving those with complex and chronic conditions. This segment also includes certain eliminations and corporate expenses not
allocated to our other reportable segments.
For additional information, see Note 20, “Segment Information,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in
Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.®
-5-
Membership
Our medical membership includes seven different customer types: Individual, Group risk-based, Group fee-based, BlueCard,
Medicare, Medicaid and FEHB. In addition, we also serve customers who purchase one or more of our other products or services that
are often ancillary to our health business.
Our products are generally developed and marketed with an emphasis on the differing needs of our customers. In particular, our
product development and marketing efforts take into account the differing characteristics between the various customers served by us,
as well as the unique needs of educational and public entities, labor groups, the FEHB program, national employers and state-run
programs servicing low-income, high-risk and underserved markets. Overall, we seek to establish pricing and product designs to
provide value for our customers while achieving an appropriate level of profitability for each of our customer categories balanced with
the competitive objective to grow market share. We believe that one of the keys to our success has been our focus on these distinct
customer types, which better enables us to develop benefit plans and services that meet our customers’ unique needs. Further,
IngenioRx was built to simplify pharmacy care and focus on the whole person, and we expect it will make it easier for our customers
to achieve better health outcomes at a lower total cost of care.
We market our Individual, Medicare and certain Group products with a smaller employee base through direct marketing activities
and an extensive network of independent agents, brokers and retail partnerships. Products for Commercial customers with a larger
employee base are generally sold through independent brokers or consultants retained by the customer who work with industry
specialists from our in-house sales force. In the Individual markets, we offer on-exchange products through state- or federally-
facilitated marketplaces (the “Public Exchange”) in compliance with the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and the Health
Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, as amended (collectively, the “ACA”) and off-exchange products. Federal subsidies
are available for certain members, subject to income and family size, who purchase Public Exchange products.
In 2021, we made the decision to modestly expand our participation in the Public Exchange market for 2022 after also expanding
in 2021. As a result, for 2022 we are offering Individual Public Exchange products in 122 of the 143 rating regions in which we
operate, in comparison to 103 of 143 rating regions in 2021. Our strategy has been, and will continue to be, to only participate in
rating regions where we have an appropriate level of confidence that these markets are on a path toward sustainability, including, but
not limited to, factors such as expected financial performance, regulatory environment and underlying market characteristics.
Being a licensee of the BCBS association of companies, of which there were 34 independent primary licensees including us as of
December 31, 2021, provides significant market value, especially when competing for very large multi-state employer groups. For
example, each BCBS member company is able to utilize other BCBS licensees’ substantial provider networks and discounts when any
BCBS member works or travels outside of the state in which their policy is written. This program is referred to as BlueCard.
BlueCard host members are generally members who reside in or travel to a state in which an Anthem subsidiary is the Blue Cross
and/or Blue Shield licensee and who are covered under an employer-sponsored health plan serviced by a non-Anthem controlled
BCBS licensee, which is the “home” plan. We perform certain administrative functions for BlueCardhost members, including claims
pricing and administration, for which we receive administrative fees from the BlueCard members’ home plan. Other administrative
functions, including maintenance of enrollment information and customer services, are performed by the home plan. See “BCBSA
Licenses” below in this “Business” section for additional information on our BCBSA licenses. We refer to members in our service
areas licensed by the BCBSA as our BCBS-branded business. Non-BCBS-branded business refers to members in our non-BCBS-
branded Amerigroup, Freedom Health, HealthSun, MMM, Optimum HealthCare and Simply Healthcare plans, as well as HealthLink
and UniCare members.
For additional information describing each of our customer types and changes in medical membership over the last three years,
see “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations - Membership” included in Part II, Item
7 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.®
®
®
® 
®
-6-
Product and Service Descriptions
Various forms of managed care products have been developed to contain the cost of healthcare by negotiating contracts with
hospitals, physicians and other providers to deliver high-quality healthcare to members at favorable rates. These products usually
feature medical management and other quality and cost optimization measures such as pre-admission review and approval for certain
non-emergency services, pre-authorization of outpatient surgical procedures, network credentialing to determine that network
physicians and hospitals have the required certifications and expertise, and various levels of care management programs to help
members better understand and navigate the healthcare system. In addition, providers may have incentives to achieve certain quality
measures, may share medical cost risk or may have other incentives to deliver quality medical services in a cost-effective manner.
Also, certain plans offer members incentives for healthy behaviors, such as smoking cessation and weight management. Members are
charged periodic, prepaid premiums and generally pay co-payments, coinsurance and/or deductibles when they receive services.
Commercial & Specialty Business
•Commercial Risk-Based Products. Our Commercial & Specialty Business offers a diversified mix of managed care risk-based
products including: Preferred Provider Organization (“PPO”), Health Maintenance Organization (“HMO”), Consumer-Driven
Health Plans (“CDHP”), Traditional Indemnity and Point-of-Service (“POS”) plans. PPO plans generally provide members the
freedom to choose any healthcare provider, but require the member to pay a greater portion of the provider’s fee in the event the
member chooses not to use a provider participating in the PPO’s network. HMOs include comprehensive managed care benefits
generally through a participating network of physicians, hospitals and other providers. CDHPs generally combine a high-
deductible PPO plan with an employer-funded and/or employee-funded personal care account, which may result in tax benefits to
the employee and allow some or all of the dollars remaining in the personal care account at year-end to be rolled over to the next
year for future healthcare needs. Traditional indemnity plans offer the member an option to select any healthcare provider for
covered services, with coverage subject to deductibles and coinsurance and with member cost-sharing usually limited by out-of-
pocket maximums. POS products blend the characteristics of HMO, PPO and indemnity plans. In general, POS plans allow
members to choose to seek care from a provider within the plan’s network or outside the network, subject to, among other things,
certain deductibles and coinsurance.
We also offer Individual risk-based products on and off the Public Exchange, covering essential health benefits (as defined in the
ACA) along with many other requirements and cost-sharing features.
•Commercial Fee-Based Products. Our Commercial & Specialty Business provides a broad array of managed care services to fee-
based customers, including claims processing, stop loss insurance, provider network access, medical management, care
management and wellness programs, actuarial services and other administrative services. Fee-based health plans are also able to
use our provider networks and to realize savings through our negotiated provider arrangements, while allowing employers the
ability to design certain health benefit plans in accordance with their own requirements and objectives. We also charge a premium
to underwrite stop loss insurance for employers that maintain fee-based plans but want to limit their retained risk.
In addition, we perform certain administrative functions for BlueCard host members, discussed under “Membership” above,
including claims pricing and administration, for which we receive administrative fees from the BlueCard members’ home plans.
Other administrative functions, including maintenance of enrollment information and customer service, are performed by the
home plan.
•Specialty Products. We offer an array of products and services to both risk-based and fee-based customers in conjunction with our
health plans as well as to unaffiliated healthcare plans that are not Anthem subsidiaries.
◦Dental. Our dental plans include networks in certain states in which we operate and are offered on both a risk-based and fee-
based basis. Our members also have access to additional dental providers through our participation in the National Dental
GRID, a national dental network developed by and for BCBS plans that offers in-network discounts across the country.
◦Vision. Our vision plans include networks within the states in which we operate and are offered on both a risk-based and fee-
based basis.®
®
-7-
◦Life. We offer an array of competitive individual and group term life insurance benefit products. The life insurance products
include term life and accidental death and dismemberment.
◦Disability. We offer short-term and long-term disability and leave of absence products.
◦Supplemental Health. We offer supplemental health products, including accident, critical illness and hospital indemnity,
which provide coverage for specific conditions or circumstances.
Government Business
•Medicare Plans. We offer a wide variety of plans, products and options to individuals age 65 and older such as Medicare
Advantage, including Special Needs Plans (“SNPs”), dual-eligible programs through Medicare-Medicaid Plans (“MMPs”),
Medicare Supplement plans and Medicare Part D Prescription Drug Plans (“Medicare Part D”).
Medicare Advantage plans provide Medicare beneficiaries with a managed care alternative to traditional Medicare and often
include a Medicare Part D benefit. In addition, our Medicare Advantage SNPs provide tailored benefits to special needs
individuals who are institutionalized or have severe or disabling chronic conditions and to dual-eligible customers, who are low-
income seniors and persons under age 65 with disabilities. Medicare Advantage SNPs are coordinated care plans specifically
designed to provide targeted care, covering all the healthcare services considered medically necessary for members and often
providing professional care coordination services, with personal guidance and programs that help members maintain their health.
Medicare Advantage membership also includes Medicare Advantage members in our Group Retiree Solutions business who are
retired members of Commercial accounts, or retired members of groups who are not affiliated with our Commercial accounts who
have selected a Medicare Advantage product through us. MMP is a demonstration program focused on serving members who are
dually eligible for Medicaid and Medicare. Medicare Supplement plans typically pay the difference between healthcare costs
incurred by a beneficiary and amounts paid by Medicare. Medicare Part D offers a prescription drug plan to Medicare and MMP
beneficiaries.
•Medicaid Plans and Other State-Sponsored Programs. Our Medicaid business includes our managed care alternatives through
public-funded healthcare programs, including Medicaid; Medicaid expansion programs; Temporary Assistance for Needy
Families (“TANF”); programs for seniors and people with disabilities (“SPD”); Children’s Health Insurance Programs (“CHIP”);
and specialty programs such as those focused on long-term services and support (“LTSS”), HIV/AIDS, children living in foster
care, behavioral health and/or substance abuse disorders, and intellectual disabilities and/or developmental disabilities. The
Medicaid program makes federal matching funds available to all states for the delivery of healthcare benefits for low income
and/or high medical risk individuals. These programs are managed by the individual states based on broad federal guidelines. Our
Medicaid plans also cover certain dual-eligible customers, as previously described above, who also receive Medicare benefits. As
of December 31, 2021, we provide Medicaid and other state sponsored services, such as administrative services, in Arkansas,
California, Colorado, Florida, Georgia, Indiana, Iowa, Kentucky, Louisiana, Maryland, Minnesota, Missouri, Nebraska, Nevada,
New Jersey, New York, North Carolina, Puerto Rico, South Carolina, Tennessee, Texas, Virginia, Washington, West Virginia and
Wisconsin.
•Federal Employees Health Benefits Program. FEHB members consist of United States government employees and their
dependents within our geographic markets through our participation in the national contract between the BCBSA and the U.S.
Office of Personnel Management.
•Medicare Administrative Operations. Through our NGS subsidiary, we serve as a fiscal intermediary, carrier and Medicare
administrative contractor for the federal government by providing administrative services for the Medicare program, Parts A and
B, which generally provides coverage for persons who are 65 or older and for persons who are under 65 and disabled or with end-
stage renal disease. Part A of the Medicare program provides coverage for services provided by hospitals, skilled nursing facilities
and other healthcare facilities. Part B of the Medicare program provides coverage for services provided by physicians, physical
and occupational therapists and other professional providers, as well as certain durable medical equipment and medical supplies.
IngenioRx
Our subsidiary IngenioRx markets and offers PBM services to our affiliated health plan customers throughout the country in
both our Commercial & Specialty and our Government business segments, as well as to customers outside of
-8-
the health plans we own. Our comprehensive PBM services portfolio includes features such as formulary management, pharmacy
networks, a prescription drug database, member services and mail order capabilities.
IngenioRx delegates certain PBM administrative functions, such as claims processing and prescription fulfillment, to
CaremarkPCS Health, L.L.C., which is a subsidiary of CVS Health Corporation (“CVS Health”), pursuant to a five-year
agreement (the “CVS PBM Agreement”). With IngenioRx, we retain the responsibilities for clinical and formulary strategy and
development, member and employer experiences, operations, sales, marketing, account management and retail network strategy.
From December 2009 through December 2019, we delegated certain PBM functions and administrative services to Express
Scripts Inc. (“Express Scripts”). Express Scripts managed the network of pharmacy providers, operated mail order pharmacies
and processed prescription drug claims on our behalf, while we sold and supported the product for our members, made formulary
decisions, sold drug benefit design strategy and provided front line member support. We began transitioning existing members
from Express Scripts to IngenioRx in the second quarter of 2019, and completed the transition by January 1, 2020.
Competition
The managed care industry is highly competitive, both nationally and in our local markets. Competition continues to be intense
due to aggressive marketing, pricing, bid activity for government-sponsored programs, business consolidations, new strategic
alliances, new competitors in the market, a proliferation of new products, technological advancements, the impact of legislative
reform, increased quality awareness and price sensitivity among customers and changing market practices, such as increased usage of
telehealth.
We believe that participants in the managed care industry compete for customers based on quality of service, price, access to
provider networks, access to care management and wellness programs (including health information), innovation, effective use of
digital technology, breadth and flexibility of products and benefits, expertise and reputation (including National Committee on Quality
Assurance (“NCQA”) accreditation status as well as CMS Star ratings), brand recognition and financial stability. Our ability to attract
and retain customers is substantially tied to our ability to distinguish ourselves from our competitors in these areas.
We believe our exclusive right to market products under the most recognized brand in the industry, BCBS, in our most significant
markets provides us with greater brand recognition over competitive product offerings. Typically, we are the largest participant in each
of our BCBS branded markets and, thus, are closely-watched by other health benefits companies.
Product pricing remains competitive and we strive to price our health benefit products and design our Medicare and Medicaid
bids consistent with anticipated underlying medical trends. We believe our pricing and bid strategy, based on predictive modeling,
proprietary research and data-driven processes, has positioned us to benefit from the potential growth opportunities available through
entry into new markets, expansions in existing markets and as a result of any future changes to the current regulatory scheme. We
believe that our pricing and bid strategy, brand name and network quality will provide a strong foundation for membership growth
opportunities in the future.
Our provider networks give us a highly competitive unit cost position and provide distinctive service levels which allow us to
offer a broad range of affordable health benefit products to our customers. To build our provider networks, we compete with other
health benefits plans for the best contracts with hospitals, physicians and other providers. We believe that physicians and other
providers primarily consider customer volume, reimbursement rates, timeliness of reimbursement and administrative service
capabilities along with the reduction of non-value added administrative tasks when deciding whether to contract with a health benefits
plan.
At the sales and distribution level, we compete for qualified agents and brokers to recommend and distribute our products. Strong
competition exists among insurance companies and health benefits plans for agents and brokers with demonstrated ability to secure
new business and maintain existing accounts. We believe that the quality and price of our products, support services, reputation and
prior relationships, along with a reasonable commission structure, are the factors agents and brokers consider in choosing whether to
market our products. We believe that we have good relationships with our agents and brokers, and that our products, support services
and commission structure compare favorably to those of our competitors in all of our markets.
-9-
In addition, the PBM industry is highly competitive, and IngenioRx is subject to competition from national, regional and local
PBMs, insurers, health plans, large retail pharmacy chains, large retail stores, supermarkets, mail order pharmacies, web pharmacies
and specialty pharmacies. Strong competition within the PBM industry has generated greater demand for lower product and service
pricing, increased revenue sharing and enhanced product and service offerings.
Pricing and Underwriting of Our Products
We price our products based on our assessment of current healthcare claim costs and emerging healthcare cost trends, combined
with charges for administrative expenses, risk and profit. We continually review our product designs and pricing guidelines on a
national and regional basis so that our products remain competitive and consistent with our profitability goals and strategies.
Our revenue on Medicare policies is based on annual bids submitted to CMS. We base the Commercial and Medicaid premiums
we charge and our Medicare bids on our estimates of future medical costs over the fixed contract period. In applying our pricing to
each employer group and customer, we aim to maintain consistent, competitive and disciplined underwriting standards. We employ
our proprietary accumulated actuarial and financial data to determine underwriting and pricing parameters for both our risk-based and
fee-based businesses.
In most circumstances, our pricing and underwriting decisions follow a prospective rating process in which a fixed premium is
determined at the beginning of the contract period. For our risk-based business, any deviation, favorable or unfavorable, from the
medical costs assumed in determining the premium is our responsibility. Some of our larger groups employ retrospective rating
reviews, where positive experience is partially refunded to the group, and negative experience is charged against a rate stabilization
fund established from the group’s favorable experience or charged against future favorable experience. In addition, our ACA and
government risk-based contracts may include minimum medical loss ratio, risk adjustment, or risk corridor arrangements, which also
stabilize premiums based upon claims experience.
Our pharmacy pricing through IngenioRx is presented to market via discounts off the average wholesale price for drugs dispensed
through the retail, mail and specialty channels as well as through rebate projections. We utilize group-specific script data, formulary,
network and clinical care program selection combined with administrative expense, risk and profit guidance to set market competitive
pricing discounts and rebate projections. Pharmacy pricing guidelines guide the underwriting process and undergo an annual external
review process to ensure market competitiveness.
Networks and Provider Relations
Our relationships with physicians, hospitals and professionals that render healthcare services to our members are guided by local,
regional and national standards for network development, reimbursement and contract methodologies. While following industry
standards, we are simultaneously seeking to lead transformation efforts within our healthcare system, moving from a fragmented
model premised on episodic intervention to one based on proactive, coordinated care built around the needs of the patient. A key
element of this transformation involves a transition from traditional fee-for-service payment models to models where providers are
paid based on the value, both in quality and affordability, of the care they deliver.
 We establish “market-based” hospital reimbursement payments that we believe are fair, but aggressive, and among the most
competitive in the market. We also seek to ensure that physicians in our network are paid in a timely manner at appropriate rates. In
many instances, we deploy multi-year contracting strategies, including case rates or fixed rates, to limit our exposure to medical cost
inflation and to increase cost predictability. We maintain both broad and narrow provider networks to ensure member choice, based on
both price and access needs, while implementing programs designed to improve the quality of care our members receive. Increasingly,
we are supplementing our broad-based networks with smaller or more cost-effective networks that are designed to be attractive to a
more price-sensitive customer segment, such as Public Exchange customers.
 Our reimbursement strategies vary across markets and depend on the degree of consolidation and integration of physician groups
and hospitals. Under a fee-for-service reimbursement methodology for physicians, fee schedules are developed at the state level based
on an assessment of several factors and conditions, including the CMS resource-based relative value system (“RBRVS”), medical
practice cost inflation and physician supply. We utilize CMS RBRVS fee schedules as a reference point for fee schedule development
and analysis. The RBRVS structure was developed, maintained, and updated by CMS and is used by the Medicare program and other
major health plans. In addition, we have implemented
-10-
and continue to expand physician incentive contracting, or “pay-for-performance,” which ties physician payment levels to
performance on clinical measures.
 While we generally do not delegate full financial responsibility to our physician providers in the form of capitation-based
reimbursement, we maintain capitation-based arrangements in certain markets where we determine that market dynamics result in it
being a useful method to lower costs and reduce underwriting risk.
 Our hospital contracts provide for a variety of reimbursement arrangements depending on local market dynamics and current
hospital utilization efficiency. Most hospitals are reimbursed a fixed amount per day or reimbursed a per-case amount, per admission,
for inpatient covered services. A small percentage of hospitals, primarily rural, sole community hospitals, are reimbursed on a discount
from approved charge basis for covered services. Our “per-case” reimbursement methods utilize many of the same attributes contained
in Medicare’s Diagnosis Related Groups methodology. Hospital outpatient services are reimbursed by fixed case rates, fee schedules
or percent of approved charges. Our hospital contracts recognize unique hospital attributes, such as academic medical centers or
community hospitals, and the volume of care performed for our members. To improve predictability of expected costs, we frequently
use a multi-year contracting approach with providers. In addition, the majority of our hospital contracts include a pay-for-performance
component where reimbursement levels are linked to improved clinical performance, patient safety and medical error reduction. 
Our provider engagement and contracting strategies have evolved to include several new value-based contracting arrangements
that meet providers where they are in the movement from traditional fee-for-service to value-based care. These programs are designed
to support Commercial, Medicare and Medicaid programs and the unique characteristics of these populations. Our value-based
contracting programs are designed to reward our contracted providers for improving the overall quality of care they deliver by
adhering to evidence-based medicine. In addition, these value-based contracts also share with the providers total cost of care savings
that are achieved by adhering to evidence-based medicine over time. For providers who contract in one of our value-based programs,
we work with them to share gaps in care information and other important data to assist them in managing the care of their patients.
Often providers will also grant us access to data to support the efficient administration of program components. This data can allow us
to more efficiently capture information regarding the risk of our membership and the overall adherence to evidence-based medicine, as
well as information to more efficiently perform utilization management administration.
Seasonality
We experience seasonality in our Commercial & Specialty Business and Government Business segments. While our premium
revenues are not seasonal, our benefit costs typically increase during the year as our risk-based members pay their annual deductibles
and reach their out-of-pocket maximum limits. However, this seasonality may change in the future as the COVID-19 pandemic
continues.
Medical Management Programs
Our medical management programs include a broad array of activities that facilitate improvements in the quality of care provided
to our members and promote cost-effective medical care. These medical management activities and programs are administered and
directed by physicians and nurses. The goals of our medical management strategies are to ensure that the care delivered to our
members is supported by appropriate medical and scientific evidence, is received on a timely basis and occurs in the most appropriate
setting. The following is a general description of our medical management programs, which are available to our members depending
on the particular plan or product in which they participate:
Care coordination:  A traditional medical management strategy we use is care coordination, which is based on nationally
recognized criteria developed by third-party medical specialists. With inpatient care coordination, the requirements and intensity of
services during a patient’s hospital stay are reviewed, at times by an onsite, skilled nurse professional in collaboration with the
hospital’s medical and nursing staff, in order to coordinate care and determine the most effective transition of care from the hospital
setting. In addition, continued stay cases are reviewed with physician medical directors to ensure appropriate utilization of medical
services. We also coordinate care for outpatient services to help ensure that patients with chronic conditions who receive care from
multiple physicians are able to manage the exchange of information between physicians and coordinate office visits to their
physicians.
-11-
Case management:  We have implemented a medical management strategy focused on identifying the small percentage of the
membership that will require a high level of intervention and assistance to manage their healthcare needs. Case management identifies
members who are likely to be re-admitted to the hospital through claims analysis using predictive modeling techniques, the use of
health risk assessment data, utilization management reports and referrals from a physician or one of our other programs, such as the
24/7 NurseLine. Registered nurses, medical directors, behavioral health experts, pharmacists and other clinicians focus on these
members and help them coordinate their care through pharmacy compliance, post-hospital care, follow-up visits to see their physician
and support in their home. Increasingly, we collaborate with our providers and key health partners within the member’s provider care
team by providing actionable patient data insights, practice-coaching capabilities, technology and programs, and products that help our
providers and health partners to successfully deliver the right care, at the right time, in the right place.
Precertification:  Precertification involves assessment of the appropriateness of certain hospitalizations and other medical services
prior to the services being rendered. For example, precertification is used to determine whether a set of hospital and medical services
is being appropriately applied to the member’s clinical condition, in accordance with criteria for medical necessity as that term is
defined in the member’s benefits contract. All of our health plans have implemented precertification programs for selected medical
services including surgeries, major diagnostic procedures, devices, drugs and other services to help members maximize benefits and
avoid unnecessary charges or penalties.
Formulary management:  We have developed formularies, which are selections of drugs based on clinical quality and
effectiveness. A pharmacy and therapeutics committee of physicians uses scientific and clinical evidence to ensure that our members
have access to the appropriate drug therapies and receive these therapies through proper settings. 
Medical policy:  A medical policy committee determines our national policies and guidelines for the application of medical
technologies, procedures and services. This committee is comprised of internal and external physician leaders from various specialties
and areas of the country. We also work in cooperation with academic medical centers, practicing community physicians and medical
specialty organizations. All guidelines and policies are reviewed at least once a year or as new published clinical evidence becomes
available.
Quality programs:  We are actively engaged with our hospital and physician networks to enable them to improve medical and
surgical care and achieve better outcomes for our members. We endorse, encourage and incentivize hospitals and physicians to support
national initiatives to improve the quality of clinical care and patient outcomes and to reduce medication errors and hospital infections.
External review procedures:  We work with outside experts through a process of external review to provide our members
scientifically and clinically, evidence-based medical care. When we receive member concerns, we have formal appeals procedures that
ultimately allow coverage disputes related to medical necessity decisions under the benefits contract to be settled by independent
expert physicians.
Provider cost comparison tools: We offer web-based tools that allow our members to compare cost estimates, quality
accreditation data and patient reviews for common services at contracted providers and cost estimates for facility, professional and
ancillary services. Members can also estimate out-of-pocket costs based on a member’s own benefit coverage, deductible and out-of-
pocket maximum. We continue to work on enhancing and evolving our tools to assist members in making informed and value-based
healthcare decisions. In addition, we collaborate with an external independent vendor to support employers wanting to purchase a
consumer engagement solution with certain additional functionality.
Anthem Health Guide: Anthem Health Guide is an educational resource that integrates the customer service experience with
clinical and wellness coaching to provide easier navigation of healthcare services for our members. Anthem Health Guide provides
members with education on benefit options and digital opportunities that fit member preferences, and makes recommendations for
eligible clinical programs to ensure members are connected to the most appropriate care and clinical resources. By allowing members
to connect with us using voice, click-to-chat, secure email and mobile technology, we enhance our ability to engage with our
members.
Anthem Whole Health Connection: Anthem Whole Health Connection is included when our health benefits are combined with
one or more of our pharmacy, dental, vision, life, disability, behavioral health or supplemental health coverage plans and connects
medical, pharmacy, dental, vision, disability, behavioral health and supplemental health clinical
-12-
and claims data to proactively identify health issues earlier and engage our members with their health providers in new ways to
support health, lower costs and deliver a better healthcare experience.
Care Management and Wellness Products and Programs
We continue to expand our suite of integrated care management programs and tools and offer the following programs, among
others, which are available to our members depending on the particular plan or product in which they participate, and have been
designed to increase quality and reduce medical costs for our members:
Sydney Health is our digital engagement platform. Sydney Health gives our members access to personalized health and wellness
resources; medical, pharmacy, dental, vision, life, and disability benefits details; as well as virtual care services, all in one place.
ConditionCare and FutureMoms are care management and maternity management programs that serve as adjuncts to physician
care. Skilled nurse professionals, with added support from our team of dietitians, social workers, pharmacists, health educators and
other health professionals, help participants understand their condition, their doctor’s orders and how to become a better self-manager
of their condition. We also offer members infertility consultation through our SpecialOffers@Anthem program, a comprehensive and
integrated assembly of discounted health and wellness products and services from a variety of the nation’s leading retailers.
24/7 NurseLine offers access to qualified, registered nurses anytime. This allows our members to make informed decisions about
the appropriate level of care and avoid unnecessary worry. This program also includes a referral process to the nearest urgent care
facility, a robust audio library, accessible by phone, with more than 600 health and wellness topics, as well as on-line health education
topics designed to educate members about symptoms and treatment of many common health concerns.
MyHealth Advantage utilizes integrated information systems and sophisticated data analytics to help our members improve their
compliance with evidence-based care guidelines, providing personal care notes that alert members to potential gaps in care, enable
more prudent healthcare choices and assist in the realization of member out-of-pocket cost savings. Key opportunities are also shared
with physicians through Availity at the time of membership eligibility verification. Availity is an electronic data interchange system
that allows for the exchange of health information among providers over a secure network.
MyHealth Coach provides our members with a professional guide who helps them navigate the healthcare system and make better
decisions about their well-being. MyHealth Coach proactively reaches out to people who are at risk for potentially serious health
issues or have complex healthcare needs. Our health coaches help participants understand and manage chronic conditions, handle any
health and wellness related services they need and make smart lifestyle choices.
HealthyLifestyles helps employees transform unhealthy habits into positive ones by focusing on behaviors that can have a positive
effect on their health and their employer’s financial well-being. HealthyLifestyles programs include smoking cessation, weight
management, stress management, physical activity, and diet and nutrition.
Wellbeing Coach provides our members with an experienced health educator who provides counseling, tools, and support to
transform unhealthy habits into positive ones, focusing on tobacco cessation or weight management.
Behavioral Health Case Management is a comprehensive program supporting a wide range of members who are impacted by
their behavioral health condition, including specialty areas such as eating disorders, anxiety, depression and substance abuse. The
program assists members and their families with obtaining appropriate behavioral health treatment, offering community resources,
providing education and telephonic support, and promoting provider collaboration.
Autism Spectrum Disorder Program is a specialized case management program staffed by a dedicated team of clinicians who have
been trained on the unique challenges and needs of families with a member who has a diagnosis of autism spectrum disorder. These
clinicians provide education, information on community resources to help with care and support, guidance on the appropriate usage of
benefits and assistance in exploring effective treatments, such as medical services, that may help the member and their families.® ®
-13-
Employee Assistance Programs provide 24/7 telephonic support for personal and crisis events and provide resources such as
counseling and referral assistance with childcare, health and wellness, financial issues, legal issues, adoption and daily living.
Healthcare Quality Initiatives
Increasingly, the healthcare industry is able to define quality healthcare based on preventive health measurements, outcomes of
care and optimal care management for chronic disease. A key to our success has been our ability to work with our network physicians
and hospitals to improve the quality and outcomes of the healthcare services provided to our members. Our ability to promote quality
medical care has been recognized by NCQA, the largest and most respected national accreditation program for managed care health
plans.
Several quality healthcare measures, including the Healthcare Effectiveness Data and Information Set (“HEDIS”), have been
incorporated into NCQA’s accreditation processes. HEDIS measures range from preventive services, such as screening
mammography and pediatric immunization, to elements of care, including decreasing the complications of diabetes, improving
treatment for patients with heart disease, integration of behavioral health, and racial and ethnic stratification measurement to help
close healthcare disparities.
Our health outcomes research subsidiary, HealthCore, Inc. (“HealthCore”), generates consistent and actionable evidence to
support decision making while helping to guide fresh initiatives for a range of stakeholders in the healthcare industry. By leveraging a
rich array of medical and pharmacy utilization data queried from administrative claims, patient surveys, medical charts and laboratory
diagnostics, among other health records, HealthCore’s multi-disciplinary research teams develop a broad spectrum of safety, clinical
research trials, effectiveness, pharmacoepidemiology and health economics evidence. HealthCore’s real world evidence and
comparative effectiveness research, among other data, have played roles in the product planning and development campaigns of
biotechnology and pharmaceutical companies and today it lists most of the leading biologics and drug manufacturers as clients or
alliance partners.
Through our American Imaging Management, Inc. subsidiary, doing business as AIM Specialty Health (“AIM”), we promote
appropriate, safe and affordable member care in the areas of imaging, sleep disorders, cardiac testing, oncology drugs and
musculoskeletal procedures. These expanded specialty benefit management solutions leverage clinical expertise and technology to
engage provider communities and members in the more effective and efficient use of outpatient services and to promote the most
appropriate use of clinical services to improve the quality of overall healthcare delivered to our members and members of other health
plans that are covered under AIM’s programs.
Through our subsidiary myNEXUS, Inc. (“myNEXUS”), we perform management review for home health services provided to
Medicare members, with the goal of ensuring they receive appropriate, high-quality care and supporting their transition back into the
home. Effective management of these services can help reduce preventable hospital admissions and readmissions, thereby improving
healthcare outcomes for patients. Additionally, myNEXUS has developed programs to address healthcare quality by identifying social
determinants of health needs of our members and seeking to close gaps in care through an in-home assessment. Both AIM and
myNEXUS programs are examples of how we facilitate improvements in the quality of care provided to our members and promote
cost-effective medical care.
BCBSA Licenses
We are a party to license agreements with the BCBSA that entitle us to the exclusive, and in certain areas, non-exclusive use of
the Blue Cross and Blue Shield names and marks in assigned geographic territories. BCBSA is a national association of independent
Blue Cross and Blue Shield companies, the primary function of which is to promote and preserve the integrity of the BCBS names and
marks, as well as provide certain coordination among the member companies. Each BCBSA licensee is an independent legal
organization and is not responsible for obligations of other BCBSA member organizations. We currently have no right to market
products and services using the BCBS names and marks outside of the states in which we are licensed to sell BCBS products.
However, if the terms of the subscriber settlement agreement and release (“Subscriber Settlement Agreement”) that was agreed to in
2020 by the BCBSA and Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield licensees, including us (the “Blue plans”), are approved, some large national
employers with self-funded plans will have a right to request a second Blue plan bid in addition to the local Blue plan. We are required
to pay an annual license fee to the BCBSA based on enrollment and also to comply with various requirements and restrictions
regarding our operations and our use of the BCBS names and marks. These requirements and restrictions include, among other things:
minimum capital and liquidity®
®
-14-
requirements; enrollment and customer service performance requirements; participation in programs that provide portability of
membership between plans; disclosures to the BCBSA relating to enrollment and financial conditions; disclosures as to the structure of
the BCBS system in contracts with third parties and in public statements; plan governance requirements; cybersecurity requirements; a
requirement that at least 80% (or, in the case of Blue Cross of California, substantially all) of a licensee’s annual combined local net
revenue, as defined by the BCBSA, attributable to healthcare plans and related services within its service areas must be sold,
marketed, administered or underwritten under the BCBS names and marks; a requirement that neither a plan nor any of its licensed
affiliates may permit an entity other than a plan or a licensed affiliate to obtain control of the plan or the licensed affiliate or to acquire
a substantial portion of its assets related to licensable services; governance requirements such as a requirement that we divide our
Board of Directors into three classes serving staggered three-year terms; a requirement that we guarantee certain contractual and
financial obligations of our licensed affiliates; and a requirement that we indemnify the BCBSA against any claims asserted against it
resulting from the contractual and financial obligations of any subsidiary that serves as a fiscal intermediary providing administrative
services for Medicare Parts A and B. In addition, a change of control or violation of the BCBSA ownership limitations on our capital
stock, impending financial insolvency or the appointment of a trustee or receiver or the commencement of any action against us
seeking our dissolution could cause a termination of our license agreements.
We believe that we and our licensed affiliates are currently in compliance with these standards. The standards under the license
agreements may be modified in certain instances by the BCBSA. See Part I, Item 1A “Risk Factors” in this Annual Report on Form
10-K for additional details on the impact if we were not to comply with these license agreements and Note 14, “Commitments and
Contingencies - Litigation and Regulatory Proceedings – Blue Cross Blue Shield Antitrust Litigation” of the Notes to our
Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K for additional information on the
Subscriber Settlement Agreement.
Regulation
General
Our operations are subject to comprehensive and detailed state, federal and international regulation throughout the jurisdictions in
which we do business. These laws and regulations, which can vary significantly from jurisdiction to jurisdiction, restrict how we
conduct our businesses and result in additional burdens and costs to us. Further, federal and state laws and regulations are subject to
amendments and changing interpretations in each jurisdiction. The application of these complex legal and regulatory requirements to
the detailed operation of our businesses creates areas of uncertainty. In addition, there are numerous proposed healthcare laws and
regulations at the federal and state levels, including single payer, Medicare for All and public option proposals, some of which could
materially adversely affect our businesses if they were to be enacted.
Supervisory agencies, including federal and state regulators and departments of health, insurance and corporation, have broad
authority to:
•grant, suspend and revoke licenses to transact business;
•regulate our products and services in great detail;
•regulate, limit, or suspend our ability to market products, including participation in Medicare and the ACA Public Exchanges;
•determine through a procurement process our ability to participate in certain programs, including state Medicaid programs;
•retroactively adjust premium rates;
•monitor our solvency and reserve adequacy;
•scrutinize our investment activities on the basis of quality, diversification and other quantitative criteria; and
•impose monetary and criminal sanctions for non-compliance with regulatory requirements.
To carry out these tasks, these government entities periodically examine our operations and accounts.
The health benefits business also may be adversely impacted by court and regulatory decisions that expand or invalidate the
interpretations of existing statutes and regulations. It is uncertain whether we could recoup, through higher premiums or
-15-
other measures, the increased costs of mandated benefits or other increased costs caused by potential legislation, regulation or court
rulings. See Part I, Item 1A “Risk Factors” in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
COVID-19
Federal and state governments have enacted, and may continue to enact, legislation and regulations in response to the COVID-19
pandemic that have had, and we expect will continue to have, a significant impact on health benefits, consumer eligibility for public
programs and our cash flows for all lines of business, and introduce increased uncertainty around our cost structure. These actions,
which are or have been in effect for various durations, provide, among other things:
•mandates to waive cost-sharing for COVID-19 testing (including over-the-counter testing in accordance with state and
federal requirements such as California SB 510 and January 2022 federal requirements), treatment, vaccines and related
services;
•reforms, including waiving Medicare originating site restrictions for qualified providers of telehealth services;
•financial support to healthcare providers, including expansion of the Medicare accelerated payment program to all providers
receiving Medicare payments;
•mandated expansion of premium payment terms, including the time period for which claims can be denied for lack of
payment; and
•mandates related to prior authorizations and payment levels to providers, additional consumer enrollment windows and an
increased ability to provide telehealth services.
The Consolidated Appropriations Act
The Consolidated Appropriations Act of 2021, which was enacted in December 2020 (the “Appropriations Act”), contains a
number of provisions that may have a material effect upon our business, including procedures and coverage requirements related to
surprise medical bills and new mandates for continuity of care for certain patients, price comparison tools, disclosure of broker
compensation, mental health parity reporting, and reporting on pharmacy benefits and drug costs. The health plan-related requirements
of the Appropriations Act have varying effective dates beginning as early as December 2021, some of which have been extended since
the enactment of the Appropriations Act.
Implementation of the Appropriations Act brings with it significant oversight responsibilities by health insurers that may result in
increased governmental audits, increased assertions of False Claims Act violations, and an increased risk of other litigation. Federal
regulatory agencies continue to issue regulations and guidance related to the Appropriations Act.
The American Rescue Plan Act
The American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (the “Rescue Plan”), which was enacted in March 2021, contains several health-related
provisions that have impacted our business, including expansion of premium tax credits for our Public Exchange business and full
subsidization of the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act (“COBRA”) continuation coverage for those who were
involuntarily terminated or had their work hours reduced. The Rescue Plan’s premium tax provisions became effective in January
2021, while the COBRA premium subsidization was effective from April 2021 through September 2021.
State Regulation of Insurance Companies and HMOs
Our insurance and HMO subsidiaries must obtain a certificate of authority and maintain that license in the jurisdictions in which
they conduct business. The National Association of Insurance Commissioners (“NAIC”) has adopted model regulations that, where
adopted by states, require expanded governance practices, risk and solvency assessment reporting and the filing of periodic financial
and operating reports. Most states have adopted these or similar measures to expand the scope of regulations relating to corporate
governance and internal control activities of HMOs and insurance companies. Health insurers and HMOs are subject to state
examination and periodic license renewal.
In addition, we are regulated as an insurance holding company and are subject to the insurance holding company acts of the states
in which our insurance company and HMO subsidiaries are domiciled. These acts contain certain reporting requirements, as well as
restrictions on transactions between an insurer or HMO and its affiliates, and may restrict the ability of our regulated subsidiaries to
pay dividends to our holding companies. These holding company laws and regulations
-16-
generally require registration with applicable state departments of insurance and the filing of reports describing capital structure,
ownership, financial condition, certain intercompany transactions, enterprise risks, corporate governance and general business
operations. State insurance holding company laws and regulations require notice or prior regulatory approval of transactions including
acquisitions, material intercompany transfers of assets, guarantees and other transactions between the regulated companies and their
affiliates, including parent holding companies. Applicable state insurance holding company acts also restrict the ability of any person
to obtain control of an insurance company or HMO without prior regulatory approval. “Control” is generally defined as the direct or
indirect power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person and is presumed to exist if a person directly
or indirectly owns or controls 10% or more of the voting securities of another person. Dispositions of control generally are also
regulated under the state insurance holding company acts.
The states of domicile of our regulated subsidiaries have statutory risk-based capital (“RBC”) requirements for health and other
insurance companies and HMOs based on the Risk-Based Capital (“RBC”) For Health Organizations Model Act. These RBC
requirements are intended to assess the capital adequacy of life and health insurers and HMOs, taking into account the risk
characteristics of a company’s investments and products. In general, under these laws, an insurance company or HMO must submit a
report of its RBC level to the insurance department or insurance commissioner of its state of domicile for each calendar year. The law
requires increasing degrees of regulatory oversight and intervention as a company’s RBC declines. As of December 31, 2021, the RBC
levels of our insurance and HMO subsidiaries exceeded all applicable mandatory RBC requirements. For more information on RBC
capital and additional liquidity and capital requirements for a licensee of the BCBSA, see “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of
Financial Condition and Results of Operations–Liquidity and Capital Resources–Capital Resources,” included in Part II, Item 7 of this
Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Ongoing Requirements and Changes Stemming from the ACA
Since its enactment in 2010, the ACA has introduced new risks, regulatory challenges and uncertainties, and required changes in
the way our products are designed, underwritten, priced, distributed and administered. The ACA has evolved and various legal
challenges since its enactment introduced increased uncertainty to our business. In June 2021, the U.S. Supreme Court issued its
opinion and dismissed the latest legal challenge to the constitutionality of the ACA, leaving the law intact. We expect that most of the
ACA will remain in place and continue to significantly impact our business operations and results of operations, including pricing,
minimum medical loss ratios (“MLRs”) and the geographies in which our products are available; however, federal regulatory agencies
continue to modify regulations and guidance related to the ACA and our businesses more broadly. We also expect further and ongoing
regulatory guidance on a number of issues related to Medicare, including evolving methodology for ratings and quality bonus
payments. CMS is also proposing changes to its program that audits data submitted under the risk adjustment programs in a way that
would increase financial recoveries from plans. We will continue to evaluate the impact of the ACA as any further developments or
judicial rulings occur.
Certain significant provisions of the ACA include, among others:
•Prohibitions against lifetime limits, certain annual limits, member cost-sharing on specified preventive benefits and pre-
existing condition exclusions.
•Mandated coverage requirements and benefits associated with commercial health insurance.
•The creation of Public Exchanges for individuals and small group customers.
•Establishment of minimum MLR thresholds by line of business for the Commercial market (which may be subject to more
restrictive MLR thresholds under state regulations, such as those in New York). Medicare Advantage or Medicare Part D
prescription drug plans that do not meet the mandated threshold will have to pay a minimum MLR rebate, will be subject to
restricted enrollment if MLR is below the threshold for three consecutive years, and are subject to contract termination if the
plan’s MLR is below the threshold for five consecutive years. In addition, state Medicaid programs are required to set
managed care capitation rates such that a minimum MLR is projected to be achieved; however, states are not required to
collect remittances if the minimum MLR is not achieved.
Approximately 53.6% and 20.7% of our premium revenue and medical membership, respectively, were subject to the
minimum MLR regulations as of and for the year ended December 31, 2021. Approximately 54.8% and 20.2% of our
premium revenue and medical membership, respectively, were subject to the minimum MLR regulations as of and for the
year ended December 31, 2020.
-17-
•The creation of an incentive payment program for Medicare Advantage plans. CMS developed the Medicare Advantage Star
ratings system, which awards between 1.0 and 5.0 Stars to Medicare Advantage plans based on performance in several
categories, including quality of care and customer service. The Star ratings are used by CMS to award quality-based bonus
payments to plans that receive a rating of 4.0 or higher. The methodology and measures included in the Star ratings system
can be modified by CMS annually. As of December 31, 2021, all of our Medicare Advantage plans have received a rating of
3.0 or higher.
•Federal review requirements for unreasonable premium rate increases for Individual and small group products, or where the
state does not have an effective rate review system.
•The establishment of the non-deductible Health Insurance Provider Fee (“HIP Fee”), which was permanently eliminated
effective January 1, 2021. For the year ended December 31, 2020, we recognized $1,570 as selling, general and
administrative expense related to the HIP Fee.
•Implementation of a Medicare Advantage payment formula, which prevents reimbursement rates from increasing as much as
otherwise would be expected.
In general, the Individual market risk pool that includes Public Exchange markets has become less healthy since its inception in
2014 and continues to exhibit risk volatility. In addition, insurers have faced uncertainties related to federal government funding for
various ACA programs. These factors may have a material adverse effect on our results of operations if premiums are not adequate or
do not appropriately reflect the acuity of these individuals. Any variation from our expectations regarding acuity, enrollment levels,
adverse selection, or other assumptions utilized in setting premium rates could have a material adverse effect on our results of
operations, financial position and cash flows. We make adjustments to our premium rates and participation footprint on an ongoing
basis, based on our experience in Public Exchange markets to date, and continue to evaluate the performance of our Public Exchange
plans. In 2021, we made the decision to modestly expand our participation in the Individual ACA-compliant market for 2022 after also
expanding in 2021. As a result, for 2022 we are offering Individual ACA-compliant products in 122 of the 143 rating regions in which
we operate, in comparison to 103 of 143 rating regions in 2021. Our strategy has been, and will continue to be, to only participate in
rating regions where we have an appropriate level of confidence that these markets are on a path toward sustainability, including, but
not limited to, factors such as expected financial performance, regulatory environment, and underlying market characteristics.
In a separate development, in August 2020, the Court of Appeals for the Federal Circuit affirmed the federal government’s
unambiguous obligation to make unpaid cost sharing reduction (“CSR”) payments to qualified health plans, but held that a plan’s
payments should be reduced by the amount of additional premium tax credits an issuer received as a result of the government’s
termination of CSR payments. We recognized the net premium impact of the CSR recoveries for 2017 in the fourth quarter of 2021.
We will continue to review and evaluate the impact of this litigation as any further developments or judicial rulings occur.
Drug Benefit and Pharmacy Benefit Manager Regulation
Pharmacy benefit managers are regulated at both the federal and state levels and must comply with federal and state statutes and
regulations governing labeling, packaging, advertising and adulteration of prescription drugs, dispensing of controlled substances and
licensing. In recent years the federal government has banned certain business practices, including “gag clauses,” which prohibited
pharmacists from informing patients when a lower cost drug was available as a substitute, and “clawbacks,” which occurred when
pharmacy benefit managers sought to recoup the difference between the reimbursed cost of the drug and the patient’s copay when the
drug itself was less expensive than the copay paid by the patient. Regulation in the states varies dramatically and ranges from licensure
of PBMs as third-party administrators, licensure specifically as a pharmacy benefit manager, and licensure accompanied by additional
disclosures and limitations of business practices to varying degrees. The NAIC finalized a PBM model law that, if adopted widely,
could result in a more standardized approach to PBM regulation in the states in the future. Additionally, in December 2020, the U.S.
Supreme Court let stand an Arkansas law regulating PBMs, which could be a precursor to greater state regulation of PBMs in the
future. In June 2021, the NAIC announced a proposed white paper addressing PBMs and examining the impact of this Supreme Court
case on its model law, which could result in expansion of the NAIC model law and additional regulatory oversight, which could
materially affect current industry practices and our PBM business.
A number of proposals are being considered at the federal and state levels that would increase regulation of drug benefits and
pharmacy benefit managers. Such proposals under consideration include (1) regulation of rebates from drug
-18-
manufacturers that would require rebate dollars to be applied at the point-of-sale, (2) federal policy changes to set the prices for a
subset of drugs covered under the Medicare program, (3) reforms to the Medicare drug benefit, such as beneficiary cost-sharing
changes that aim to lower consumer costs, (4) attempts at both the federal and state levels to prohibit the use of spread pricing
contracts in both the Commercial and Medicaid markets, and (5) electronic prior authorizations of drugs. These reforms have the
potential to have broad impacts on our PBM business and could materially adversely affect our business if they are enacted.
Privacy, Confidentiality and Data Standards Regulation
The federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (“HIPAA”) and the administrative simplification
provisions of HIPAA impose a number of requirements on covered entities (including insurers, HMOs, group health plans, providers
and clearinghouses) and their business associates relating to the use, disclosure and safeguarding of protected health information.
These requirements include uniform standards of common electronic healthcare transactions; privacy and security regulations; and
unique identifier rules for employers, health plans and providers.
Also, the Health Information Technology for Economic and Clinical Health (“HITECH”) Act provisions of the American
Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 and corresponding implementing regulations have imposed additional requirements on the
use and disclosure of protected health information such as additional breach notification and reporting requirements, contracting
requirements for HIPAA business associate agreements, strengthened enforcement mechanisms and increased penalties for HIPAA
violations. Federal consumer protection laws may also apply in some instances to privacy and security practices related to personally
identifiable information.
The federal Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act generally places restrictions on the disclosure of non-public information to non-affiliated
third parties, and requires financial institutions, including insurers, to provide customers with notice regarding how their non-public
personal information is used, including an opportunity to “opt out” of certain disclosures. State departments of insurance and certain
federal agencies adopted implementing regulations as required by federal law.
The Cybersecurity Information Sharing Act of 2015 encourages organizations to share cyber threat indicators with the federal
government and, among other things, directed HHS to develop a set of voluntary cybersecurity best practices for organizations in the
healthcare industry, which were issued in 2018.
In addition, Public Exchanges are required to adhere to privacy and security standards with respect to personally identifiable
information and to impose privacy and security standards that are at least as protective as those the Public Exchange has implemented
for itself on insurers offering plans through the Public Exchanges and their designated downstream entities, including pharmacy
benefit managers and other business associates. These standards may differ from, and be more stringent than, HIPAA.
Furthermore, states have begun enacting more comprehensive privacy laws and regulations addressing consumer rights to data
protection or transparency that may affect our privacy and security practices, such as state laws like the California Privacy Rights Act
of 2020 that govern the use, disclosure and protection of member data and impose additional breach notification requirements. The
NAIC is planning potential revisions to one or more of its privacy model acts, which could expand consumer privacy rights. State
consumer protection laws may also apply to privacy and security practices related to personally identifiable information, including
information related to consumers and care providers. Complying with conflicting cybersecurity regulations and varying enforcement
philosophies, which may differ from state to state, requires significant resources and may materially and adversely affect our ability to
standardize our products and services across state lines.
Federal regulations have been finalized in the following areas that will materially impact our operations:
•Federal regulations on data interoperability that will require claims data to be made available to third parties unaffiliated with
us; and
•Federal regulations requiring hospitals and health insurers to publish negotiated prices for services, including the health plan
price transparency regulations issued in October 2020 by the U.S. Departments of Health and Human Services, Labor and
Treasury (the “Health Plan Transparency Rule”).
-19-
Beginning in July 2022, the Health Plan Transparency Rule will require us to disclose, on a monthly basis, detailed pricing
information regarding negotiated rates for all covered items and services between the plan or issuer and in-network providers and
historical payments to, and billed charges from, out-of-network providers. Additionally, beginning in 2023, we will be required to
make available to members personalized out-of-pocket cost information and the underlying negotiated rates for 500 covered
healthcare items and services, including prescription drugs. In 2024, this requirement will expand to all items and services.
Federal regulations were proposed that would have expanded the final regulation on data interoperability to require health insurers
to build new application programming interfaces to afford patients access to their health information and require electronic prior
authorizations for Commercial Qualified Health Plans in the federal exchange, as well as Medicaid and CHIP fee-for-service and
managed care organizations. These regulations were withdrawn in early 2021 and are expected to materially impact our operations if
re-proposed in substantially similar form.
Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974
The provision of services to certain employee welfare benefit plans is subject to the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of
1974, as amended (“ERISA”), a complex set of laws and regulations subject to interpretation and enforcement by the Internal Revenue
Service and the Department of Labor. ERISA regulates certain aspects of the relationships between us, the employers that maintain
employee welfare benefit plans subject to ERISA and participants in such plans. Some of our administrative services and other
activities may also be subject to regulation under ERISA. In addition, certain states require licensure or registration of companies
providing third-party claims administration services for benefit plans. We provide a variety of products and services to employee
welfare benefit plans that are covered by ERISA. Plans subject to ERISA can also be subject to state laws, and the question of whether
and to what extent ERISA preempts a state law has been, and will continue to be, interpreted by many courts.
Guaranty Fund Assessments
Under insolvency or guaranty association laws in most states, insurance companies and HMOs can be assessed for amounts paid
by guaranty funds for policyholder losses incurred when an insurance company or HMO becomes insolvent. Most state insolvency or
guaranty association laws currently provide for assessments based upon the amount of premiums received on insurance underwritten
within such state (with a minimum amount payable even if no premium is received). Under many of these guaranty association laws,
assessments are made retrospectively. Some states permit insurers or HMOs to recover assessments paid through full or partial
premium tax offsets or through future policyholder surcharges. The amount and timing of any future assessments cannot be predicted
with certainty; however, future assessments are likely to occur.
International Regulation
We have various international subsidiaries, which provide back-office services, that are subject to different, and sometimes more
stringent, legal and regulatory requirements, which vary widely by jurisdiction. In addition, our non-U.S. operations are subject to
U.S. laws regulating the conduct and activities of U.S.-based businesses operating abroad, including but not limited to, the Foreign
Corrupt Practices Act and corresponding foreign laws governing anti-bribery, anti-corruption and anti-money laundering.
Human Capital
At Anthem, it starts with our culture, and our associates are critical to fulfilling our purpose of improving the health of humanity.
As of December 31, 2021, we had approximately 98,200 associates. We are working to build a high performance culture that enhances
our ability to deliver on our commitments and guides us to address the challenges of today. We believe that our culture allows us to
attract and retain talented and experienced individuals to support the communities we serve. Our associates actively participate
through associate engagement surveys and online feedback tools. We leverage and monitor associate feedback and take action on
responses.
Inclusion & Diversity
The diversity of our associates is central to achieving key strategies and improving performance. We strive to maintain a diverse
and inclusive workforce comprised of a vast array of backgrounds, life experiences and cultures, which we believe
-20-
enables a deeper connection with our members, allowing us to better serve our members and communities, and drives greater business
results. As of December 31, 2021, our U.S. associate population was approximately 77% female and 47% racially and ethnically
diverse.
Talent Development
Growing and developing our talent internally is key to our succession plans and our ability to lead at our best every day. To
inspire a high-performance culture and promote talent excellence, we offer individual, career and leadership development
opportunities, encouraging associates to continually learn and grow. We offer various instructor-led and virtual instructor-led programs
and maintain a vast curriculum of relevant, on-demand learning and development resources.
Health & Wellbeing
We have the privilege of touching the lives of millions of people each day, and for us, this starts with the health of our own
associates. To improve the health and wellbeing of our associates, we offer a comprehensive compensation package, including
competitive salaries, a 401(k) plan and medical, dental, vision and disability coverage. In addition, we offer our associates wellness
and behavioral programs and tools to help them get and stay healthy and more easily manage their work and personal lives. In 2021,
we modified our workforce practices in response to the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic, developing a hybrid remote and in-office
workplace strategy, which will be fully deployed as we reopen facilities. Until its full deployment, the majority of our associates
continue to work remotely.
Information About Our Executive Officers
The following sets forth certain information regarding our executive officers and Chief Accounting Officer as of February 3,
2022.
Name Age Position
Gail K. Boudreaux 61 President and Chief Executive Officer
John E. Gallina 62 Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
Peter D. Haytaian 52Executive Vice President and President, Diversified Business
Group and IngenioRx
Charles M. Kendrick, Jr. 56Executive Vice President and President, Commercial and
Specialty Business Division
Gloria M. McCarthy 69 Executive Vice President and Chief Administrative Officer
Felicia F. Norwood 62Executive Vice President and President, Government Business
Division
Blair W. Todt 54 Executive Vice President and Chief Legal Officer
Ronald W. Penczek 57 Chief Accounting Officer and Controller
Ms. Boudreaux has served as our President and Chief Executive Officer and a Director of the Company since November 2017.
Prior to joining us, she served as Chief Executive Officer of GKB Global Health, LLC (healthcare consulting firm) from 2015 to
November 2017. Prior thereto, Ms. Boudreaux was Executive Vice President of UnitedHealth Group Incorporated (diversified
healthcare company) from 2008 to 2015, including roles as Chief Executive Officer of United HealthCare (managed healthcare
company), a subsidiary of UnitedHealth Group Incorporated from 2011 to 2014 and President of the Commercial Business of United
HealthCare from 2008 to 2011. Before joining United HealthCare, she worked at Health Care Services Corporation (“HCSC”) (health
insurance company) as Executive Vice President of External Operations from 2005 to 2008 and President of Blue Cross and Blue
Shield of Illinois from 2002 to 2005. Before joining HCSC, Ms. Boudreaux held various positions at Aetna, Inc. (“Aetna”) (managed
healthcare company), including Senior Vice President, Group Insurance.
Mr. Gallina has served as our Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer since 2016. Mr. Gallina joined Anthem in
1994 and has held a variety of leadership roles across the organization. Prior to his current role, Mr. Gallina served as Anthem’s Chief
Financial Officer for the Commercial and Specialty Business Division from 2015 to 2016, and as Senior Vice President and Chief
Accounting Officer from 2013 to 2015. Other leadership positions held during his tenure include
-21-
Senior Vice President, Chief Accounting Officer and Chief Risk Officer from 2011 to 2013, while also holding the title of Controller
from 2011 to 2013. Before joining the Company, Mr. Gallina spent 12 years with Coopers & Lybrand in various positions, including
as an Audit Senior Manager.
Mr. Haytaian has served as our Executive Vice President and President of our Diversified Business Group and IngenioRx since
October 2021. Prior to his current role, Mr. Haytaian served as Executive Vice President and President of our Commercial and
Specialty Business Division beginning in April 2018. From June 2014 until April 2018, Mr. Haytaian served as our Executive Vice
President and President of the Government Business Division. Mr. Haytaian joined the Company in 2012 with our acquisition of
Amerigroup Corporation (“Amerigroup”) and served as President of our Medicaid business from 2013 until 2014. From 2005 to 2013,
Mr. Haytaian held several leadership positions with Amerigroup, including serving as Chief Executive Officer of the North Region for
Amerigroup’s Medicaid business from 2012 until 2013. Mr. Haytaian has extensive experience leading Medicare and Medicaid
programs with Amerigroup and, prior thereto, with Oxford Health Plans, Inc.
Mr. Kendrick has served as Executive Vice President and President of our Commercial and Specialty Business Division since
October 2021. From January 2021 until October 2021, Mr. Kendrick served as President of our Commercial Business West Markets
(California, Colorado, Indiana, Kentucky, Missouri, Nevada, Ohio and Wisconsin). Mr. Kendrick joined us in 1995, and has held
numerous leadership roles across the organization, including serving as President, Anthem National Accounts/Central Markets from
2015 until January 2021 and President of National Accounts and General Manager for Anthem Blue Cross and Blue Shield of Georgia
from 2010 until 2015.
Ms. McCarthy has served as our Executive Vice President and Chief Administrative Officer since 2013. She was Executive Vice
President of Enterprise Execution and Efficiency from 2012 to 2013. Prior to that appointment, she served as Senior Vice President for
Operational Excellence from 2008 to 2012, as Senior Vice President of Service Operations from 2006 to 2008 and as Senior Vice
President and Chief Operating Officer of our East Region from 2005 to 2006. Prior to our acquisition of WellChoice, Inc.
(“WellChoice”) in 2005, Ms. McCarthy served as Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer of WellChoice.
Ms. Norwood has served as our Executive Vice President and President of the Government Business Division since June 2018.
Prior to joining us, she was Director of The Department of Healthcare and Family Services for the State of Illinois from 2015 to June
2018. Prior to that appointment, Ms. Norwood served as President of the Mid-America Region for Aetna from 2010 until 2013.
Mr. Todt has served as our Executive Vice President and Chief Legal Officer since November 2020 and our interim head of human
resources and global security and safety team since January 2022. Prior to joining us, Mr. Todt served as Senior Vice President, Legal,
Compliance & Business Performance and Chief Legal Officer of HCSC from 2016 to July 2020. Prior to joining HCSC, Mr. Todt held
a variety of leadership roles at WellCare Health Plans, Inc. (health insurance company), with his most recent role as Senior Vice
President, Chief Legal and Administrative Officer and Secretary from 2010 until 2016.
Mr. Penczek has served as our Controller since November 2015 and as our Chief Accounting Officer since December 2015. He
served as our Vice President and Controller from 2013 to 2015. Prior to that appointment, Mr. Penczek served as Vice President and
Assistant Controller from 2008 to 2013 and in various other roles in our finance department from 2006 until 2008. Before joining us in
2005, Mr. Penczek was a Staff Vice President with CNA Insurance from 2000 to 2005 and had various positions with
PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP from 1992 to 2000, including as a Manager.
Available Information
We are a large accelerated filer (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the “Exchange
Act”)) and are required, pursuant to Item 101 of Regulation S-K, to provide certain information regarding our website and the
availability of certain documents filed with or furnished to the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission (“SEC”). The SEC
maintains a website that contains reports, proxy and information statements and other information regarding issuers at www.sec.gov.
Our website is www.antheminc.com. We have included our website address throughout this Annual Report on Form 10-K as a textual
reference only. The information contained on, or accessible through, our website is not incorporated into this Annual Report on Form
10-K. We make available through our website, free of charge, our Annual Report on Form 10-K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10-Q,
Current Reports on Form 8-K, and amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Exchange
Act as soon as reasonably practicable after we
-22-
electronically file such material with or furnish it to the SEC. We also include on our website our Corporate Governance Guidelines,
our Code of Conduct and the charter of each standing committee of our Board of Directors. In addition, we intend to disclose on our
website any amendments to, or waivers from, our Code of Conduct that are required to be publicly disclosed pursuant to rules of the
SEC and the New York Stock Exchange (“NYSE”). Anthem, Inc. is an Indiana corporation incorporated on July 17, 2001.
ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS.
In evaluating our business, the risks described below, as well as the other information contained in this Annual Report on Form
10-K, should be carefully considered. Any one or more of such risks could materially and adversely affect our business, financial
condition, results of operations and stock price and could cause our actual results of operations and financial condition to vary
materially from past or anticipated future results of operations and financial condition. Additional risks and uncertainties not presently
known to us or that we currently believe to be immaterial may also adversely affect us.
BUSINESS RISKS
The outbreak of the COVID-19 pandemic and measures taken to prevent its spread are adversely affecting our business in a
number of ways, and we are unable to predict the full extent of those impacts on our business, cash flows, financial condition and
results of operations, but the impact could be material.
The COVID-19 pandemic continues to evolve, and the impact of COVID-19, and the actions taken to contain its spread or address
its impact, have adversely impacted our business and could have a material adverse effect on our operations and financial results in the
future. The extent of this impact will depend on future developments, which are highly uncertain and cannot be predicted at this time,
including, but not limited to, the transmission rate, duration and spread of the outbreak, its severity, the emergence of variants of the
virus which could be more contagious, more severe or less responsive to treatment or vaccines, the extent and effectiveness of the
actions taken to contain the spread of the virus and address its impacts, including widespread availability of vaccines, the exercise of
emergency powers by governments, and how quickly and to what extent normal economic and operating conditions can resume.
Factors that could negatively impact our ability to operate successfully, or that could otherwise materially adversely impact and disrupt
our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations include, but are not limited to, the following:
•Continued increases in healthcare costs due to higher utilization rates of medical facilities and services, medical expenses and
other increases in associated hospital and pharmaceutical costs, as well as COVID-19 related testing, treatment, and the
administration of vaccines and other therapeutics. We continue to offer our members expanded benefit coverage, such as
providing coverage for COVID-19 testing (including over-the-counter testing in accordance with state and federal
requirements) and vaccine administration, and governmental action has required, and may continue to require, us to provide
additional coverage. In addition, we may experience an increase in medical care costs as people seek care that was deferred
during the pandemic, or during periods of increased infection, and individuals with chronic conditions may require additional
care resulting from missed treatments.
•Decreased predictability of Medicare and Medicaid rates due to changes in utilization of medical facilities and services, medical
expenses and other costs as a result of the impact of COVID-19. We experienced rate adjustments from certain state Medicaid
regulators in 2021 in response to decreased utilization of medical facilities and services, and we may experience further
adjustments in the future with regard to current and prior year rates.
•Increased estimation uncertainty on our claims liability due to the impact of COVID-19 on healthcare utilization and medical
claims submission.
•A reduction in enrollment in our health benefits, products and services or a continued change in membership mix to less
profitable lines of business as a result of reductions in workforce by existing customers and other impacts of an economic
downturn.
•Cash flow volatility or shortfalls caused by an increase in delayed, delinquent or non-collectable payments from customers and
government payers.
•Reductions in our operating effectiveness as our employees continue to work from home or otherwise are impacted by COVID-
19. The majority of our workforce continues to work remotely, which may exacerbate certain risks to our business, including
increased risk of cybersecurity attacks, phishing and unauthorized dissemination of sensitive, proprietary or confidential
information.
-23-
•Disruptions in our normal business operations due to disruptions in public and private infrastructure, including
communications, financial services and supply chains.
•Loss of functionality due to the disruption of services provided to us by third-party vendors, including due to financial, staffing
or supply chain difficulties.
•Disruption and volatility in the financial markets, which may cause a decrease in the value of our investments, increased cost of
capital or a downgrade in our credit ratings.
If we fail to appropriately predict, price for and manage healthcare costs, the profitability of our products and services could
decline, which could materially adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Our profitability depends in large part on accurately predicting and pricing healthcare costs and on our ability to manage future
healthcare costs through medical management, product design, negotiation of favorable provider contracts and underwriting criteria.
Total healthcare costs are affected by the number of individual services rendered, the cost of each service and the type of service
rendered. Numerous factors affecting the cost of healthcare may adversely affect our ability to predict and manage healthcare costs, as
well as our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations. These factors include, among others, changes in
healthcare practices, demographic characteristics including the aging population, medical cost inflation, the introduction of new
technologies, drugs and treatments, increased cost of individual services, increases in the cost and number of prescription drugs,
clusters of high cost cases, increased use of services, including due to natural catastrophes or other large-scale medical emergencies,
epidemics or pandemics such as COVID-19, new treatment guidelines, new mandated benefits (such as the expansion of essential
benefits coverage) and changes to other regulations impacting our business.
Relatively small differences between predicted and actual medical costs or utilization rates as a percentage of premium revenues
can result in significant changes in our results of operations. Generally, our premiums on Commercial policies and Medicaid contracts
are fixed for a 12-month period and may be determined based on data from several months prior to the commencement of the
premium period. Our revenue on Medicare policies is based on bids submitted to CMS six months prior to the start of the contract
year. Accordingly, the costs we incur in excess of our benefit cost projections generally are not recovered in the contract year through
higher premiums. Existing Medicaid contract rates are often established by the applicable state, and our actual costs may exceed those
rates. Although we base our Commercial premiums, our Medicare and Medicaid bids, and our acceptance of state-established
Medicaid rates on our estimates of future medical costs over the fixed contract period, many factors, including those discussed above,
may cause actual costs to exceed those estimated and reflected in premiums and bids.
Although federal and state premium and risk adjustment mechanisms could help offset health benefit costs in excess of our
projections if our assumptions utilized in setting our premium rates are significantly different than actual results, our results of
operations and financial condition could still be adversely affected. The reserves that we establish for health insurance policy benefits
and other contractual rights and benefits are based upon assumptions concerning a number of factors, including trends in healthcare
costs, expenses, general economic conditions and other factors. To the extent the actual claims experience is unfavorable as compared
to our underlying assumptions, our incurred losses would increase and future earnings could be adversely affected.
In addition to the challenge of managing healthcare costs, we face pressure to contain premium rates. Our customers may
renegotiate their contracts to seek to contain their costs or may move to a competitor to obtain more favorable premiums. Further,
federal and state regulatory agencies may restrict or prevent entirely our ability to implement changes in premium rates. A limitation
on our ability to increase or maintain our premium or reimbursement levels or a significant loss of membership resulting from our
need to increase or maintain premium or reimbursement levels could adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and
results of operations.
In addition, based on our experience in Public Exchange markets to date, we have made adjustments to our premium rates and
geographic participation (including our modest expansion in the Public Exchange markets in 2022), and we will continue to evaluate
the performance of our Public Exchange plans, the future viability of the Public Exchanges and availability of federal subsidies, and
may make further adjustments to our rates and participation going forward. These factors may have a material adverse effect on our
results of operations if premiums are not adequate or do not appropriately reflect the acuity of these individuals. Any variation from
our expectations regarding acuity, enrollment levels, adverse selection, or
-24-
other assumptions utilized in setting premium rates could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations, financial position,
and cash flows.
A significant reduction in the enrollment in our health benefits programs or PBM products or services, particularly in states where
we have large regional concentrations, could have an adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of
operations.
A significant reduction in the number of enrollees in our health benefits programs or PBM products or services could adversely
affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations. Factors that could contribute to a reduction in enrollment
include: reductions in workforce by existing customers; a general economic upturn that results in fewer individuals being eligible for
Medicaid programs; the end of the temporary suspension of eligibility recertification for Medicaid recipients in response to the
COVID-19 pandemic, which will likely result in a reduction in our Medicaid membership; a general economic downturn that results in
business failures and high unemployment rates; employers no longer offering certain healthcare coverage as an employee benefit or
electing to offer coverage on a voluntary, employee-funded basis; participation on Public Exchanges; federal and state regulatory
changes; failure to obtain new customers or retain existing customers; premium increases and benefit changes; our exit from a specific
market; negative publicity and news coverage; and failure to attain or maintain nationally recognized accreditations.
The states in which we operate that have the largest concentrations of revenues include California, Florida, Georgia, Indiana, New
York, Ohio, Texas and Virginia. Due to this concentration of business in these states, we are exposed to potential losses resulting from
the risk of state-specific or regional economic downturns impacting these states. If any such negative economic conditions do not
improve, we may experience a reduction in existing and new business, which could have a material adverse effect on our business,
cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
A cyber-attack or other privacy or data security incident could result in an unauthorized disclosure of sensitive or confidential
information, cause a loss of data, disrupt our operations, give rise to remediation or other expenses, expose us to liability under
federal and state laws, and subject us to litigation and investigations, which could have an adverse effect on our business, cash
flows, financial condition and results of operations.
As part of our normal operations, we collect, process, retain and transmit large amounts of sensitive and confidential information,
including, among other information, corporate strategy, customer and employee information. Some of the data we process, store and
transmit is outside of the U.S. We are subject to a variety of continuously evolving federal, state and international laws and rules
regarding the use and disclosure of certain sensitive or confidential information, including HIPAA, the HITECH Act, the Gramm-
Leach-Bliley Act and numerous state laws governing personal information. Our facilities and systems, and those of our third-party
service providers, are regularly the target of, and may be vulnerable to, cyber-attacks, security breaches, acts of vandalism, computer
viruses, misplaced or lost data, programming and/or human errors, negligent or wrongful conduct by employees or others with
permitted access to our systems and information or other threats.
We have been, and may in the future be, subject to litigation and governmental investigations related to cyber-attacks and security
breaches, which could divert the attention of management from the operation of our business, result in reputational damage and have a
material adverse impact on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations. While we have contingency plans
and insurance coverage for potential liabilities of this nature, they may not be sufficient to cover all claims and liabilities.
We cannot ensure that we will be able to identify, prevent or contain the effects of cyber-attacks or other cybersecurity risks that
bypass our security measures or disrupt our information technology systems or business. We have security technologies, processes and
procedures in place to protect against cybersecurity risks and security breaches. However, hardware, software or applications we
develop or procure from third parties may contain defects in design, manufacturer defects or other problems that could unexpectedly
compromise information security. In addition, because the techniques used to obtain unauthorized access, disable, disrupt or degrade
service or sabotage systems change frequently, are becoming increasingly sophisticated, and may not immediately produce signs of
intrusion, we may be unable to anticipate these techniques, timely discover or counter them or implement adequate preventative
measures. Viruses, worms or other malicious software programs may be used to attack our systems or otherwise exploit any security
vulnerabilities, and such security attacks may cause system disruptions or shutdowns, or may cause personal information or
proprietary or confidential
-25-
information to be disclosed, misappropriated or compromised. This risk is heightened due to the increased number of our employees
working from home. As a result, cybersecurity and the continued development and enhancement of our controls, processes and
practices designed to protect our systems, computers, software, data and networks from attack, damage and unauthorized access
remain a priority for us.
Noncompliance with any privacy or security laws and regulations, or any security breach, cyber-attack or cybersecurity breach,
and any incident involving the misappropriation, theft, loss or other unauthorized disclosure or use of, or access to, sensitive or
confidential information, whether by us or by one of our third-party service providers, could require us to expend significant resources
to continue to modify or enhance our protective measures and to remediate any damage. In addition, this could negatively affect our
operations, cause system disruptions, damage our reputation, cause membership losses and contract breaches, and could also result in
regulatory enforcement actions, material fines and penalties, litigation or other actions that could have a material adverse effect on our
business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
There are various risks associated with participating in Medicare and Medicaid programs, including dependence upon government
funding and the timing of payments, compliance with government contracts and increased regulatory oversight.
We contract with various federal and state agencies, including CMS, to provide managed healthcare services, such as Medicare
Advantage, Medicare Part D, Medicare Supplement, Medicaid, TANF, SPD, LTSS, CHIP, Medicaid expansion programs and various
specialty programs, products and services. We also provide various administrative services for other entities offering medical and/or
prescription drug plans to their Medicaid or Medicare eligible members through our affiliated companies, and we offer employer
group waiver plans which provide medical and/or prescription drug coverage to retirees. We also participate in programs in several
states for the care of dual-eligible members. Regulatory reform initiatives or changes in existing laws or regulations applicable to these
programs, or their interpretations, are difficult to predict and could have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial
condition and results of operations.
Revenues from the Medicare and Medicaid programs are dependent, in whole or in part, upon annual funding from the federal
government and/or applicable state governments, and base premium rates paid by each state or federal agency differ depending upon a
combination of factors such as defined upper payment limits, a member’s health status, age, gender, county or region, benefit mix,
member eligibility category and risk scores. Future rates may be affected by continued government efforts to contain costs as well as
federal and state budgetary constraints, and certain state contracts are subject to cancellation in the event of the unavailability of state
funds. Additionally, ongoing CMS system changes related to the data it uses to calculate risk scores in the Medicare Advantage
program may impact our federal funding. If the federal government or any state in which we operate were to decrease rates paid to us,
pay us less than the amount necessary to keep pace with our cost trends, cancel our contracts retroactively or seek an adjustment to
previously negotiated rates, it could have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of
operations. In addition, various states’ MMPs are still subject to uncertainty surrounding payment rates and other requirements, which
could affect where we seek to participate in these programs. An unexpected reduction in payments, inadequate government funding or
significantly delayed payments for these programs may adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of
operations.
Other potential risks associated with Medicare Advantage and Medicare Part D plans include increased medical or pharmaceutical
costs, data corrections identified as a result of ongoing auditing and monitoring activities, potential uncollectability of receivables
resulting from processing and/or verifying enrollment, inadequacy of underwriting assumptions, inability to receive and process
correct information (including inability due to systems issues by the federal government, the applicable state government or us),
uncollectability of premiums from members and limited enrollment periods. Actual results may be materially different than our
assumptions and estimates and could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations.
Finally, there is the possibility that the Medicare Advantage program could be significantly impacted by future legislation.
Our contracts with CMS and state governmental agencies contain certain provisions regarding data submission, risk adjustment,
provider network and directory maintenance, quality measures, claims payment, timely and accurate processing of appeals and
grievances, oversight of service providers, encounter data, continuity of care, call center performance and other requirements specific
to federal and state program regulations. We have been subject in the past, and may again be in the future, to administrative actions,
fines, penalties, liquidated damages or retrospective adjustments in payments made to our health plans as a result of a failure to
comply with those requirements, which has impacted and in the future could impact
-26-
our profitability. Due to decreased utilization of medical facilities and services as a result of the COVID-19 pandemic, we experienced
retroactive rate adjustments by certain state Medicaid agencies, and rate adjustments may continue in the future. As members have
accessed care during the COVID-19 pandemic, we have experienced increased difficulty obtaining provider information required by
CMS and state governmental agencies and, as a result, may have difficulty meeting these quality measures. In addition, we could be
required to file a corrective plan of action with additional penalties for noncompliance, which could have a negative impact on future
membership enrollment levels. Further, our existing CMS or state Medicaid contracts have not always been renewed, we have not
always been awarded new contracts as a result of the competitive procurement process, and in some cases we have lost members
under existing contracts as a result of a post-award challenge by unsuccessful bidders, each of which could take place again in the
future and have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Further, the Star Rating System utilized by CMS to evaluate Medicare Advantage Plans may have a significant effect on our
revenue, as higher-rated plans tend to experience increased enrollment and plans with a Star rating of 4.0 or higher are eligible for
quality-based bonus payments and can market to and enroll members year-round. If we do not maintain or continue to improve our
Star ratings, fail to meet or exceed our competitors’ Star ratings, or if quality-based bonus payments are reduced or eliminated, we may
experience a negative impact on our revenues and the benefits that our plans can offer, which could materially and adversely affect the
marketability of our plans, our membership levels, results of operations, financial condition and cash flows. Similarly, if we fail to
meet or exceed any performance standards imposed by state Medicaid programs in which we participate, we may not receive
performance-based bonus payments or may incur penalties.
In addition, our failure to comply with federal and state healthcare laws and regulations applicable to our participation in
Medicaid and Medicare programs, including those directed at preventing fraud, abuse and discrimination, could result in
investigations, litigation, fines, restrictions on, or exclusions from, program participation, or the imposition of corporate integrity
agreements or other agreements with a federal or state governmental agency, any of which could adversely impact our business, cash
flows, financial condition and results of operations.
We are periodically subject to government audits, including CMS Risk Adjustment Data Validation (“RADV”) audits of our
Medicare Advantage Plans to validate diagnostic data, patient claims and financial reporting, and audits of our Medicare Part D plans
by the Medicare Part D Recovery Audit Contractor (“RAC”), as well as state Medicaid RAC programs. These audits could result in
significant adjustments in payments made to our health plans, which could adversely affect our financial condition and results of
operations. If we fail to report and correct errors discovered through our own auditing procedures or during a RADV or RAC audit, or
otherwise fail to comply with applicable laws and regulations, we could be subject to fines, civil penalties or other sanctions, which
could have a material adverse effect on our ability to participate in these programs, and on our financial condition, cash flows and
results of operations.
Our Medicare and Medicaid contracts are also subject to various MLR rules, including minimum MLR thresholds, rebate
requirements and audits, which could adversely affect our membership and revenues if any of our state Medicare or Medicaid plans do
not meet an applicable minimum MLR threshold. If a Medicare Advantage, MMP or Medicare Part D contract pays minimum MLR
rebates for three consecutive years, it will become ineligible to participate in open enrollment. If a Medicare Advantage or Medicare
Part D contract pays such rebates for five consecutive years, it will be terminated by CMS.
A change in our healthcare product mix may impact our profitability.
Our healthcare products that involve greater potential risk generally tend to be more profitable than administrative services
products and those healthcare products where the employer groups assume the underwriting risks. Individuals and small employer
groups are more likely to purchase our higher-risk healthcare products because such purchasers are generally unable or unwilling to
bear greater liability for healthcare expenditures. Typically, government-sponsored programs also involve our higher-risk healthcare
products. A shift of enrollees from more profitable products to less profitable products could have a material adverse effect on our cash
flows, financial condition and results of operations.
If we fail to develop and maintain satisfactory relationships with hospitals, physicians, PBM service providers and other healthcare
providers, our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations may be adversely affected.
Our profitability is dependent in part upon our ability to contract on favorable terms with hospitals, physicians, PBM service
providers and supply chain partners and other healthcare providers. Healthcare providers may elect not to contract with us, and the
failure to secure or maintain cost-effective healthcare provider contracts on competitive terms may result in a
-27-
loss of membership or higher medical costs, which could adversely affect our business. In addition, consolidation among healthcare
providers, ACO practice management companies, and other organizational structures that physicians, hospitals and other care
providers choose, as well as the ability of larger employers to contract directly with providers, may change the way that these
providers interact with us and change the competitive landscape. Such organizations or groups of physicians may compete directly
with us, which may impact our relationship with these providers or affect the way that we price our products and services and estimate
our costs and may require us to incur costs to change our operations, which could adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial
condition and results of operations. In addition, price transparency initiatives, such as the Health Plan Transparency Rule, may impact
our ability to obtain or maintain favorable contract terms.
Our inability to contract with providers, or if providers attempt to use their market position to negotiate more favorable contracts
or place us at a competitive disadvantage, or the inability of providers to provide adequate care, could adversely affect our business. In
addition, we do not have contracts with all providers that render services to our members and, as a result, may not have a pre-
established agreement about the amount of compensation those out-of-network providers will accept for the services they render,
which can result in significant litigation or arbitration proceedings, or provider attempts to obtain payment from our members for the
difference between the amount we have paid and the amount they have charged.
We are dependent on the success of our relationships with third parties for various services and functions.
We contract with various third parties to perform certain functions and services and provide us with certain information
technology systems. Certain of these third parties provide us with significant portions of our business infrastructure and operating
requirements. For example, a couple of vendors provide us with a wide range of technology infrastructure services, including end user
(help desk and field support), data center, mainframe, storage and database services, certain cloud infrastructure and multi-cloud
management services, and we are subject to the risks of any operational failure, termination or other restraints in these arrangements.
We could become overly dependent on key vendors, which could cause us to lose core competencies. A termination of our agreements
with, or disruption in the performance of, one or more of these service providers could result in service disruptions or unavailability,
reduced service quality and effectiveness, increased or duplicative costs or an inability to meet our obligations to our customers. In
addition, we may also have to seek alternative service providers, which may be unavailable or only available on less favorable contract
terms. Any of these outcomes could adversely affect our business, reputation, cash flows, financial condition and operating results.
Our PBM services business in particular would be adversely affected if we are unable to contract on favorable terms with third-
party vendors, including pharmaceutical manufacturers. We delegate certain PBM administrative functions, such as claims processing
and prescription fulfillment, to CVS Health pursuant to the CVS PBM Agreement. If CVS Health fails to provide PBM services as
contractually required, we may not be able to meet the full demands of our customers, which could have a material adverse effect on
our business, reputation and results of operations. For additional information on the CVS PBM Agreement, see “Business — Product
and Service Descriptions,” in Part I, Item 1 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
The failure to effectively maintain and upgrade our information systems, or the availability and integrity of our data, could
adversely affect our business.
Our business depends significantly on effective information systems, and we have many different information systems for our
various businesses, including those that we have acquired as a result of our merger and acquisition activities. Our information systems
require an ongoing commitment of significant resources to maintain and enhance existing systems and develop new systems in order
to keep pace with continuing changes in information processing technology, emerging cybersecurity risks and threats, changing
customer preferences, evolving industry and regulatory standards and legal requirements, including as a result of the ACA, the Health
Plan Transparency Rule, the Appropriations Act and proposed federal data interoperability regulations. In addition, we may from time
to time obtain significant portions of our systems-related or other services or facilities from independent third parties, which may
make our operations vulnerable if such third parties fail to perform adequately.
Failure to adequately implement and maintain effective and efficient information systems with sufficiently advanced
technological capabilities, or failure to efficiently and effectively consolidate our information systems to eliminate redundant or
obsolete applications, could result in investigations, audits, fines and penalties, competitive and cost disadvantages to us compared to
our competitors and a diversion of management’s time and could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition
and results of operations. The volume of health care data generated and the uses of this data, including
-28-
electronic health records, are rapidly expanding. Our ability to develop, implement, price and support new and existing products and
services depends on the integrity of this data. If the information we rely upon to run our business were found to be inaccurate or
unreliable or if we fail to adequately maintain our information systems and data integrity effectively, we could experience problems in
determining medical cost estimates and establishing appropriate pricing and reserves, have disputes with customers and providers,
face regulatory problems, including sanctions and penalties, incur increases in operating expenses or suffer other adverse
consequences, including a decrease in membership.
Large-scale medical emergencies, natural disasters, war, terrorism, political events, civil unrest and global climate change may
have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Natural disasters, war, terrorism, political events, civil unrest, global climate change and other similar occurrences could create
large-scale medical emergencies or otherwise have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and
results of operations. Large-scale medical emergencies can take many forms and can cause widespread illness and death and have
other far-reaching impact. For example, the ongoing COVID-19 global pandemic has caused illness, deaths, quarantines, business and
school shutdowns, reductions in business activity, travel and financial transactions, unemployment, inflation, labor shortages, supply
chain interruptions and overall economic and financial market instability. In addition, federal and state law enforcement officials have
issued warnings about potential terrorist activity involving biological and other weapons, and natural disasters such as hurricanes and
the potential for a widespread pandemic of influenza or other illness coupled with the lack of availability of appropriate preventative
medicines could have a significant impact on the health of the population of widespread areas. If the United States were to experience
widespread bioterrorism or other attacks, large-scale natural disasters or civil unrest in our concentrated coverage areas or an epidemic
or pandemic such as the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic, our covered medical expenses could rise, our operations could be interrupted
and we could experience a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations or, in the
event of extreme circumstances, our viability could be threatened. Furthermore, global climate change could result in certain types of
natural disasters occurring more frequently or with more intense effects, and may have a long-term effect on general economic
conditions and the healthcare or pharmacy industry in particular, which could adversely affect our business and financial results. For
additional information, see the risk factor above describing the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic on our business, cash flows,
financial condition and results of operations.
LEGAL, REGULATORY AND PUBLIC POLICY RISKS
We are subject to significant government regulation, and changes or proposed changes in the regulation of our business by federal
and state regulators may adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations and the market
price of our securities.
We are subject to significant state and federal regulation associated with many aspects of our business, including, but not limited
to, licensing, premiums, marketing activities, provider contracting, access and payment standards, and corporate governance and
financial reporting matters, as described in greater detail in Part I, Item 1 “Business—Regulation” in this Annual Report on Form 10-
K. Further, the integration into our business of entities that we acquire, or the expansion of our business into new businesses or
jurisdictions, may affect the way in which existing laws and rules apply to us, including by subjecting us to laws and rules that did not
previously apply to us.
New or changed laws, rules, regulations or judicial interpretation, application or enforcement thereof could force us to change
how we conduct our business, affect the products and services we offer (and where we offer them), restrict revenue and enrollment
growth, increase our costs, including operating, healthcare technology and administrative costs, restrict our ability to obtain new
product approvals and implement changes in premium rates and require enhancements to our compliance infrastructure and internal
controls environment, which could adversely impact our business and results of operations. In addition, legislative and/or regulatory
policies or proposals that seek to manage the healthcare industry or otherwise impact our business may cause the market price of our
securities to decrease, even if such policies or proposals never become effective. In particular, further regulations and modifications to
the ACA could impact the market for our products, federal government funding for various ACA programs, the regulations applicable
to us and the fees and taxes payable by us and otherwise affect our business and future operations, some of which may adversely affect
our financial condition and results of operations.
-29-
We are required to obtain and maintain insurance and other regulatory approvals to market certain of our products and services, to
increase prices for certain regulated products and services and to consummate some of our acquisitions and dispositions. Delays in
obtaining or failure to obtain or maintain these approvals, as well as future regulatory action by state or federal authorities, could have
a material adverse effect on the profitability or marketability of our health benefits or managed care products or on our business,
financial condition and results of operations. For example, requirements in the Health Plan Transparency Rule and the Appropriations
Act including the price comparison tool and other requirements have the potential to increase healthcare costs and our operating costs
in order to comply, and also may impact provider negotiations and market pricing. In addition, changes in government regulations or
policies that apply to government-sponsored programs such as Medicare and Medicaid including, among other things, reimbursement
levels, eligibility and recertification requirements, benefit coverage requirements and additional governmental participation, could also
adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations. The annual recertification process for Medicaid
recipients has been temporarily suspended in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, and the end of this suspension will likely result in
a reduction in our Medicaid membership. In addition, where states allow certain programs to expire or have not opted for Medicaid
expansion under the ACA, we could experience reduced Medicaid enrollment and reduced growth opportunities. If future
modifications to laws and regulations significantly reduce Medicaid enrollment, our Medicaid business will be negatively impacted.
We have experienced assessments in the past under state or federal insolvency or guaranty association laws applicable to
insurance companies, HMOs and other payers, and may experience assessments in the future if, for example, premiums established by
other companies for their health insurance products, including certain long-term care products, are inadequate to cover their costs. Any
such assessment could expose us to the risk of paying a portion of an impaired or insolvent insurance company’s claims through state
guaranty associations. We are not currently able to estimate our potential financial obligations, losses, or the availability of offsets
associated with potential guaranty association assessments; however, any significant increase in guaranty association assessments
could have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
We expect state legislatures will continue to focus on healthcare delivery and financing issues, including actions to reduce or limit
increases to premium payments, provider billing protections, greater access to care and broader reforms of health insurance markets.
State ballot initiatives can also be put to voters that could materially impair our operating environment and have a material adverse
impact on our business, cash flows, operations or financial condition.
Additionally, Congress has considered, and may consider in the future, various forms of managed care reform legislation which, if
adopted, could fundamentally alter the treatment of coverage decisions under ERISA and other laws and could increase our costs,
expose us to expanded liability or require us to revise the ways in which we conduct business. There have been legislative attempts to
limit ERISA’s preemptive effect on state laws and litigants’ ability to seek damages beyond the benefits offered under their plans. If
adopted, such limitations could increase our liability exposure, permit greater state regulation of our operations, and expand the scope
of damages, including punitive damages, litigants could be awarded.
We are subject to various risks associated with our international operations.
As we expand and operate our business outside of the U.S., we are presented with different challenges, including challenges in
adapting to new markets, languages, business, labor and cultural practices and regulatory environments. Adapting to these challenges
could require us to devote significant senior management attention and other resources. If we are unable to successfully manage our
international operations, our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations could be adversely affected. In the
future, we may acquire or operate new businesses outside of the U.S., increasing our exposure to these risks.
Our subsidiaries that operate internationally are also subject to regulation in the jurisdictions where they are organized or conduct
business, including regulations related to, among other things, local and cross-border taxation, intellectual property, investment,
management control, labor, anti-fraud, anti-corruption and privacy and data protection, which vary by jurisdiction. In addition, we are
subject to U.S. laws that regulate the conduct and activities of U.S.-based businesses operating abroad, such as the Foreign Corrupt
Practices Act. Violations of these laws and regulations could result in fines, criminal sanctions against us, our officers or employees,
restrictions or outright prohibitions on the conduct of our business and significant reputational harm.
-30-
We face risks related to litigation.
We are, and may in the future be, a party to a variety of legal actions that may affect our business, such as administrative charges
before government agencies, employment and employment discrimination-related suits, employee benefit claims, breach of contract
actions, tort claims and intellectual property-related litigation. In addition, because of the nature of our business, we are subject to a
variety of legal actions relating to our business operations, including the design, administration and offering of our products and
services. These could include claims relating to the denial or limitation of health benefits; federal and state false claims act laws;
dispensing of drugs associated with our PBM business; professional liability claims arising out of the delivery of healthcare and
related services to the public; development or application of medical policies and coverage and clinical guidelines; medical
malpractice actions; product liability claims; allegations of anti-competitive and unfair business activities; provider disputes over
reimbursement and contracts; provider tiering programs; narrow networks; termination of provider contracts; the recovery of
overpayments from providers; fee-based business; disputes over co-payment calculations; reimbursement of out-of-network claims;
the failure to disclose certain business practices; the failure to comply with various state or federal laws, including but not limited to,
ERISA and the Mental Health Parity Act; and customer audits and contract performance, including government contracts. These
actions or proceedings could result in substantial costs to us, require management to spend substantial time focused on litigation, result
in negative media attention and may adversely affect our business, reputation, financial condition, results of operations and cash flows.
We are also involved in, or may in the future be party to, pending or threatened litigation incidental to the business we transact or
arising out of our operations, including, but not limited to, breaches of security and violations of privacy requirements, shareholder
actions, compliance with federal and state laws and regulations (including qui tam or “whistleblower” actions), or sales and
acquisitions of businesses or assets. From time to time, we are involved as a party in various governmental investigations, audits,
reviews and administrative proceedings, including challenges relating to the award of government contracts. These investigations,
audits and reviews include routine and special investigations by various state insurance departments, federal regulators including CMS
and the HHS Office of Inspector General, state attorneys general, the Department of Justice and various offices of the U.S. Attorney
General. Following an investigation, we may be subject to civil or criminal fines, penalties and other sanctions if we are determined to
be in violation of applicable laws or regulations. Liabilities that may result from these actions could have a material adverse effect on
our cash flows, results of operations and financial condition.
Recent court decisions and legislative activity may increase our exposure for any of these types of claims. In some cases,
substantial non-economic (including injunctive relief), treble or punitive damages may be sought. In addition, we operate in
international jurisdictions where contractual rights, tax positions and applicable regulations may be subject to interpretation or
uncertainty to a greater degree than in the U.S., and therefore subject to dispute by government authorities or others. Although we
maintain insurance coverage for some of these potential liabilities, some liabilities and damages may not be covered by insurance,
insurers may dispute coverage or the amount of insurance may not be enough to cover the damages awarded. In addition, insurance
coverage for all or certain forms of liability may become unavailable or prohibitively expensive in the future. Any adverse judgment
against us resulting in such damage awards could result in negative publicity and have an adverse effect on our cash flows, results of
operations and financial condition.
There are various risks associated with providing healthcare services.
The direct provision of healthcare services by certain of our subsidiaries involves risks of additional litigation brought against us
or our associates for alleged malpractice or professional liability claims arising out of treatment decisions or the delivery of healthcare
and related services. In addition, liability may arise from maintaining healthcare premises that serve the public. The defense of any
actions may result in significant expenses, and if we fail to maintain adequate insurance coverage for these liabilities, or if such
insurance is not available, the resulting costs could adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of
operations.
Additionally, many states in which certain of our subsidiaries operate limit the practice of medicine to licensed individuals or
professional organizations comprised of licensed individuals. Business corporations generally may not exercise control over the
medical decisions of physicians, and we are not licensed to practice medicine. Rules and regulations relating to the practice of
medicine, fee-splitting between physicians and referral sources, and similar issues vary from state to state. Further, certain federal and
state laws, including those covering our Medicare and Medicaid plans, prohibit the offer, payment, solicitation or receipt of any form
of remuneration to induce, or in return for, the referral of patient care
-31-
opportunities and also generally prohibit physicians from making referrals to any entity providing certain designated health services if
the referring physician or related person has an ownership or financial interest in the entity. Any enforcement actions by governmental
officials alleging non-compliance with these rules and regulations could adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition
and results of operations.
Our PBM services business and related operations are subject to risks and uncertainties that are in addition to those we face in our
core healthcare business.
We provide PBM services through our IngenioRx business, and we are responsible to regulators and our customers for the
delivery of those PBM services that we contract to provide. Our PBM services business is subject to the risks inherent in the
dispensing, packaging, fulfillment and distribution of pharmaceuticals and other healthcare products, including exposure to liabilities
and reputational harm related to purported dispensing and other operational errors by us or our PBM services suppliers. Any failure by
us or one of our PBM services suppliers to adhere to the laws and regulations applicable to the dispensing of pharmaceuticals could
subject our PBM business to civil and criminal penalties.
Our PBM services business is subject to federal and state laws and regulations that govern its relationships with pharmaceutical
manufacturers, physicians, pharmacies and customers, including without limitation, federal and state anti-kickback laws, beneficiary
inducement laws, consumer protection laws, ERISA, HIPAA and laws related to the operation of internet and mail-service pharmacies,
as well as an increasing number of licensure, registration and other laws and accreditation standards that impact the business practices
of a PBM services business. In addition, the practice of pharmacy is subject to federal and state laws and regulations, including those
of state boards of pharmacy, individual state-controlled substance authorities, the U.S. Drug Enforcement Agency and the U.S. Food
and Drug Administration. Also, we and our third-party vendors are subject to registration requirements and state and federal laws
concerning labeling, packaging, advertising, handling and adulteration of prescription drugs and dispensing of controlled substances.
Noncompliance with applicable laws and regulations by us or our third-party vendors could have material adverse effects on our
business, results of operations, financial condition, liquidity and reputation.
Federal and state legislatures and regulators also regularly consider new laws and regulations and changes to existing policies for
the industry that could materially affect current industry practices and our business, including the Rebate Rule released in November
2020 by HHS related to drug manufacturer rebates, spread pricing contract arrangements and the pricing of pharmaceuticals, and the
Appropriations Act. Other potential new regulations include those regarding rebates, fees from pharmaceutical companies, the
development and use of formularies and other utilization management tools, the use of average wholesale prices or other pricing
benchmarks, pricing for specialty pharmaceuticals, limited access to networks, pharmacy network reimbursement methodologies and
PBM reporting requirements, along with state regulations that may result from the June 2021 NAIC proposed white paper addressing
PBMs.
We are a party to license agreements with the BCBSA that entitle us to the exclusive and, in certain areas, non-exclusive use of the
BCBS names and marks in our geographic territories. The termination of these license agreements or changes in the terms and
conditions of these license agreements could adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of
operations.
Our license agreements with the BCBSA contain certain requirements and restrictions regarding our operations and our use of the
BCBS names and marks, and failure to comply with those requirements could result in a termination of the license agreements. The
license agreements may be modified by the BCBSA, which could have a material adverse effect on our future expansion plans or
results of operations. Further, BCBS licensees have certain requirements to perform administrative services for members of other
BCBS licensees. As of December 31, 2021, we provided services to approximately 32 million Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield
enrollees. If we or another BCBS licensee are not in compliance with all legal requirements or are unable to perform administrative
services as required, this could have an adverse effect on our members and our ability to maintain our licenses, which could have a
material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Upon the occurrence of an event causing termination of the license agreements, we would no longer have the right to use the
BCBS names and marks or to sell BCBS health insurance products and services in one or more of our service areas. Furthermore, the
BCBSA would be free to issue a license to use the BCBS names and marks in these service areas to another entity. Our existing BCBS
members would be provided with instructions for obtaining alternative products and services
-32-
licensed by the BCBSA. We believe that the BCBS names and marks are valuable identifiers of our products and services in the
marketplace.
Upon termination of either license agreement, the BCBSA would have the right to impose a “Re-establishment Fee” upon us,
which would be used in part to fund the establishment of a replacement Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield licensee in the vacated service
area. The fee is set at $98.33 per licensed enrollee. If the Re-establishment Fee was applied to our total Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield
enrollees of approximately 32 million as of December 31, 2021, we would be assessed approximately $3 billion by the BCBSA. As a
result, termination of the license agreements would have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and
results of operations. For more information on the BCBSA license agreements, including requirements, restrictions and termination
events set forth in these license agreements, see Part I, Item 1, “Business — BCBSA Licenses” of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Indiana law, other applicable laws, our articles of incorporation and bylaws, and provisions of our BCBSA license agreements may
prevent or discourage takeovers and business combinations that our shareholders might consider to be in their best interest.
Indiana law, other applicable laws and regulations and provisions in our articles of incorporation and bylaws may delay, defer,
prevent or render more difficult a takeover attempt that our shareholders might consider to be in their best interests. For instance, they
may prevent our shareholders from receiving the benefit from any premium to the market price of our common stock offered by a
bidder in a takeover context or adversely affect the price that some investors are willing to pay for our stock.
The insurance holding company systems acts and certain health statutes of the states in which our insurance company or HMO
subsidiaries are regulated restrict the ability of any person to obtain control of an insurance company or HMO without prior regulatory
approval. Further, the Indiana Business Corporation Law contains business combination provisions that, in general, prohibit for five
years any business combination with a beneficial owner of 10% or more of our common stock unless the holder’s acquisition of the
stock was approved in advance by our Board of Directors.
Our articles of incorporation and bylaws contain provisions that could have anti-takeover effects and may delay, defer or prevent a
takeover attempt that our shareholders might consider to be in their best interests. Our articles of incorporation provide that no person
may beneficially own shares of voting capital stock in excess of specified ownership limits, except with the prior approval of a
majority of the “continuing directors.” The ownership limits, which may not be exceeded without the prior approval of the BCBSA,
are the following: (1) for any institutional investor (as defined in our articles of incorporation), one share less than 10% of our
outstanding voting securities; (2) for any non-institutional investor (as defined in our articles of incorporation), one share less than 5%
of our outstanding voting securities; and (3) for any person, one share less than the number of shares of our common stock or other
equity securities (or a combination thereof) representing a 20% ownership interest in us.
In addition, our articles of incorporation and bylaws: divide our Board of Directors into three classes serving staggered three-year
terms (which is required by our license agreement with the BCBSA); permit our Board of Directors to determine the terms of and
issue one or more series of preferred stock without further action by shareholders; restrict the maximum number of directors and the
ability to increase that number; limit the ability of shareholders to remove directors; impose restrictions on shareholders’ ability to fill
vacancies on our Board of Directors; impose advance notice requirements for shareholder proposals and nominations of directors to be
considered at meetings of shareholders; prohibit shareholders from amending certain provisions of our bylaws; and impose restrictions
on who may call a special meeting of shareholders.
The health benefits industry is subject to negative publicity, which could adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial
condition and results of operations.
The health benefits industry is subject to negative publicity, which can arise from, among other things, increases in premium rates,
industry consolidation, cost of care initiatives and debate around existing or proposed legislation. Negative publicity may result in
increased regulation and legislative review of industry practices, which may further increase our costs of doing business and adversely
affect our profitability by limiting our ability to market or provide our products and services, requiring us to change our products and
services, or increasing the regulatory oversight under which we operate. In addition, any negative publicity concerning the BCBSA or
other BCBSA licensees may adversely affect us and the sale of our health benefits products and services. Negative public perception
or publicity of the health benefits industry in general, the BCBSA,
-33-
other BCBSA licensees, or us or our key vendors could adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of
operations.
STRATEGIC RISKS
We face competition in many of our markets, and if we fail to adequately adapt to changes in our industry and develop and
implement strategic growth opportunities, our ability to compete and grow may be adversely affected.
As a health benefits company, we operate in a highly competitive environment and in an industry that is subject to significant
changes from and competition due to legislative reform, business consolidations, new strategic alliances, new market entrants,
aggressive marketing practices, technological advancements and changing market practices such as increasing usage of telehealth. We
also will have to respond to pricing and other actions taken by existing competitors and potentially disruptive new entrants in the
public exchanges and in our other lines of business. These factors have produced and will likely continue to produce significant
pressures on our profitability and membership. Furthermore, decisions to buy our products and services are increasingly made or
influenced by consumers through means such as direct purchasing (for example, Medicare Advantage plans) and insurance exchanges
that allow individual choice, or by large employers that may increasingly have the ability to contract directly with providers. This
creates unique market pressures, and in order to compete effectively in the consumer-driven marketplace, we will be required to
develop and deliver innovative and potentially disruptive products and services to satisfy evolving market demands.
In addition, the PBM industry is highly competitive, and IngenioRx is subject to competition from national, regional and local
PBMs, other insurers, health plans, large retail pharmacy chains, large retail stores, supermarkets, mail order and web pharmacies,
discount cards and specialty pharmacies. Strong competition within the PBM business has generated greater demand for lower product
and service pricing, increased revenue sharing and enhanced product and service offerings. Our inability to maintain positive trends,
contract on favorable terms with pharmaceutical manufacturers for, among other things, rebates, discounts and administrative fees or a
failure to identify and implement new ways to mitigate pricing pressures, could negatively impact our ability to attract or retain
customers, negatively impact our margins and have a material adverse effect on our business and results of operations. In addition,
legislative reforms such as the regulation recently issued by HHS related to rebates, and the Appropriations Act, which requires
reporting of plan spending, the cost of plan pharmacy benefits, enrollee premiums and any manufacturer rebates received by the plan
or issuer, may adversely affect our competitive position, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
In order to profitably grow our business in the future, we need to not only grow our profitable medical membership, but also
continue to diversify our sources of revenue and earnings, including through the increased sale of our specialty products, such as
dental, vision and other supplemental products, expansion of products, expansion of our non-insurance assets and establishment of
new cost of care solutions, including innovations in PBM services. If we are unable to acquire or develop and successfully manage
new opportunities that further our strategic objectives and differentiate our products and services from our competitors, our ability to
profitably grow our business could be adversely affected.
We are currently dependent on the non-exclusive services of independent agents and brokers in the marketing of our healthcare
products, particularly with respect to individuals, seniors and certain group customers. We face intense competition for the services
and allegiance of these independent agents and brokers, who may also market the products of our competitors. Our relationship with
our brokers and independent agents could be adversely impacted by changes in our business practices to address legislative changes,
including potential reductions in commissions and consulting fees paid to agents and brokers. We cannot ensure that we will be able to
compete successfully against current and future competitors for these services or that competitive pressures faced by us will not
materially and adversely affect our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
For additional information, see “Business — Competition,” in Part I, Item 1 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
-34-
We have built a significant portion of our current business through mergers and acquisitions, joint ventures, strategic alliances
and investments, and we expect to pursue such opportunities in the future.
The following are some of the risks associated with mergers, acquisitions, divestitures, joint ventures and strategic alliances and
investments, referred to collectively as business combinations, that could have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows,
financial condition and results of operations:
•some business combinations may not achieve anticipated revenues, earnings or cash flow, business opportunities, synergies,
growth prospects or other anticipated benefits;
•we may assume liabilities that were not disclosed to us or which were underestimated, and which could lead to legal challenges,
investigations and enforcement actions;
•we may experience difficulties in integrating business combinations, including into our internal control environment and
culture, be unable to integrate business combinations successfully or as quickly as expected and be unable to realize anticipated
economic, operational and other benefits in a timely manner or at all;
•business combinations, and proposed business combinations that are not completed, could disrupt our ongoing business, lead to
the incurrence of significant fees, distract management, result in the loss of key employees, divert resources, result in tax costs
or inefficiencies and make it difficult to maintain our current business standards, controls, information technology systems,
policies and procedures;
•we may finance future business combinations by issuing common stock for some or all of the purchase price, which could
dilute the ownership interests of our shareholders;
•we may compete with other firms, some of which may have greater financial and other resources, to acquire attractive
companies;
•we may experience disputes with our partners in our strategic alliances, investments and joint ventures, which could result in
litigation or a loss of business; and
•future business combinations may make it difficult to comply with the requirements of the BCBSA and lead to a risk that our
BCBSA license agreements may be terminated.
We face intense competition to attract and retain employees. Further, managing key executive transition, succession and retention
is critical to our success.
Our success depends on our ability to attract and retain qualified employees and to integrate employees who have joined us
through acquisitions. We face intense competition for qualified employees, and we may be unable to attract and retain such employees
or competition among potential employers may result in increasing salaries. An inability to retain existing employees or attract
additional employees could have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations.
We would be adversely affected if we fail to adequately plan for the succession of our President and Chief Executive Officer and
other key executives. While we have succession plans in place for members of our senior management, and employment arrangements
with certain key executives, these plans and arrangements do not guarantee that the services of our senior executives will continue to
be available to us or that we will be able to attract, transition and retain suitable successors.
FINANCIAL RISKS
As a holding company, we are dependent on dividends from our subsidiaries, which are necessary to pay our outstanding
indebtedness. Our regulated subsidiaries are subject to state regulations, including restrictions on the payment of dividends,
maintenance of minimum levels of capital and restrictions on investment portfolios.
As a holding company, we are dependent on dividends and administrative expense reimbursements from our subsidiaries. Our
regulated subsidiaries are not obligated to make funds available to us, and creditors of our subsidiaries will have a superior claim to
certain of our subsidiaries’ assets. Furthermore, among other restrictions, state insurance and HMO laws may restrict the ability of our
regulated subsidiaries to pay dividends. In some states, we have made special undertakings that may limit the ability of our regulated
subsidiaries to pay dividends. In most states, we are required to seek approval by state regulatory authorities before we transfer money
or pay dividends from our regulated subsidiaries exceeding specified amounts. In addition, our subsidiaries’ ability to make any
payments to us will also depend on their earnings, the terms of their indebtedness, business and tax considerations and other legal
restrictions. Our ability to repurchase shares, pay dividends to our shareholders and meet our obligations, including paying operating
expenses and debt service on our
-35-
outstanding and future indebtedness, will depend upon the receipt of dividends from our subsidiaries. An inability of our subsidiaries
to pay dividends in an amount sufficient for us to meet our financial obligations may materially adversely affect our business, cash
flows, financial condition and results of operations.
Most of our regulated subsidiaries are subject to RBC standards or other forms of minimum capital requirements that require them
to report their results of risk-based capital calculations to the departments of insurance and the NAIC. Failure to maintain these
minimum standards could subject our regulated subsidiaries to corrective action, including state supervision or liquidation. In addition,
as discussed in more detail above, we are a party to license agreements with the BCBSA which contain additional minimum capital
and liquidity requirements. Changes to existing RBC standards or minimum capital requirements could further restrict our or our
regulated subsidiaries’ ability to pay dividends and adversely affect our business.
Our regulated subsidiaries are subject to state laws and regulations that require diversification of their investment portfolios and
limit the amount of investments in certain riskier investment categories, such as below-investment-grade fixed maturity securities,
mortgage loans, real estate and equity investments, which could generate higher returns on their investments. Failure to comply with
these laws and regulations might cause investments exceeding regulatory limitations to be treated as non-admitted assets for purposes
of measuring statutory surplus and risk-based capital, and, in some instances, require the sale of those investments.
We have substantial indebtedness outstanding and may incur additional indebtedness in the future, which could adversely affect
our ability to pursue desirable business opportunities and to react to changes in the economy or our industry and exposes us to
interest rate risk to the extent of our variable rate indebtedness.
Our debt service obligations require us to use a portion of our cash flow to pay interest and principal on debt instead of for other
corporate purposes, including funding future expansion. If our cash flow and capital resources are insufficient to service our debt
obligations, we may be forced to seek extraordinary dividends from our subsidiaries, sell assets, seek additional equity or debt capital
or restructure our debt. However, these measures might be unsuccessful or inadequate to meet scheduled debt service obligations or
may not be available on commercially reasonable terms.
We may also incur future debt obligations that might subject us to restrictive covenants that could affect our financial and
operational flexibility. Our breach or failure to comply with any of these covenants could result in a default under our credit facilities
or other indebtedness. If we default under our credit agreement, the lenders could cease to make further extensions of credit or cause
all of our outstanding debt obligations under our credit agreement to become immediately due and payable, together with accrued and
unpaid interest. If the indebtedness under our notes or our credit agreement or our other indebtedness is accelerated, we may be unable
to repay or finance the amounts due, on commercially reasonable terms, or at all.
A downgrade in our credit ratings could have an adverse effect on our business, cash flows, financial condition and results of
operations.
Claims-paying ability, financial strength and debt ratings by nationally recognized statistical rating organizations are important
factors in establishing the competitive position of insurance and health benefits companies. We believe our strong credit ratings are an
important factor in marketing our products to customers. In addition, if our credit ratings are downgraded or placed under review, our
business, cash flows, financial condition and results of operations could be adversely impacted by limitations on future borrowings
and a potential increase in our borrowing costs. Each of the ratings organizations reviews our ratings periodically, and there can be no
assurance that our current ratings will be maintained in the future.
The value of our intangible assets may become impaired.
As of December 31, 2021, we had $35 billion of goodwill and other intangible assets, representing 36% of our total consolidated
assets. In accordance with applicable accounting standards, we periodically evaluate our goodwill and other intangible assets for
potential impairment, using assumptions and judgments regarding the estimated fair value of our reporting units. Estimated fair values
might be significantly different if other reasonable assumptions and estimates were to be used. If estimated fair values are less than the
carrying values of goodwill and other intangible assets with indefinite lives in future impairment tests, or if significant impairment
indicators are noted relative to other intangible assets subject to amortization, we may be required to record impairment losses against
future income.
-36-
The value we place on intangible assets may be adversely impacted if existing or future business combinations fail to perform in a
manner consistent with our assumptions. In addition, from time to time we divest businesses, and any such divestiture could result in
significant asset impairment and disposition charges, including those related to goodwill and other intangible assets. In addition, the
estimated value of our reporting units may be impacted as a result of business decisions we make associated with any future changes
to laws and regulations, which could unfavorably affect the carrying value of certain goodwill and other intangible assets and result in
impairment charges in future periods. Any future evaluations requiring an impairment of our goodwill and other intangible assets
could materially affect our results of operations and shareholders’ equity which could, in turn, negatively impact our debt ratings or
potentially impact our compliance with existing debt covenants.
The value of our investments is influenced by varying economic and market conditions, and a decrease in value may result in a
loss charged to income.
We maintain a significant investment portfolio of cash equivalents and short-term and long-term investments in a variety of
securities, which are subject to general credit, liquidity, market and interest rate risks. As a result, we may experience a reduction in
value or loss of our investments, which may have a negative adverse effect on our results of operations, liquidity and financial
condition. Changes in the economic environment, including periods of increased volatility in the securities markets such as those
experienced in connection with the ongoing COVID-19 pandemic, can increase the difficulty of assessing investment impairment and
increase the risk of potential impairment of these assets. Declines in the fair value of our investments may occur and material
impairments may be charged to income in future periods, resulting in recognized losses.
GENERAL RISKS
Changes in tax laws and regulations, or challenges to our tax positions, could have a material adverse effect on our business, cash
flow, financial condition and results of operations. In addition, we may not be able to realize the value of our deferred tax assets.
We have operations in the U.S and internationally. As a result, we are subject to the tax laws of several jurisdictions. From time to
time, proposals are made in the U.S. and other jurisdictions that could adversely affect our tax positions, effective tax rate or tax
payments. Changes in tax laws and regulations, including a potential increase in U.S. or international corporate tax rates or changes in
the deductibility of expenses, or changes in the interpretation of tax laws and regulations by governmental authorities, could have a
material impact on the future value of our deferred tax assets and deferred tax liabilities, could result in significant one-time charges in
the current or future taxable years and could increase our future tax expense. In addition, we are regularly audited by federal U.S. and
other tax authorities. Although we believe our tax positions comply with applicable tax law, the final determination of audits and any
related litigation in the jurisdictions where we are subject to taxation could be materially different from our historical income
provisions and accruals. These changes could have a material adverse effect on our business, cash flow, financial condition and results
of operations.
In addition, any future increase in our valuation allowance with regard to our deferred tax assets would result in additional income
tax expense and a decrease in shareholders’ equity, which could materially affect our financial position and results of operations in the
period in which the increase occurs. A material decrease in shareholders’ equity could, in turn, negatively impact our debt ratings or
potentially impact our compliance with existing debt covenants.
We also face other risks that could adversely affect our business, financial condition or results of operations, which include:
•adverse securities and credit market conditions, which could impact our ability to meet liquidity needs;
•any requirement to restate financial results in the event of inappropriate application of accounting principles;
•a significant failure of our internal control over financial reporting;
•failure of our prevention and control systems related to employee compliance with internal policies, including data security and
data privacy;
•provider fraud that is not prevented or detected and impacts our medical costs or those of self-insured customers;
•failure to protect our proprietary information and other sensitive data; and
•failure of our corporate governance policies or procedures.
-37-
ITEM 1B. UNRESOLVED SEC STAFF COMMENTS.
None.
ITEM 2. PROPERTIES.
We lease our principal executive offices located at 220 Virginia Avenue, Indianapolis, Indiana. In addition to this location, we
have operating facilities located in each state where we operate as licensees of the BCBSA, in each state where Amerigroup conducts
business and in certain other states and countries where our other subsidiaries operate. A majority of these locations are also leased
properties. Our facilities support our various business segments. We modified certain of our workforce practices in 2020 in response to
the COVID-19 pandemic, including having the majority of our workforce work remotely. In the third quarter of 2020, our
management introduced enterprise-wide initiatives to streamline our operations and optimize our business, including a reduction of
our office space footprint. In the fourth quarter of 2021, we identified additional reductions of office space. We believe that our
properties are adequate and suitable for our business as presently conducted; however, we are continuing to evaluate our real estate
strategy as it relates to the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic and the changing needs of a more hybrid remote and in-office
workforce.
ITEM 3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS.
For information regarding our legal proceedings, see Note 14, “Commitments and Contingencies - Litigation and Regulatory
Proceedings,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K,
which information is incorporated herein by reference.
ITEM 4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES.
Not applicable.
-38-
PART II
ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUER
PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES.
Market Information 
Our common stock, par value $0.01 per share, is listed on the NYSE under the symbol “ANTM.”
Holders
As of February 3, 2022, there were 53,071 shareholders of record of our common stock.
Securities Authorized for Issuance under Equity Compensation Plans
The information required by this Item concerning securities authorized for issuance under our equity compensation plans is set
forth in Part III, Item 12 “Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters” in
this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
The following table presents information related to our repurchases of common stock for the periods indicated (in millions, except
share and per share data):
PeriodTotal Number
of Shares
PurchasedAverage
Price Paid
per ShareTotal Number
of Shares
Purchased as
Part of
Publicly
Announced
ProgramsApproximate
Dollar Value
of Shares that
May Yet Be
Purchased
Under the
Programs
October 1, 2021 to October 31, 2021 338,170 $392.65 337,300 $ 4,582 
November 1, 2021 to November 30, 2021 335,984 426.02 334,722 4,439 
December 1, 2021 to December 31, 2021 580,970 428.08 578,005 4,192 
1,255,124 1,250,027 
1Total number of shares purchased includes 5,097 shares delivered to or withheld by us in connection with employee payroll tax
withholding upon exercise or vesting of stock awards. Stock grants to employees and directors and stock issued for stock option
plans and stock purchase plans in the consolidated statements of shareholders’ equity are shown net of these shares purchased.
2Represents the number of shares repurchased through the common stock repurchase program authorized by our Board of
Directors, which the Board evaluates periodically. During the year ended December 31, 2021, we repurchased 5,115,180 shares at
an aggregate cost of $1,900 under the program, including the cost of options to purchase shares. The Board of Directors has
authorized our common stock repurchase program since 2003. On January 26, 2021, our Audit Committee, pursuant to
authorization granted by the Board of Directors, authorized a $5,000 increase to our common stock repurchase program. No
duration has been placed on our common stock repurchase program, and we reserve the right to discontinue the program at any
time.1 2 
-39-
Performance Graph
The following Performance Graph and related information compares the cumulative total return to shareholders of our common
stock for the period from December 31, 2016 through December 31, 2021, with the cumulative total return over such period of (i) the
Standard & Poor’s 500 Stock Index (the “S&P 500 Index”) and (ii) the Standard & Poor’s Managed Health Care Index (the “S&P
Managed Health Care Index”). The graph assumes an investment of $100 on December 31, 2016 in each of our common stock, the
S&P 500 Index and the S&P Managed Health Care Index (and the reinvestment of all dividends).
The comparisons shown in the graph below are based on historical data, and we caution that the stock price performance shown in
the graph below is not indicative of, and is not intended to forecast, the potential future performance of our common stock.
Information used in the graph was obtained from S&P Global Market Intelligence, a source believed to be reliable, but we are not
responsible for any errors or omissions in such information. The following graph and related information shall not be deemed
“soliciting materials” or to be “filed” with the SEC, nor shall such information be incorporated by reference into any future filing
under the Exchange Act, except to the extent that we specifically incorporate it by reference into such filing.
 December 31,
 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021
Anthem, Inc. $100 $159 $187 $218 $235 $34
S&P 500 Index 100 122 116 153 181 23
S&P Managed Health Care Index 100 144 160 192 222 31
Based upon an initial investment of $100 on December 31, 2016 with dividends reinvested.
ITEM 6. [RESERVED]
-40-
ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT’S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF
OPERATIONS.
 (In Millions, Except Per Share Data or As Otherwise Stated Herein)
 This Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations (“MD&A”), should be read in
conjunction with our audited consolidated financial statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
References to the terms “we,” “our,” “us,” “Anthem” or the “Company” used throughout this MD&A refer to Anthem, Inc., an Indiana
corporation, and, unless the context otherwise requires, its direct and indirect subsidiaries. References to the “states” include the
District of Columbia and Puerto Rico, unless the context otherwise requires.
This section of this Annual Report on Form 10-K generally discusses 2021 and 2020 items and year-over-year comparisons
between 2021 and 2020. A detailed discussion of 2019 items and year-over-year comparisons between 2020 and 2019 that are not
included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K can be found in “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and
Results of Operations” in Part II, Item 7 of our Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2020.
Overview
We are one of the largest health benefits companies in the United States in terms of medical membership, serving greater than 45
million medical members through our affiliated health plans as of December 31, 2021. We are an independent licensee of the Blue
Cross and Blue Shield Association (“BCBSA”), an association of independent health benefit plans. We serve our members as the Blue
Cross licensee for California and as the Blue Cross and Blue Shield (“BCBS”) licensee for Colorado, Connecticut, Georgia, Indiana,
Kentucky, Maine, Missouri (excluding 30 counties in the Kansas City area), Nevada, New Hampshire, New York (in the New York
City metropolitan area and upstate New York), Ohio, Virginia (excluding the Northern Virginia suburbs of Washington, D.C.) and
Wisconsin. In a majority of these service areas, we do business as Anthem Blue Cross, Anthem Blue Cross and Blue Shield, and
Empire Blue Cross Blue Shield or Empire Blue Cross. In addition, we conduct business through arrangements with other BCBS
licensees as well as other strategic partners. Through our subsidiaries, we also serve customers in numerous states across the country
as AIM Specialty Health, Amerigroup, Aspire Health, Beacon, CareMore, Freedom Health, HealthLink, HealthSun, MMM, Optimum
HealthCare, Simply Healthcare, and/or UniCare. We offer pharmacy benefits management (“PBM”) services through our IngenioRx,
Inc. (“IngenioRx”) subsidiary. We are licensed to conduct insurance operations in all 50 states, the District of Columbia and Puerto
Rico through our subsidiaries.
We manage our operations by customer types through four reportable segments: Commercial & Specialty Business, Government
Business, IngenioRx and Other.
Our results of operations discussed throughout this MD&A are determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles (“GAAP”). We also calculate operating gain and operating margin to further aid investors in understanding and analyzing
our core operating results. Operating gain is calculated as total operating revenue less benefit expense, cost of products sold and
selling, general and administrative expense. Operating margin is calculated as operating gain divided by operating revenue. Our
definition of operating gain and operating margin may not be comparable to similarly titled measures reported by other companies. We
use these measures as a basis for evaluating segment performance, allocating resources, forecasting future operating periods and
setting incentive compensation targets. This information is not intended to be considered in isolation or as a substitute for income
before income tax expense, net income or fully-diluted earnings per share (“EPS”) prepared in accordance with GAAP. For additional
details on operating gain, see our “Reportable Segments Results of Operations” discussion included in this MD&A. For a
reconciliation of reportable segment operating revenue to the amounts of total revenue included in the consolidated statements of
income and a reconciliation of reportable segment operating gain to income before income tax expense, see Note 20, “Segment
Information,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Our operating revenue consists of premiums, product revenue, and administrative fees and other revenue. Premium revenue is
generated from risk-based contracts where we indemnify our policyholders against costs for covered health and life insurance benefits.
Product revenue represents services performed by IngenioRx for unaffiliated PBM customers and includes ingredient costs (net of any
rebates or discounts), including co-payments made by or on behalf of the customer, and
-41-
administrative fees. Unaffiliated PBM customers include our fee-based groups that contract with IngenioRx for PBM services and
external customers outside of the health plans we own. Administrative fees and other revenue come from fees from our fee-based
customers for the processing of transactions or network discount savings realized, revenues from our Medicare processing business
and revenues from other health-related businesses, including care management programs and miscellaneous other income.
Our benefit expense primarily includes costs of care for health services consumed by our risk-based members, such as outpatient
care, inpatient hospital care, professional services (primarily physician care) and pharmacy benefit costs. All four components are
affected both by unit costs and utilization rates. Unit costs include the cost of outpatient medical procedures per visit, inpatient
hospital care per admission, physician fees per office visit and prescription drug prices. Utilization rates represent the volume of
consumption of health services and typically vary with the age and health status of our members and their social and lifestyle choices,
along with clinical protocols and medical practice patterns in each of our markets. A portion of benefit expense recognized in each
reporting period consists of actuarial estimates of claims incurred but not yet paid by us. Any changes in these estimates are recorded
in the period the need for such an adjustment arises. While we offer a diversified mix of managed care products and services through
our managed care plans, our aggregate cost of care can fluctuate based on a change in the overall mix of these products and services.
Our managed care plans include: Preferred Provider Organizations; Health Maintenance Organizations; Point-of-Service plans;
traditional indemnity plans and other hybrid plans, including Consumer-Driven Health Plans; and hospital only and limited benefit
products.
We classify certain quality improvement costs as benefit expense. Quality improvement activities are those designed to improve
member health outcomes, prevent hospital readmissions and improve patient safety. They also include expenses for wellness and
health promotion provided to our members. These quality improvement costs may be comprised of expenses incurred for: (i) medical
management, including care coordination and case management; (ii) health and wellness, including disease management services for
such conditions as diabetes, high-risk pregnancies, congestive heart failure and asthma management and wellness initiatives like
weight-loss programs and smoking cessation treatments; and (iii) clinical health policy, such as identification and use of best clinical
practices to avoid harm, identifying clinical errors and safety concerns, and identifying potential adverse drug interactions.
Our cost of products sold represents the cost of pharmaceuticals dispensed by IngenioRx for our unaffiliated PBM customers (net
of rebates or discounts), including any co-payments made by or on behalf of the customer, per-claim administrative fees for
prescription fulfillment and certain direct costs related to sales and administration of customer contracts.
Our selling, general and administrative expenses consist of fixed and variable costs. Examples of fixed costs are depreciation,
amortization and certain facilities expenses. Certain variable costs, such as premium taxes, vary directly with premium volume.
Commission expense generally varies with premium or membership volume. Other variable costs, such as salaries and benefits, do not
vary directly with changes in premium but are more aligned with changes in membership. The acquisition or loss of a significant block
of business would likely impact staffing levels and thus, associated compensation expense. Other variable costs include professional
and consulting expenses and advertising. Other factors can impact our administrative cost structure, including systems efficiencies,
inflation and changes in productivity.
Our results of operations depend in large part on our ability to accurately predict and effectively manage healthcare costs through
effective contracting with providers of care to our members, product pricing, medical management and health and wellness programs,
innovative product design and our ability to maintain or achieve improvement in our Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services Star
ratings. Several economic factors related to healthcare costs, such as regulatory mandates of coverage as well as direct-to-consumer
advertising by providers and pharmaceutical companies, have a direct impact on the volume of care consumed by our members. The
potential effect of escalating healthcare costs, any changes in our ability to negotiate competitive rates with our providers and any
regulatory or market-driven restrictions on our ability to obtain adequate premium rates to offset overall inflation in healthcare costs,
including increases in unit costs and utilization resulting from the aging of the population and other demographics, the impact of
epidemics and pandemics, as well as advances in medical technology, may impose further risks to our ability to profitably underwrite
our business and may have a material adverse impact on our results of operations.
We intend to expand through a combination of organic growth, strategic acquisitions and efficient use of capital in both existing
and new markets. Our growth strategy is designed to enable us to take advantage of additional economies of scale, as
-42-
well as provide us access to new and evolving technologies and products. In addition, we believe geographic and product diversity
reduces our exposure to local or regional regulatory, economic and competitive pressures and provides us with increased opportunities
for growth. In 2019, we began using our subsidiary IngenioRx to market and offer PBM services, and we expect IngenioRx to
continue to improve our ability to integrate pharmacy benefits within our medical and specialty platform. In 2021, we continued
growing our government-sponsored business through organic growth and the acquisition of MMM Holdings, LLC (“MMM”). In all
other markets, we intend to maintain our position by delivering excellent service, offering competitively priced products, providing
access to high-quality provider networks and effectively capitalizing on the brand strength of the Blue Cross and Blue Shield names
and marks.
For additional information about our business and reportable segments, see Part I, Item 1, “Business” and Note 20, “Segment
Information” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
COVID-19
The COVID-19 pandemic continues to impact the global economy, cause market instability and uncertainty in the labor market
and put pressure on the healthcare system, and it has impacted, and will likely continue to impact, our membership, our benefit
expense and our member behavior, including how members access healthcare services. We continue to assist our customers, providers,
members and communities in addressing the effects of the COVID-19 pandemic, including by providing expanded benefit coverage
for COVID-19 diagnostic tests, treatment and vaccine administration and taking steps to increase vaccinations by enabling, educating
and encouraging vaccine acceptance among our members as well as in the communities in which we operate.
COVID-19 care, testing and vaccine administration, and the impact of new COVID-19 variants, have resulted in increased
medical costs for us in 2021. In 2021, our Medicaid membership continued to grow as a result of the temporary suspension of
eligibility recertification in response to the COVID-19 pandemic, which we expect will remain suspended at least until the second
quarter of 2022. Our Commercial fee-based membership decreased in 2021 due to in-group attrition likely attributable to the COVID-
19 pandemic. See “Business Trends - Medical Cost Trends” below for a discussion of the impact of COVID-19 on our healthcare
costs.
The COVID-19 pandemic continues to evolve and the full extent of its impact will depend on future developments, which are
highly uncertain and cannot be predicted at this time. We will continue to monitor the COVID-19 pandemic as well as resulting
legislative and regulatory changes to manage our response and assess and mitigate potential adverse impacts to our business. For
additional discussion regarding our risks related to the COVID-19 pandemic and our other risk factors, see Part I, Item 1A, “Risk
Factors” in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Business Trends
The Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and the Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, as amended
(collectively, the “ACA”), has impacted our business model and strategy, and various legal challenges since its enactment have
introduced increased uncertainty to our business. In June 2021, the U.S. Supreme Court issued its opinion and dismissed the latest
legal challenge to the constitutionality of the ACA, leaving the law intact. We expect that most of the ACA will continue to remain in
place and continue to impact our business operations and results of operations, including pricing, minimum medical loss ratios and the
geographies in which our products are available.
In 2021, we made the decision to modestly expand our participation in on-exchange products through state- or federally-
facilitated market places (the “Public Exchange”) for 2022 after also expanding in 2021. As a result, for 2022 we are offering Public
Exchange products in 122 of the 143 rating regions in which we operate, in comparison to 103 of 143 rating regions in 2021. Our
strategy has been, and will continue to be, to only participate in rating regions where we have an appropriate level of confidence that
these markets are on a path toward sustainability, including, but not limited to, factors such as expected financial performance,
regulatory environment, and underlying market characteristics. Changes to our business environment are likely to continue as elected
officials at the national and state levels continue to enact, and both elected officials and candidates for election continue to propose,
significant modifications to existing laws and regulations, including changes to taxes and fees. In addition, the continuing growth in
our government-sponsored business exposes us to increased regulatory oversight.
-43-
Our IngenioRx subsidiary markets and offers PBM services to our affiliated health plan customers throughout the country, as well
as to customers outside of the health plans we own. Our comprehensive PBM services portfolio includes features such as formulary
management, pharmacy networks, a prescription drug database, member services and mail order capabilities. IngenioRx delegates
certain PBM administrative functions, such as claims processing and prescription fulfillment, to CaremarkPCS Health, L.L.C., which
is a subsidiary of CVS Health Corporation, pursuant to a five-year agreement. With IngenioRx, we retain the responsibilities for
clinical and formulary strategy and development, member and employer experiences, operations, sales, marketing, account
management and retail network strategy.
Pricing Trends: We strive to price our health benefit products consistent with anticipated underlying medical cost trends. We
continue to closely monitor the COVID-19 pandemic (including new COVID-19 variants, which may be more contagious or severe, or
less responsive to treatment or vaccines) and the impacts it may have on our pricing, such as surges in COVID-19 related
hospitalizations, infection rates, the cost of COVID-19 vaccines, testing and treatment and the return of non-COVID-19 healthcare
utilization to our estimate of normal levels, based on historical utilization patterns. We frequently make adjustments to respond to
legislative and regulatory changes as well as pricing and other actions taken by existing competitors and new market entrants. Product
pricing in our Commercial & Specialty Business segment, including our Individual and small group lines of business, remains
competitive. Revenues from the Medicare and Medicaid programs are dependent, in whole or in part, upon annual funding from the
federal government and/or applicable state governments. The ACA imposed an annual Health Insurance Provider Fee (“HIP Fee”) on
health insurers that write certain types of health insurance on U.S. risks. We priced our affected products to cover the impact of the
HIP Fee when it was in effect. The HIP Fee was in effect for 2020 but was permanently repealed beginning in 2021.
Medical Cost Trends: Our medical cost trends are primarily driven by increases in the utilization of services across all provider
types and the unit cost increases of these services. We work to mitigate these trends through various medical management programs
such as care and condition management, program integrity and specialty pharmacy management and utilization management, as well
as benefit design changes. There are many drivers of medical cost trends that can cause variance from our estimates, such as changes
in the level and mix of services utilized, regulatory changes, aging of the population, health status and other demographic
characteristics of our members, epidemics, pandemics, advances in medical technology, new high cost prescription drugs, and
healthcare provider or member fraud.
The COVID-19 pandemic initially caused a decrease in utilization of non-COVID-19 health services, which decreased our claim
costs in 2020. Over the course of the first half of 2021, our non-COVID-19 healthcare utilization experience gradually increased
toward normalized levels, while COVID-19 related healthcare expenses declined and COVID-19 vaccination administration costs
increased. During the second half of 2021, the COVID-19 Delta variant caused a significant increase in COVID-19 related healthcare
utilization as a result of increased testing, treatment, and hospitalization costs, which was partially offset by a reduction in non-
COVID-19 healthcare utilization. The reduction in non-COVID-19 healthcare utilization was particularly notable in the inpatient
setting, as some regions limited elective surgeries to preserve limited resources to treat patients hospitalized with COVID-19. Costs
related to child vaccinations and adult boosters were also incurred during the fourth quarter of 2021.
The COVID-19 Omicron variant increased confirmed COVID-19 cases to significant levels at the end of 2021 and the beginning
of 2022. This is expected to further increase COVID-19 costs related to testing, treatment and hospitalization costs, but is expected to
be partially offset by a reduction in non-COVID-19 healthcare utilization. In 2022, we anticipate additional claim costs for new
pharmaceutical treatments for COVID-19 and compliance with governmental regulations on COVID-19 testing reimbursement. We
expect claims costs related to COVID-19 testing, treatment and hospitalizations to continue throughout 2022 even after the latest wave
of COVID-19 infections in the U.S. subsides. The continued cost and volume of covered services related to the COVID-19 pandemic
may have a material adverse effect on our future claim costs. We continue to closely monitor the COVID-19 pandemic and its impacts
on our business, financial condition, results of operations and medical cost trends.
For additional discussion regarding business trends, see Part I, Item 1, “Business” of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Regulatory Trends and Uncertainties
Federal and state governments have enacted, and may continue to enact, legislation and regulations in response to the COVID-19
pandemic that have had, and we expect will continue to have, a significant impact on health benefits, consumer
-44-
eligibility for public programs and our cash flows for all of our lines of business. These actions, which are or have been in effect for
various durations, provide, among other things:
•mandates to waive cost-sharing for COVID-19 testing, treatment (including over-the-counter testing in accordance with state
and federal requirements such as California SB 510 and the January 2022 federal requirements), vaccines and related
services;
•reforms, including waiving Medicare originating site restrictions for qualified providers of telehealth services;
•financial support to healthcare providers, including expansion of the Medicare accelerated payment program to all providers
receiving Medicare payments;
•mandated expansion of premium payment terms, including the time period for which claims can be denied for lack of
payment; and
•mandates related to prior authorizations and payment levels to providers, additional consumer enrollment windows and an
increased ability to provide telehealth services.
The Consolidated Appropriations Act of 2021, which was enacted in December 2020 (the “Appropriations Act”), contains a
number of provisions that may have a material effect upon our business, including procedures and coverage requirements related to
surprise medical bills and new mandates for continuity of care for certain patients, price comparison tools, disclosure of broker
compensation and reporting on pharmacy benefits and drug costs. The health plan-related requirements of the Appropriations Act have
varying effective dates beginning as early as December 2021, some of which have been extended since the enactment of the
Appropriations Act.
The American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, (the “Rescue Plan”), which was enacted in March 2021, contains several health-related
provisions that have impacted our business, including expansion of premium tax credits for our Public Exchange business and full
subsidization of the Consolidated Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act (“COBRA”) continuation coverage for those who were
involuntarily terminated or had their work hours reduced. The Rescue Plan’s premium tax provisions became effective in January
2021, while the COBRA premium subsidization extended from April through September 2021.
The ACA has evolved and various legal challenges since its enactment introduced increased uncertainty to our business. We
expect that most of the ACA will remain in place and continue to significantly impact our business operations and results of
operations; however, federal regulatory agencies continue to modify regulations and guidance related to the ACA and our businesses
more broadly. We also expect further and ongoing regulatory guidance on a number of issues related to Medicare, including evolving
methodology for ratings and quality bonus payments. The Center for Medicare and Medicaid Services (“CMS”) is also proposing
changes to its program that audits data submitted under the risk adjustment programs in a way that would increase financial recoveries
from plans. We will continue to evaluate the impact of the ACA as any further developments or judicial rulings occur.
Beginning in July 2022, the Health Plan Transparency Rule will require us to disclose, on a monthly basis, detailed pricing
information regarding negotiated rates for all covered items and services between the plan or issuer and in-network providers and
historical payments to, and billed charges from, out-of-network providers. Additionally, beginning in 2023, we will be required to
make available to members personalized out-of-pocket cost information and the underlying negotiated rates for 500 covered
healthcare items and services, including prescription drugs. In 2024, this requirement will expand to all items and services.
The non-deductible HIP Fee was permanently eliminated beginning in 2021. For the year ended December 31, 2020, we
recognized $1,570 as selling, general and administrative expense related to the HIP Fee. There was no corresponding expense for 2021
due to the elimination of the HIP Fee beginning in 2021.
For additional discussion regarding regulatory trends and uncertainties, and risk factors that could cause actual results to differ
materially from those contained in forward-looking statements made in this Annual Report on Form 10-K, see Part I, Item 1,
“Business — Regulation” and Part I, Item 1A, “Risk Factors.”
-45-
Other Significant Items
Business and Operational Matters
On November 10, 2021, we announced our entrance into an agreement with Personal Touch Holding Corporation to acquire
Integra Managed Care (“Integra”). Integra is a managed long-term care plan that serves New York state Medicaid members, enabling
adults with long-term care needs and disabilities to live safely and independently in their own homes. The acquisition is expected to
close by the end of the second quarter of 2022 and is subject to standard closing conditions and customary approvals.
On June 29, 2021, we completed our acquisition of MMM and its Medicare Advantage plan, Medicaid plan and other affiliated
companies from InnovaCare Health, L.P. MMM is a Puerto Rico-based integrated healthcare organization and seeks to provide its
Medicare Advantage and Medicaid members with a whole health experience through its network of specialized clinics and wholly
owned independent physician associations. This acquisition aligns with our vision to be an innovative, valuable and inclusive
healthcare partner by providing care management programs that improve the lives of the people we serve.
On April 28, 2021, we completed our acquisition of myNEXUS, Inc. (“myNEXUS”) from WindRose Health Investors.
myNEXUS is a comprehensive home-based nursing management company for payors and, at the time of acquisition, delivered
integrated clinical support services for Medicare Advantage members across twenty states. This acquisition aligns with our strategy to
manage integrated, whole person multi-site care and support by providing national, large-scale expertise to manage nursing services in
the home and facilitate transitions of care.
On February 28, 2020, we completed our acquisition of Beacon Health Options, Inc. (“Beacon”), which was the largest
independently held behavioral health organization in the country. At the time of acquisition, Beacon served more than thirty-four
million individuals across all fifty states. This acquisition aligned with our strategy to diversify into health services and deliver both
integrated solutions and care delivery models that personalize care for people with complex and chronic conditions.
For additional information, see Note 3, “Business Acquisitions,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
included in Part II, Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
In 2020, we introduced enterprise-wide initiatives to optimize our business and as a result, recorded a charge of $653 in selling,
general and administrative expenses. We believe these initiatives largely represent the next step forward in our progression towards
becoming a more agile organization, including process automation and a reduction in our office space footprint. In the fourth quarter
of 2021, we identified additional office space reductions and related fixed asset impairments due to the continuing COVID-19
pandemic and recorded a charge of $202 in selling general and administrative expenses. For additional information, see Note 4,
“Business Optimization Initiatives” and Note 18, “Leases,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item
8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Litigation Matters
In the consolidated multi-district proceeding in the United States District Court for the Northern District of Alabama (the “Court”)
captioned In re Blue Cross Blue Shield Antitrust Litigation (“BCBSA Litigation”), the Blue Cross Blue Shield Association (the
“BCBSA”), and Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield licensees, including us (the “Blue plans”) have approved a settlement agreement and
release (the “Subscriber Settlement Agreement”) with the plaintiffs representing a putative nationwide class of health plan subscribers.
Generally, the lawsuits in the BCBSA Litigation challenge elements of the licensing agreements between the BCBSA and the
independently owned and operated Blue plans. The cases were brought by two putative nationwide classes of plaintiffs, health plan
subscribers and providers, and the Subscriber Settlement Agreement applies only to the putative subscriber class. No settlement
agreement has been reached with the provider plaintiffs at this time, and the defendants continue to contest the consolidated cases
brought by the provider plaintiffs.
If approved by the Court, the Subscriber Settlement Agreement will require the defendants to make a monetary settlement
payment, our portion of which is estimated to be $594, and will include certain terms imposing non-monetary obligations on the
defendants. As of December 31, 2021, the liability balance accrued for our estimated remaining payment obligation was $507, net of
payments made. All terms of the Subscriber Settlement Agreement are subject to approval by the
-46-
Court before they become effective. For additional information regarding the BCBSA Litigation, see Note 14, “Commitments and
Contingencies – Litigation and Regulatory Proceedings – Blue Cross Blue Shield Antitrust Litigation,” of the Notes to Consolidated
Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
In January 2019, we exercised our contractual right to terminate our PBM agreement (the “ESI PBM Agreement”) with Express
Scripts, Inc. (“Express Scripts”). We completed the transition of our members from Express Scripts to IngenioRx by January 1, 2020.
Notwithstanding our termination of the ESI PBM Agreement, the litigation between us and Express Scripts regarding the ESI PBM
Agreement continues. For additional information regarding this lawsuit, see Note 14, “Commitments and Contingencies - Litigation
and Regulatory Proceedings - Express Scripts, Inc. Pharmacy Benefit Management Litigation,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial
Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Selected Operating Performance
During the year ended December 31, 2021, total medical membership increased by 2 million, or 5.7%. The increase in medical
membership was driven primarily by growth in our Government Business’ Medicaid membership, including organic growth resulting
from the temporary suspension of eligibility recertification during the COVID-19 pandemic, growth resulting from our acquisition of
MMM on June 29, 2021 and the launch of our HealthyBlue managed care alliance in North Carolina. Our Medicare Advantage
membership also increased due to organic growth and the acquisition of MMM on June 29, 2021. Increases in Group risk-based
membership resulting from sales exceeding lapses, increases in Individual membership due to our Public Exchange expansion in 2021
and BlueCard® increases also contributed to overall membership increases. Declines in our Group fee-based membership relating to
in-group attrition likely attributable to the COVID-19 pandemic partially offset the increases in our medical membership.
Operating revenue for the year ended December 31, 2021 was $136,943, an increase of $16,135, or 13.4%, from the year ended
December 31, 2020. The increase in operating revenue was primarily driven by higher premium revenue due mainly to membership
growth in our Government Business segment, including the acquisition of MMM on June 29, 2021, and increased product revenue in
our IngenioRx segment. These increases were partially offset by the impact of lower premium revenue associated with the repeal of
the HIP Fee for 2021.
Net income for the year ended December 31, 2021 was $6,095, an increase of $1,523, or 33.3%, from the year ended
December 31, 2020. The increase in net income was primarily due to increased operating gain in all of our business units, as well as
increased investment income. The increased operating gain in our business units was due to the absence of charges in 2021 for the
BCBSA litigation accrual recognized in the third quarter of 2020 and reduced business optimization charges in 2021. The increase in
our investment income resulted from an increase in income derived from our alternative investments in comparison to 2020, partially
offset by reduced dividends received on our equity investments.
Our fully-diluted shareholders' earnings per share (“EPS”) for the year ended December 31, 2021 was $24.73, an increase of
$6.75, or 37.5%, from the year ended December 31, 2020. Our diluted shares for the year ended December 31, 2021 were 246.8, a
decrease of 7.5, or 2.9%, compared to the year ended December 31, 2020. The increase in EPS resulted from the increase in net
income, as well as lower shares outstanding in 2021.
Operating cash flow for the year ended December 31, 2021 was $8,364, or approximately 1.4 times net income. Operating cash
flow for the year ended December 31, 2020 was $10,688, or approximately 2.3 times net income. The decrease in operating cash flow
was primarily due to the impact of working capital changes year-over-year, including an increase in receivables and a decline in
accounts payable and accrued expenses, partially offset by higher net income in 2021.
-47-
Membership
In the first quarter of 2021, we updated our medical membership reporting to better align with how we view our business. Our
medical membership now includes the following customer types: Individual, Group risk-based, Group fee-based, BlueCard,
Medicare, Medicaid and our Federal Employees Health Benefits (“FEHB”) Program. BCBS-branded business generally refers to
members in our service areas licensed by the BCBSA. Non-BCBS-branded business refers to members in our non-BCBS-branded
Amerigroup, Freedom Health, HealthSun, MMM, Optimum HealthCare and Simply Healthcare plans, as well as HealthLink and
UniCare members. In addition to the above medical membership, we also serve customers who purchase one or more of our other
products or services that are often ancillary to our health business.
•Individual consists of individual customers under age 65 and their covered dependents. Individual policies are generally sold
through independent agents and brokers, retail partnerships, our in-house sales force or via the Public Exchanges. Individual
business is sold on a risk-based basis. We offer on-exchange products through Public Exchanges and off-exchange products.
Federal premium subsidies are available only for certain Public Exchange Individual products. Unsubsidized Individual
customers are generally more sensitive to product pricing and, to a lesser extent, the configuration of the network and the
efficiency of administration. Customer turnover is generally higher with Individual as compared to Group risk-based.
Individual business accounted for 1.7%, 1.6% and 1.7% of our medical members at December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019,
respectively.
•Group risk-based consists of employer customers who purchase products on a full-risk basis, which are products for which
we charge a premium and indemnify our policyholders against costs for health benefits. Group risk-based accounts include
Local Group customers and National Accounts. Local Group consists of those employer customers with less than 5% of
eligible employees located outside of the headquarter state, as well as customers with more than 5% of eligible employees
located outside of the headquarter state with up to 5,000 eligible employees. In addition, Local Group includes Student
Health members. National Accounts generally consist of multi-state employer groups primarily headquartered in an Anthem
service area with at least 5% of the eligible employees located outside of the headquarter state and with more than 5,000
eligible employees. Some exceptions are allowed based on broker and consultant relationships. Group risk-based accounts are
generally sold through brokers or consultants who work with industry specialists from our in-house sales force and are
offered both on and off the Public Exchanges. Group risk-based accounted for 8.8%, 8.9% and 9.6% of our medical members
at December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
•Group fee-based customers represent employer groups, Local Group, including UniCare members, and National Accounts,
who purchase fee-based products and elect to retain most or all of the financial risk associated with their employees’
healthcare costs. Some fee-based customers choose to purchase stop loss coverage to limit their retained risk. Group fee-
based accounts are generally sold through independent brokers or consultants retained by the customer working with our in-
house sales force. Group fee-based accounted for 42.7%, 45.5% and 47.2% of our medical members at December 31, 2021,
2020 and 2019, respectively.
•BlueCard host customers represent enrollees of Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield plans not owned by Anthem who receive
healthcare services in our BCBSA licensed markets. BlueCard membership consists of estimated host members using the
national BlueCard program. Host members are generally members who reside in or travel to a state in which an Anthem
subsidiary is the Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield licensee and who are covered under an employer-sponsored health plan
issued by a non-Anthem controlled BCBSA licensee (the “home plan”). We perform certain functions, including claims
pricing and administration, for BlueCard members, for which we receive administrative fees from the BlueCard members’
home plans. Other administrative functions, including maintenance of enrollment information and customer service, are
performed by the home plan. Host members are computed using, among other things, the average number of BlueCard
claims received per month. BlueCard host membership accounted for 13.6%, 14.1% and 14.8% of our medical members at
December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
•Medicare customers are Medicare-eligible individual members age 65 and over who have enrolled in Medicare Advantage,
including Special Needs Plans (“SNPs”), also known as Medicare Advantage SNPs; dual-eligible programs through
Medicare-Medicaid Plans (“MMPs”); Medicare Supplement plans; and Medicare Part D Prescription Drug Plans (“Medicare
Part D”). Medicare Advantage plans provide Medicare beneficiaries with a managed care alternative to traditional Medicare
and often include a Medicare Part D benefit. In addition, our®
®
®
®
® ®
®
®
-48-
Medicare Advantage SNPs provide tailored benefits to special needs individuals who are institutionalized or have severe or
disabling chronic conditions and to dual-eligible customers, who are low-income seniors and persons under age 65 with
disabilities. Medicare Advantage SNPs are coordinated care plans specifically designed to provide targeted care, covering all
the healthcare services considered medically necessary for members and often providing professional care coordination
services, with personal guidance and programs that help members maintain their health. Medicare Advantage membership
also includes Medicare Advantage members in our Group Retiree Solutions business who are retired members of Commercial
accounts or retired members of groups who are not affiliated with our Commercial accounts who have selected a Medicare
Advantage product through us. Medicare Supplement plans typically pay the difference between healthcare costs incurred by
a beneficiary and amounts paid by Medicare. Medicare Part D offers a prescription drug plan to Medicare and MMP
beneficiaries. MMP, which was established as a result of the passage of the ACA, is a demonstration program focused on
serving members who are dually eligible for Medicaid and Medicare. Medicare Supplement and Medicare Advantage
products are marketed in the same manner, primarily through independent agents and brokers. Medicare program business
accounted for 6.2%, 5.5% and 5.2% of our medical members at December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
•Medicaid membership represents eligible members who receive health benefits through publicly funded healthcare programs,
including Medicaid, ACA-related Medicaid expansion programs, Temporary Assistance for Needy Families, programs for
seniors and people with disabilities, Children’s Health Insurance Programs, and specialty programs such as those focused on
long-term services and support, HIV/AIDS, foster care, behavioral health and/or substance abuse disorders, and intellectual
disabilities or developmental disabilities, among others. Total Medicaid program business accounted for 23.4%, 20.6% and
17.7% of our medical members at December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
•FEHB members consist of United States government employees and their dependents within our geographic markets through
our participation in the national contract between the BCBSA and the U.S. Office of Personnel Management. FEHB business
accounted for 3.6%, 3.8% and 3.9% of our medical members at December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
-49-
The following table presents our medical membership by reportable segment and customer type as of December 31, 2021, 2020
and 2019. Also included below is other membership by product. The medical membership and other membership presented are
unaudited and in certain instances include estimates of the number of members represented by each contract at the end of the period.
 December  31 2021 vs. 2020 2020 vs. 2019
(In thousands) 2021 2020 2019 Change % Change Change % Change
Medical Membership
Commercial & Specialty Business:
Individual 759 680 684 79 11.6 % (4) (0.6) %
Group Risk-Based 4,006 3,799 3,938 207 5.4 % (139) (3.5) %
Commercial Risk-Based 4,765 4,479 4,622 286 6.4 % (143) (3.1) %
BlueCard 6,178 6,059 6,060 119 2.0 % (1) — %
Group Fee-Based 19,395 19,551 19,340 (156) (0.8) % 211 1.1 %
Commercial Fee-Based 25,573 25,610 25,400 (37) (0.1) % 210 0.8 %
Total Commercial & Specialty Business 30,338 30,089 30,022 249 0.8 % 67 0.2 %
Government Business:
Medicare Advantage 1,859 1,428 1,214 431 30.2 % 214 17.6 %
Medicare Supplement 952 933 905 19 2.0 % 28 3.1 %
Total Medicare 2,811 2,361 2,119 450 19.1 % 242 11.4 %
Medicaid 10,600 8,852 7,265 1,748 19.7 % 1,587 21.8 %
Federal Employees Health Benefits 1,625 1,623 1,594 2 0.1 % 29 1.8 %
Total Government Business 15,036 12,836 10,978 2,200 17.1 % 1,858 16.9 %
Total Medical Membership 45,374 42,925 41,000 2,449 5.7 % 1,925 4.7 %
Other  Membership
Life and Disability Members 4,782 5,064 5,259 (282) (5.6) % (195) (3.7) %
Dental Members 6,674 6,385 6,263 289 4.5 % 122 1.9 %
Dental Administration Members 1,491 1,316 5,516 175 13.3 % (4,200) (76.1) %
Vision Members 8,031 7,536 7,261 495 6.6 % 275 3.8 %
Medicare Part D Standalone Members 438 413 283 25 6.1 % 130 45.9 %
December 31, 2021 Compared to December 31, 2020
Medical Membership
Total medical membership increased primarily due to growth in our Government Business’ Medicaid membership, including
organic growth resulting from the temporary suspension of eligibility recertification during the COVID-19 pandemic, growth resulting
from our acquisition of MMM on June 29, 2021 and the launch of our HealthyBlue managed care alliance in North Carolina. Our
Medicare Advantage membership also increased due to organic growth and our acquisition of MMM on June 29, 2021. Increases in
Group risk-based membership resulting from sales exceeding lapses, increases in Individual membership due to our Public Exchange
expansion in 2021 and BlueCard increases also contributed to overall membership increases. Declines in our Group fee-based
membership relating to in-group attrition likely attributable to the COVID-19 pandemic partially offset the increases in our medical
membership.
Other Membership
Our other membership can be impacted by changes in our medical membership, as our medical members often purchase our other
products that are ancillary to our health business. Life and disability membership decreased primarily due to the loss of a Group risk-
based account and membership decreases in our Group fee-based business. Dental membership increased®
®
-50-
primarily due to higher sales in our Individual and Group risk-based accounts and penetration increases in our FEHB program. Dental
administration membership increased due to growth in our FEHB program. Vision membership increased primarily as a result of
growth in our Medicare Advantage business.
Consolidated Results of Operations
Our consolidated summarized results of operations and other information for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
are as follows:                                                        
  Change
 Years Ended December 31 2021 vs. 2020 2020 vs. 2019
 2021 2020 2019 $ % $ %
Total operating revenue $ 136,943 $ 120,808 $ 103,141 $16,135 13.4 %$17,667 17.1 %
Net investment income 1,378 877 1,005 501 57.1 % (128) (12.7) %
Net gains on financial instruments 318 182 67 136 74.7 % 115 171.6 %
Total r evenues 138,639 121,867 104,213 16,772 13.8 % 17,654 16.9 %
Benefit expense 102,645 88,045 81,786 14,600 16.6 % 6,259 7.7 %
Cost of products sold 10,895 8,953 1,992 1,942 21.7 % 6,961 NM
Selling, general and administrative
expense 15,914 17,450 13,364 (1,536) (8.8) % 4,086 30.6 %
Other expense 1,260 1,181 1,086 79 6.7 % 95 8.7 %
Total expenses 130,714 115,629 98,228 15,085 13.0 % 17,401 17.7 %
Income befor e income tax expense 7,925 6,238 5,985 1,687 27.0 % 253 4.2 %
Income tax expense 1,830 1,666 1,178 164 9.8 % 488 41.4 %
Net income 6,095 4,572 4,807 1,523 33.3 % (235) (4.9) %
Net loss attributable to
noncontr olling inter ests 9 — — 9 — — — 
Shar eholders’  net income $ 6,104 $ 4,572 $ 4,807 $1,532 33.5 %$ (235) (4.9) %
Average diluted shares outstanding 246.8 254.3 260.3 (7.5) (2.9) % (6.0) (2.3) %
Diluted shareholders' net income per
share $ 24.73 $ 17.98 $ 18.47 $ 6.75 37.5 %$ (0.49) (2.7) %
Effective tax rate 23.1 % 26.7 % 19.7 % (360)bp 700bp
Benefit expense ratio 87.5 % 84.6 % 86.8 % 290bp (220)bp
Selling, general and administrative
expense ratio  11.6 % 14.4 % 13.0 % (280)bp 140bp
Income before income tax expense as a
percentage of total revenues 5.7 % 5.1 % 5.7 % 60bp (60)bp
Net income as a percentage of total
revenues 4.4 % 3.8 % 4.6 % 60bp (80)bp
Certain of the following definitions are also applicable to all other results of operations tables in this discussion:
NM Not meaningful.
1 Includes interest expense, amortization of other intangible assets and loss on extinguishment of debt.
2 Benefit expense ratio represents benefit expense as a percentage of premium revenue. Premiums for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020
and 2019 were $1 17,373, $104,109 and $94,173, respectively . Premiums are included in total operating revenue presented above.
3 bp = basis point; one hundred basis points = 1%.
4 Selling, general and administrative expense ratio represents selling, general and administrative expense as a percentage of total operating
revenue.
Year Ended December 31, 2021 Compared to the Year Ended December 31, 2020
Total operating revenue increased primarily as a result of higher premium revenue due mainly to membership growth in our
Government Business segment, including related to the acquisition of MMM on June 29, 2021, and increased product revenue in our
IngenioRx segment. These increases were partially offset by the impact of lower premium revenue associated with the repeal of the
HIP Fee for 2021.1 
3 3
2 3 3
4 3 3
3 3
3 3
-51-
Net investment income increased primarily due to increases in net income from our alternative investments, partially offset by
decreased dividends received on our equity investments.
Net gains on financial instruments increased primarily due to increased realized gains on our alternative investments and
increased net realized gains on our fixed maturity securities, partially offset by declines in the fair value of equity securities still held.
Benefit expense increased primarily due to cost increases resulting from membership growth in our Medicaid and Medicare
businesses, including related to our acquisition of MMM on June 29, 2021, and increased COVID-19 healthcare costs for both our
Commercial & Specialty Business and Government Business segments.
Our benefit expense ratio increased primarily due to the repeal of the HIP Fee for 2021 and increased COVID-19 and non-
COVID-19 healthcare costs for both our Commercial & Specialty Business and Government Business segments.
Cost of products sold reflects the cost of pharmaceuticals dispensed by IngenioRx for our unaffiliated PBM customers. Cost of
products sold increased as the corresponding pharmacy product revenues increased due to growth in customers served by IngenioRx in
2021.
Selling, general and administrative expense decreased primarily due to the repeal of the HIP Fee for 2021, the absence of charges
in 2021 for the BCBSA litigation accrual recognized in the third quarter of 2020 and reduced business optimization charges in 2021.
These items were partially offset by increased costs to support growth.
Our selling, general and administrative expense ratio decreased primarily due to increased operating revenue in 2021, the absence
of charges in 2021 for the BCBSA litigation accrual recognized in the third quarter of 2020, reduced business optimization charges in
2021 and the repeal of the HIP Fee for 2021. These items were partially offset by increased costs to support growth.
Our effective income tax rate decreased primarily due to the repeal of the HIP Fee for 2021, which was non-deductible for tax
purposes.
Our net income as a percentage of total revenue increased in 2021 as compared to 2020 as a result of all the factors discussed
above.
-52-
Reportable Segments Results of Operations
The following table presents a summary of our reportable segment financial information for the years ended December 31, 2021,
2020 and 2019:
    Change
 Years Ended December  31 2021 vs. 2020 2020 vs. 2019
 2021 2020 2019 $ % $ %
Operating Revenue
Commercial & Specialty Business $ 38,809 $ 36,699 $ 37,421 $ 2,110 5.7 %$ (722) (1.9) %
Government Business 82,919 71,572 62,632 11,347 15.9 % 8,940 14.3 %
IngenioRx 25,431 21,91 1 5,402 3,520 16.1 % 16,509 NM
Other 10,250 6,057 2,293 4,193 69.2 % 3,764 164.2 %
Eliminations (20,466) (15,431) (4,607) (5,035) 32.6 % (10,824) 234.9 %
Total operating revenue $ 136,943 $ 120,808 $ 103,141 $16,135 13.4 %$17,667 17.1 %
Operating Gain (Loss)
Commercial & Specialty Business $ 2,753 $ 2,681 $ 4,032 72 2.7 % (1,351) (33.5) %
Government Business 3,061 2,444 2,056 617 25.2 % 388 18.9 %
IngenioRx 1,684 1,361 — 323 23.7 % 1,361 NM
Other (9) (126) (89) 117 (92.9) % (37) 41.6 %
Operating Margin
Commercial & Specialty Business 7.1 % 7.3 % 10.8 % (20)bp (350)bp
Government Business 3.7 % 3.4 % 3.3 % 30bp 10bp
IngenioRx 6.6 % 6.2 % NM 40bp NM
NM    Not meaningful.
1 Includes expenses of $106 for business optimization initiatives recognized in 2021; $311 for business optimization initiatives and $524 for the BCBSA Litigation
recognized in 2020.
2    Includes expenses of $47 for business optimization initiatives recognized in 2021; $205 for business optimization initiatives and $24 for the BCBSA Litigation
recognized in 2020.
3    Includes expenses of $2 for business optimization initiatives recognized in 2021; $4 for business optimization initiatives recognized in 2020.
4    Includes expenses of $32 for business optimization initiatives recognized in 2021; $133 for business optimization initiatives recognized in 2020.
5    bp = basis point; one hundred basis points = 1%.
Year Ended December 31, 2021 Compared to the Year Ended December 31, 2020
Commercial & Specialty Business
Operating revenue increased primarily due to premium rate increases in our Commercial risk-based businesses designed to cover
medical cost trends, increased membership in our Commercial risk-based businesses, administrative fee increases in our Group fee-
based businesses and the absence in 2021 of premium credits provided to members enrolled in select Group and Individual health
plans in response to the COVID-19 pandemic in the second quarter of 2020. These increases were partially offset by the impact of
lower premium revenue associated with the repeal of the HIP Fee for 2021.
The increase in operating gain was primarily due to the absence of charges in 2021 for the BCBSA Litigation accrual recognized
in the third quarter of 2020, reduced business optimization charges in 2021 and the non-recurring premium credits provided to
members enrolled in select Group and Individual health plans in response to the COVID-19 pandemic in the second quarter of 2020.
These increases were partially offset by increased COVID-19 and non-COVID-19 healthcare costs in 2021.1
2
3
4
5 5
5 5
5
-53-
Government Business
Operating revenue increased primarily due to higher premium revenue growth in our Medicaid business, driven by the temporary
suspension of eligibility recertification, which we expect will remain suspended at least until the second quarter of 2022, and the
acquisition of MMM on June 29, 2021. Medicare membership growth in our Medicare business and the impact of the acquisition of
MMM on June 29, 2021 also contributed to operating revenue growth. These increases were partially offset by the impact of lower
premium revenue associated with the repeal of the HIP Fee for 2021, increased experience-rated refunds in our Medicaid business and
lower risk-based revenue in our Medicare business.
The increase in operating gain was primarily driven by membership increases in both our Medicaid and Medicare businesses,
including due to the acquisition of MMM on June 29, 2021, and reduced business optimization charges in 2021. These increases were
partially offset by an increase in COVID-19 and non-COVID-19 healthcare costs, increased experience-rated refunds in our Medicaid
business and lower risk-based revenue in our Medicare business.
IngenioRx
Operating revenue and operating gain increased as a result of higher drug spend from IngenioRx customers, including spend
related to increased Medicaid membership within our Government Business segment.
The increase in operating gain was primarily driven by growth in integrated medical and pharmacy members in 2021.
Other
Operating revenue increased primarily due to higher administrative fees and other revenue for services performed by our
Diversified Business Group for our Commercial & Specialty Business and Government Business segments, primarily due to the
implementation of affiliated behavioral health capitation contracts. In addition, unaffiliated revenues from Beacon, AIM and
myNEXUS contributed to the overall increase.
The decrease in operating loss was driven by reduced business optimization charges in 2021 and a decline in unallocated
corporate expenses in 2021.
Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates
We prepare our consolidated financial statements in conformity with GAAP. Application of GAAP requires management to make
estimates and assumptions that affect the amounts reported in our consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes and
within this MD&A. We consider our most important accounting policies that require significant estimates and management judgment
to be those policies with respect to liabilities for medical claims payable, income taxes, goodwill and other intangible assets,
investments and retirement benefits, which are discussed below. Our other significant accounting policies are summarized in Note 2,
“Basis of Presentation and Significant Accounting Policies,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II,
Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
We continually evaluate the accounting policies and estimates used to prepare the consolidated financial statements. In general,
our estimates are based on historical experience, evaluation of current trends, information from third-party professionals and various
other assumptions that we believe to be reasonable under the known facts and circumstances. Estimates can require a significant
amount of judgment, and a different set of assumptions could result in material changes to our reported results.
Medical Claims Payable
The most subjective accounting estimate in our consolidated financial statements is our liability for medical claims payable. At
December 31, 2021, this liability was $13,518 and represented 22% of our total consolidated liabilities. We record this liability and the
corresponding benefit expense for incurred but not paid claims, including the estimated costs of processing such claims. Incurred but
not paid claims include (1) an estimate for claims that are incurred but not reported, as well as claims reported to us but not yet
processed through our systems, which approximated 96%, or $12,998, of our total medical claims liability as of December 31, 2021;
and (2) claims reported to us and processed through our systems but not yet paid, which approximated 4%, or $520, of the total
medical claims payable as of December 31, 2021. The level of claims
-54-
payable processed through our systems but not yet paid may fluctuate from one period-end to the next, from approximately 1% to 5%
of our total medical claims liability, due to timing of when claim payments are made.
Liabilities for both claims incurred but not reported and reported but not yet processed through our systems are determined in the
aggregate, employing actuarial methods that are commonly used by health insurance actuaries and meet Actuarial Standards of
Practice. Our reserving practice for claim liabilities is to consistently recognize the appropriate amount of reserve within a level of
confidence required by Actuarial Standards of Practice. We determine the amount of the liability for incurred but not paid claims by
following a detailed actuarial process that uses both historical claim payment patterns as well as emerging medical cost trends to
project our best estimate of claim liabilities. Under this process, historical paid claims data is formatted into “claim triangles,” which
compare claim incurred dates to the dates of claim payments. This information is analyzed to create “completion factors” that
represent the average percentage of total incurred claims that have been paid through a given date after being incurred. Completion
factors are applied to claims paid through the period-end date to estimate the ultimate claim expense incurred for the period. Actuarial
estimates of incurred but not paid claim liabilities are then determined by subtracting the actual paid claims from the estimate of the
ultimate incurred claims. 
For the most recent incurred months (typically the most recent two months), the percentage of claims paid for claims incurred in
those months is generally low. This makes the completion factor methodology less reliable for such months. Therefore, incurred
claims for recent months are not projected from historical completion and payment patterns; rather, they are projected by estimating
the claims expense for those months based on recent claims expense levels and healthcare trend levels (“trend factors”).
Because the reserve methodology is based upon historical information, it must be adjusted for known or suspected operational and
environmental changes. These adjustments are made by our actuaries based on their knowledge and their estimate of emerging impacts
to benefit costs and payment speed. Circumstances to be considered in developing our best estimate of reserves include changes in
utilization levels, unit costs, mix of business, benefit plan designs, provider reimbursement levels, processing system conversions and
changes, claim inventory levels, claim processing patterns, claim submission patterns and operational changes resulting from business
combinations. A comparison of prior period liabilities to re-estimated claim liabilities based on subsequent claims development is also
considered in making the liability determination. In our comparison to prior periods, the methods and assumptions are not changed as
reserves are recalculated; rather, the availability of additional paid claims information drives changes in the re-estimate of the unpaid
claim liability. To the extent appropriate, changes in such development are recorded as a change to current period benefit expense. The
impact from COVID-19 on healthcare utilization and medical claims submission patterns has increased estimation uncertainty on our
incurred but not reported liability at December 31, 2021. Slowdowns in claims submission patterns and increases in utilization levels
for COVID-19 testing and treatment during 2021 are the primary factors that lead to the increased estimation uncertainty.
We regularly review and set assumptions regarding cost trends and utilization when initially establishing claim liabilities. We
continually monitor and adjust the claims liability and benefit expense based on subsequent paid claims activity. If it is determined that
our assumptions regarding cost trends and utilization are materially different than actual results, our income statement and financial
position could be impacted in future periods. Adjustments of prior year estimates may result in additional benefit expense or a
reduction of benefit expense in the period an adjustment is made. Further, due to the considerable variability of healthcare costs,
adjustments to claim liabilities occur each period and are sometimes significant as compared to the net income recorded in that period.
Prior period development is recognized immediately upon the actuary’s judgment that a portion of the prior period liability is no
longer needed or that an additional liability should have been accrued. That determination is made when sufficient information is
available to ascertain that the re-estimate of the liability is reasonable.
While there are many factors that are used as a part of the estimation of our medical claims payable liability, the two key
assumptions having the most significant impact on our incurred but not paid claims liability as of December 31, 2021 were the
completion and trend factors. As discussed above, these two key assumptions can be influenced by utilization levels, unit costs, mix of
business, benefit plan designs, provider reimbursement levels, processing system conversions and changes, claim inventory levels,
claim processing patterns, claim submission patterns and operational changes resulting from business combinations.
-55-
There is variation in the reasonable choice of completion factors by duration for durations of three months through twelve months
where the completion factors have the most significant impact. As previously discussed, completion factors tend to be less reliable for
the most recent months and therefore are not specifically utilized for months one and two. In our analysis for the claim liabilities at
December 31, 2021, the variability in months three to five was estimated to be between 40 and 90 basis points, while months six
through twelve have much lower estimated variability ranging from 0 to 30 basis points.
The difference in completion factor assumptions results in variability of 2%, or approximately $242, in the December 31, 2021
incurred but not paid claims liability, depending on the completion factors chosen. It is important to note that the completion factor
methodology inherently assumes that historical completion rates will be reflective of the current period. However, it is possible that
the actual completion rates for the current period will develop differently from historical patterns and therefore could fall outside the
possible variations described herein.
The other major assumption used in the establishment of the December 31, 2021 incurred but not paid claim liability was the
trend factors. In our analysis for the period ended December 31, 2021, there was a 320 basis point differential in the high and low
trend factors. This range of trend factors would imply variability of 4%, or approximately $487, in the incurred but not paid claims
liability, depending upon the trend factors used. Because historical trend factors are often not representative of current claim trends,
the trend experience for the most recent six to nine months, plus knowledge of recent events likely affecting current trends, have been
taken into consideration in establishing the incurred but not paid claims liability at December 31, 2021. The COVID-19 pandemic
continues to have a significant impact on 2021 dates of service. Our expenses associated with COVID-19 accelerated in the fourth
quarter of 2021, partially offset by the benefit from a lower volume of healthcare claims attributable to decreased utilization of non-
COVID-19 health services. We will continue to monitor emerging experience in order to better understand the possible implications to
our reserves.
See Note 12, “Medical Claims Payable,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this
Annual Report on Form 10-K, for a reconciliation of the beginning and ending balance for medical claims payable for the years ended
December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019. Components of the total incurred claims for each year include amounts accrued for current year
estimated claims expense as well as adjustments to prior year estimated accruals. In Note 12, “Medical Claims Payable,” the line
labeled “Net incurred medical claims: Prior years redundancies” accounts for those adjustments made to prior year estimates. The
impact of any reduction of “Net incurred medical claims: Prior years redundancies” may be offset as we establish the estimate of “Net
incurred medical claims: Current year.” Our reserving practice is to consistently recognize the actuarial best estimate of our ultimate
liability for our claims. When we recognize a release of the redundancy, we disclose the amount that is not in the ordinary course of
business, if material.  
The ratio of current year medical claims paid as a percent of current year net medical claims incurred was 87.8% for 2021, 87.7%
for 2020 and 89.3% for 2019. This ratio serves as an indicator of claims processing speed whereby 2021 claims were processed at a
similar speed to 2020, but slower than in 2019.
We calculate the percentage of prior year redundancies in the current year as a percent of prior year net incurred claims payable
less prior year redundancies in the current year in order to demonstrate the development of the prior year reserves. For the year ended
December 31, 2021, this metric was 18.1%, reflecting the estimation uncertainty due to COVID-19 at the end of 2020, and was largely
driven by favorable trend factor development at the end of 2020 as well as favorable completion factor development from 2020. For
the year ended December 31, 2020, this metric was 8.0%, largely driven by favorable trend factor development at the end of 2019 as
well as favorable completion factor development from 2019. For the year ended December 31, 2019, this metric was 7.4%, largely
driven by favorable trend factor development at the end of 2018 as well as favorable completion factor development from 2018.
We calculate the percentage of prior year redundancies in the current year as a percent of prior year net incurred medical claims to
indicate the percentage of redundancy included in the preceding year calculation of current year net incurred medical claims. We
believe this calculation supports the reasonableness of our prior year estimate of incurred medical claims and the consistency in our
methodology. For the year ended December 31, 2021, this metric was 2%, which was calculated using the redundancy of $1,703. This
metric was 0.8% for 2020 and 0.7% for 2019. We believe these metrics support the reasonableness of our estimates. The 2021 metric
was impacted by the estimation uncertainty due to COVID-19.
-56-
The following table shows the variance between total net incurred medical claims as reported in Note 12, “Medical Claims
Payable,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K, for each
of 2020 and 2019 and the incurred claims for such years had it been determined retrospectively (computed as the difference between
“net incurred medical claims – current year” for the year shown and “net incurred medical claims – prior years redundancies” for the
immediately following year):
 Years Ended December 31
 2020 2019
Total net incurred medical claims, as reported $ 84,457 $ 78,195 
Retrospective basis, as described above 83,391 78,058 
Variance $ 1,066 $ 137 
Variance to total net incurred medical claims, as reported 1.3 % 0.2 %
Given that our business is primarily short tailed (which means that medical claims are generally paid within twelve months of the
member receiving service from the provider), the variance to total net incurred medical claims, as reported above, is used to assess the
reasonableness of our estimate of ultimate incurred medical claims for a given calendar year with the benefit of one year of
experience. We expect that substantially all of the development of the 2021 estimate of medical claims payable will be known during
2022.
The 2020 variance to total net incurred medical claims, as reported of 1.3% was greater than the 2019 percentage of 0.2%. This
was driven by the fact that the change in the prior year redundancy reported for 2020 as compared to 2019 was greater than the change
in the prior year redundancy reported for 2019 as compared to 2018.
Income Taxes
We account for income taxes in accordance with the Financial Accounting Standards Board (“FASB”) guidance, which requires,
among other things, the separate recognition of deferred tax assets and deferred tax liabilities. Such deferred tax assets and deferred
tax liabilities represent the tax effect of temporary differences between financial reporting and tax reporting measured at tax rates
enacted at the time the deferred tax asset or liability is recorded. A valuation allowance must be established for deferred tax assets if it
is “more likely than not” that all or a portion may be unrealized. Our judgment is required in determining an appropriate valuation
allowance.
At each financial reporting date, we assess the adequacy of the valuation allowance by evaluating each of our deferred tax assets
based on the following:
•the types of temporary differences that created the deferred tax asset;
•the amount of taxes paid in prior periods and available for a carry-back claim;
•the tax rate at which the deferred tax assets will likely be utilized in the future;
•the forecasted future taxable income, and therefore, likely future deduction of the deferred tax item; and
•any significant other issues impacting the likely realization of the benefit of the temporary differences.
We, like other companies, frequently face challenges from tax authorities regarding the amount of taxes due. These challenges
include questions regarding the timing and amount of deductions that we have taken on our tax returns. In evaluating any additional
tax liability associated with various positions taken in our tax return filings, we record additional liabilities for potential adverse tax
outcomes. Based on our evaluation of our tax positions, we believe we have appropriately accrued for uncertain tax benefits, as
required by the applicable guidance. To the extent we prevail in matters we have accrued for, our future effective tax rate would be
reduced and net income would increase. If we are required to pay more than accrued, our future effective tax rate would increase and
net income would decrease. Our effective tax rate and net income in any given future period could be materially impacted.
In the ordinary course of business, we are regularly audited by federal and other tax authorities, and from time to time, these
audits result in proposed assessments. We believe our tax positions comply with applicable tax law, and we intend to defend our
positions vigorously through the federal, state and local appeals processes. We believe we have adequately
-57-
provided for any reasonably foreseeable outcome related to these matters. Accordingly, although their ultimate resolution may require
additional tax payments, we do not anticipate any material impact on our results of operations or financial condition from these
matters.
For additional information, see Note 8, “Income Taxes,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II,
Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets
Our consolidated goodwill at December 31, 2021 was $24,228 and other intangible assets were $10,615. The sum of goodwill and
other intangible assets represented 35.8% of our total consolidated assets and 96.6% of our consolidated shareholders’ equity at
December 31, 2021.
We follow FASB guidance for business combinations and goodwill and other intangible assets, which specifies the types of
acquired intangible assets that are required to be recognized and reported separately from goodwill. Under the guidance, goodwill and
other intangible assets (with indefinite lives) are not amortized but are tested for impairment at least annually. Furthermore, goodwill
and other intangible assets are allocated to reporting units for purposes of the annual impairment test. Our impairment tests require us
to make assumptions and judgments regarding the estimated fair value of our reporting units, which include goodwill and other
intangible assets. In addition, certain other intangible assets with indefinite lives, such as trademarks, are also tested separately.
We complete our annual impairment tests of existing goodwill and other intangible assets with indefinite lives during the fourth
quarter of each year. These tests involve the use of estimates related to the fair value of goodwill at the reporting unit level and other
intangible assets with indefinite lives, and require a significant degree of management judgment and the use of subjective assumptions.
Certain interim impairment tests are also performed when potential impairment indicators exist or changes in our business or other
triggering events occur. We have the option of first performing a qualitative assessment for each reporting unit to determine whether it
is more likely than not that the fair value of a reporting unit is less than its carrying amount, which is an indication that our goodwill
may be impaired. These qualitative impairment tests include assessing events and factors that could affect the fair value of the
indefinite-lived intangible assets. Our procedures include assessing our financial performance, macroeconomic conditions, industry
and market considerations, various asset specific factors and entity specific events. If we determine that a reporting unit’s goodwill
may be impaired after utilizing these qualitative impairment analysis procedures, we are required to perform a quantitative impairment
test.
Our quantitative impairment test utilizes the projected income and market valuation approaches for goodwill and the projected
income approach for our indefinite lived intangible assets. Use of the projected income and market valuation approaches for our
goodwill impairment test reflects our view that both valuation methodologies provide a reasonable estimate of fair value. The
projected income approach is developed using assumptions about future revenue, expenses and net income derived from our internal
planning process. These estimated future cash flows are then discounted. Our assumed discount rate is based on our industry’s
weighted-average cost of capital. Market valuations are based on observed multiples of certain measures including revenue; earnings
before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization; and book value of invested capital (debt and equity) and include market
comparisons to publicly traded companies in our industry.
We did not incur any impairment losses as a result of our 2021 annual impairment tests, as it was determined that it is more likely
than not that the estimated fair values of our reporting units were substantially in excess of the carrying values as of December 31,
2021. Additionally, we do not believe that the estimated fair values of our reporting units are at risk of becoming impaired in the next
twelve months.
If estimated fair values are less than the carrying values of goodwill and other intangibles with indefinite lives in future annual
impairment tests, or if significant impairment indicators are noted relative to other intangible assets subject to amortization, we may be
required to record impairment losses against future income.
For additional information, see Note 3, “Business Acquisitions” and Note 10, “Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets,” of the
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. 
-58-
Investments
Current and long-term marketable investment securities were $28,780 at December 31, 2021 and represented 29.5% of our total
consolidated assets at December 31, 2021. We classify fixed maturity securities in our investment portfolio as “available-for-sale” and
report those securities at fair value. Certain fixed maturity securities are available to support current operations and, accordingly, we
classify such investments as current assets without regard to their contractual maturity. Investments used to satisfy contractual,
regulatory or other requirements are classified as long-term, without regard to contractual maturity.
Our impairment review is subjective and requires a high degree of judgment. We conduct this review on a quarterly basis, using
both qualitative and quantitative factors. Such factors considered include the extent to which a security’s market value has been less
than its cost, the reasons for the decline in value (i.e., credit event compared to liquidity, general credit spread widening, currency
exchange rate or interest rate factors), financial condition and near term prospects of the issuer, including the credit ratings and
changes in the credit ratings of the issuer, recommendations of investment advisors, and forecasts of economic, market or industry
trends.
Prior to 2020, our fixed maturity securities were evaluated for other-than-temporary impairment where credit-related impairments
were presented within the other-than-temporary impairment losses recognized in our consolidated statements of income with an
adjustment to the security’s amortized cost basis. Effective January 1, 2020, if a fixed maturity security is in an unrealized loss
position and we have the intent to sell the fixed maturity security, or it is more likely than not that we will have to sell the fixed
maturity security before recovery of its amortized cost basis, we write down the fixed maturity security’s cost basis to fair value and
record an impairment loss in our consolidated statements of income. For impaired fixed maturity securities that we do not intend to
sell or if it is more likely than not that we will not have to sell such securities, but we expect that we will not fully recover the
amortized cost basis, we recognize the credit component of the impairment as an allowance for credit loss in our consolidated balance
sheets and record an impairment loss in our consolidated statements of income. The non-credit component of the impairment is
recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income. Furthermore, unrealized losses entirely caused by non-credit-related factors
related to fixed maturity securities for which we expect to fully recover the amortized cost basis continue to be recognized in
accumulated other comprehensive income.
The credit component of an impairment is determined primarily by comparing the net present value of projected future cash flows
with the amortized cost basis of the fixed maturity security. The net present value is calculated by discounting our best estimate of
projected future cash flows at the effective interest rate implicit in the fixed maturity security at the date of purchase. For mortgage-
backed and asset-backed securities, cash flow estimates are based on assumptions regarding the underlying collateral, including
prepayment speeds, vintage, type of underlying asset, geographic concentrations, default rates, recoveries and changes in value. For all
other securities, cash flow estimates are driven by assumptions regarding probability of default, including changes in credit ratings and
estimates regarding timing and amount of recoveries associated with a default.
We have a committee of accounting and investment associates and management that is responsible for managing the impairment
review process. We believe that we have adequately reviewed our investment securities for impairment and that our investment
securities are carried at fair value. We have established an allowance for credit loss and recorded credit loss expense as a reflection of
our expected impairment losses. Given the inherent uncertainty of changes in market conditions and the significant judgments
involved, there is continuing risk that declines in fair value may occur and additional impairment losses on investments may be
recorded in future periods.
In addition to marketable investment securities, we held additional long-term investments of $5,225, or 5.4% of total consolidated
assets, at December 31, 2021. These long-term investments consisted primarily of certain other equity investments, the cash surrender
value of corporate-owned life insurance policies, mortgage loans and real estate. Due to their less liquid nature, these investments are
classified as long-term.
Through our investing activities, we are exposed to financial market risks, including those resulting from changes in interest rates
and changes in equity market valuations. We manage market risks through our investment policy, which establishes credit quality
limits and limits on investments in individual issuers. Ineffective management of these risks could have an impact on our future results
of operations and financial condition. Our investment portfolio includes fixed maturity securities with a fair value of $26,899 at
December 31, 2021. The weighted-average credit rating of these securities was “A”
-59-
as of December 31, 2021. Included in this balance are investments in fixed maturity securities of states, municipalities and political
subdivisions of $1,095 that are guaranteed by third parties. With the exception of nineteen securities with a fair value of $27, these
securities are all investment-grade and carry a weighted-average credit rating of “AA” as of December 31, 2021. The securities are
guaranteed by a number of different guarantors, and we do not have any material exposure to any single guarantor, neither indirectly
through the guarantees, nor directly through investment in the guarantor. Further, due to the high underlying credit rating of the
issuers, the weighted-average credit rating of the fixed maturity securities without a guarantee, for which such information is available,
was “A” as of December 31, 2021.
Fair values of fixed maturity and equity securities are based on quoted market prices, where available. These fair values are
obtained primarily from third-party pricing services, which generally use Level I or Level II inputs for the determination of fair value
in accordance with FASB guidance for fair value measurements and disclosures. We have controls in place to review the pricing
services’ qualifications and procedures used to determine fair values. In addition, we periodically review the pricing services’ pricing
methodologies, data sources and pricing inputs to ensure the fair values obtained are reasonable.
We obtain quoted market prices for each security from the pricing services, which are derived through recently reported trades for
identical or similar securities, making adjustments through the reporting date based upon available market observable information. For
securities not actively traded, the pricing services may use quoted market prices of comparable instruments or discounted cash flow
analyses, incorporating inputs that are currently observable in the markets for similar securities. Inputs that are often used in these
valuation methodologies include, but are not limited to, broker quotes, benchmark yields, credit spreads, default rates and prepayment
speeds. As we are responsible for the determination of fair value, we perform analysis on the prices received from the pricing services
to determine whether the prices are reasonable estimates of fair value. Our analysis includes procedures such as a review of month-to-
month price fluctuations and price comparisons to secondary pricing services. There were no adjustments to quoted market prices
obtained from the pricing services during the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020.
In certain circumstances, it may not be possible to derive pricing model inputs from observable market activity, and therefore,
such inputs are estimated internally. Such securities are designated Level III in accordance with FASB guidance. Securities designated
Level III at December 31, 2021 totaled $449 and represented approximately 1.3% of our total assets measured at fair value on a
recurring basis. Our Level III securities primarily consisted of certain corporate securities and equity securities for which observable
inputs were not always available and the fair values of these securities were estimated using inputs including, but not limited to,
prepayment speeds, credit spreads, default rates and benchmark yields.
For additional information, see Part II, Item 7A, “Quantitative and Qualitative Disclosures about Market Risk,” and Note 2,
“Basis of Presentation and Significant Accounting Policies,” Note 5, “Investments,” and Note 7, “Fair Value,” of the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Retirement Benefits
Pension Benefits
We sponsor defined benefit pension plans for some of our employees. These plans are accounted for in accordance with FASB
guidance for retirement benefits, which requires that amounts recognized in financial statements be determined on an actuarial basis.
As permitted by the guidance, we calculate the value of plan assets as described below. Further, the difference between our expected
rate of return and the actual performance of plan assets, as well as certain changes in pension liabilities, are amortized over future
periods. 
An important factor in determining our pension expense is the assumption for expected long-term return on plan assets. As of our
December 31, 2021 measurement date, we selected a weighted-average long-term rate of return on plan assets of 5.02%. We use a total
portfolio return analysis in the development of our assumption. Factors such as past market performance, the long-term relationship
between fixed maturity and equity securities, interest rates, inflation and asset allocations are considered in the assumption. The
assumption includes an estimate of the additional return expected from active management of the investment portfolio. Peer data and
an average of historical returns are also reviewed for appropriateness of the selected assumption. We believe our assumption of future
returns is reasonable. However, if we lower our expected long-term return on plan assets, future contributions to the pension plan and
pension expense would likely increase.
-60-
This assumed long-term rate of return on assets is applied to a calculated value of plan assets, which recognizes changes in the
fair value of plan assets in a systematic manner over three years, producing the expected return on plan assets that is included in the
determination of pension expense. We apply a corridor approach to amortize unrecognized actuarial gains or losses. Under this
approach, only accumulated net actuarial gains or losses in excess of 10% of the greater of the projected benefit obligation or the fair
value of plan assets are amortized over the average remaining service or lifetime of the workforce as a component of pension expense.
The net deferral of past asset gains or losses affects the calculated value of plan assets and, ultimately, future pension expense. 
The discount rate reflects the current rate at which the pension liabilities could be effectively settled at the end of the year based
on our most recent measurement date. We use the annual spot rate approach for setting our discount rate. Under the spot rate approach,
individual spot rates from a full yield curve of published rates are used to discount each plan’s cash flows to determine the plan’s
obligation. At the December 31, 2021 measurement date, the weighted-average discount rate under the annual spot rate approach was
2.70%, compared to 2.24% at the December 31, 2020 measurement date. The net effect of changes in the discount rate, as well as the
net effect of other changes in actuarial assumptions and experience, have been deferred and amortized as a component of pension
expense in accordance with FASB guidance.
In managing the plan assets, our objective is to be a responsible fiduciary while minimizing financial risk. Plan assets include a
diversified mix of equity securities, investment grade fixed maturity securities and other types of investments across a range of sectors
and levels of capitalization to maximize long-term return for a prudent level of risk. In addition to producing a reasonable return, the
investment strategy seeks to minimize the volatility in our expense and cash flow.
Other Postretirement Benefits
We provide some associates with certain medical, vision and dental benefits upon retirement. We use various actuarial
assumptions, including a discount rate and the expected trend in healthcare costs, to estimate the costs and benefit obligations for our
retiree benefits.
At our December 31, 2021 measurement date, the selected discount rate for all plans was 2.49%, compared to a discount rate of
1.99% at the December 31, 2020 measurement rate. We developed this rate using the annual spot rate approach as described above.
The assumed healthcare cost trend rates used to measure the expected cost of pre-Medicare (those who are not currently eligible
for Medicare benefits) other benefits at our December 31, 2021 measurement date was 7.00% for 2022 with a gradual decline to
4.50% by the year 2033. The assumed healthcare cost trend rates used to measure the expected cost of post-Medicare (those who are
currently eligible for Medicare benefits) other benefits at our December 31, 2021 measurement date was 5.50% for 2022 with a
gradual decline to 4.50% by the year 2033. These estimated trend rates are subject to change in the future.
For additional information regarding our retirement benefits, see Note 11, “Retirement Benefits,” of the Notes to Consolidated
Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
New Accounting Pronouncements
For information regarding new accounting pronouncements that were issued or became effective during the year ended
December 31, 2021 that had, or are expected to have, a material impact on our financial position, results of operations or financial
statement disclosures, see the “Recently Adopted Accounting Guidance” and “Recent Accounting Guidance Not Yet Adopted” sections
of Note 2, “Basis of Presentation and Significant Accounting Policies,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in
Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Liquidity and Capital Resources
Introduction
Our cash receipts result primarily from premiums, product revenue, administrative fees and other revenue, investment income,
proceeds from the sale or maturity of our investment securities, proceeds from borrowings, and proceeds from the issuance of common
stock under our employee stock plans. Cash disbursements result mainly from claims payments,
-61-
administrative expenses, taxes, purchases of investment securities, interest expense, payments on borrowings, acquisitions, capital
expenditures, repurchases of our debt securities and common stock and the payment of cash dividends. Cash outflows fluctuate with
the amount and timing of settlement of these transactions. Any future decline in our profitability would likely have an unfavorable
impact on our liquidity.
We manage our cash, investments and capital structure so we are able to meet the short-term and long-term obligations of our
business while maintaining financial flexibility and liquidity. We forecast, analyze and monitor our cash flows to enable investment
and financing within the overall constraints of our financial strategy.
A substantial portion of the assets held by our regulated subsidiaries are in the form of cash and cash equivalents and investments.
After considering expected cash flows from operating activities, we generally invest cash that exceeds our near term obligations in
longer term marketable fixed maturity securities to improve our overall investment income returns. Our investment strategy is to make
investments consistent with insurance statutes and other regulatory requirements, while preserving our asset base. Our investments are
generally available-for-sale to meet liquidity and other needs. Our subsidiaries pay out excess capital annually in the form of dividends
to their respective parent companies for general corporate use, as permitted by applicable regulations.
The availability of financing in the form of debt or equity is influenced by many factors, including our profitability, operating cash
flows, debt levels, debt ratings, contractual restrictions, regulatory requirements and market conditions. The securities and credit
markets have in the past experienced higher than normal volatility, although current market conditions are more stable. Interest rates
on fixed income securities are expected to rise in 2022, which could increase our borrowing costs if we elect to issue debt. During
recent years, the federal government and various governmental agencies have taken a number of steps to strengthen the regulation of
the financial services market. In addition, governments around the world have developed their own plans to provide stability and
security in the credit markets and to ensure adequate capital in certain financial institutions. Further, in response to the COVID-19
pandemic, the federal government has established a number of programs to provide liquidity to the financial system that provides
lending to states, municipalities, and eligible businesses. 
A summary of our major sources and uses of cash and cash equivalents for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 is
as follows:
 Years Ended December  31 $ Change
 2021 2020 2019 2021 vs. 2020 2020 vs. 2019
Sour ces of Cash:
Net cash provided by operating activities $ 8,364 $ 10,688 $ 6,061 $ (2,324) $ 4,627 
Issuances of commercial paper and short- and long-term debt, net
of repayments 2,719 — 608 2,719 (608)
Issuances of common stock under employee stock plans 203 176 187 27 (11)
Other sources of cash, net — 315 — (315) 315 
Total sources of cash 11,286 11,179 6,856 107 4,323 
Uses of Cash:
Purchases of investments, net of proceeds from sales, maturities,
calls and redemptions (4,056) (3,433) (1,919) (623) (1,514)
Repurchase and retirement of common stock (1,900) (2,700) (1,701) 800 (999)
Purchases of subsidiaries, net of cash acquired (3,476) (1,976) — (1,500) (1,976)
Purchases of property and equipment (1,087) (1,021) (1,077) (66) 56 
Repayments of commercial paper and short- and long-term debt,
net of issuances — (298) — 298 (298)
Cash dividends (1,104) (954) (818) (150) (136)
Other uses of cash, net (514) — (338) (514) 338 
Total uses of cash (12,137) (10,382) (5,853) (1,755) (4,529)
Effect of foreign exchange rates on cash and cash equivalents (10) 7 — (17) 7 
Net (decrease) increase in cash and cash equivalents $ (861) $ 804 $ 1,003 $ (1,665) $ (199)
-62-
Liquidity—Year Ended December 31, 2021 Compared to Year Ended December 31, 2020
The decrease in cash provided by operating activities was primarily due to the impact of working capital changes year-over-year,
including an increase in receivables and a decline in accounts payable and accrued expenses, partially offset by higher net income in
2021.
Other significant changes in sources and uses of cash year-over-year included an increase in net proceeds received from the
issuance of commercial paper and short-term and long-term debt, net of repayments and reduced amounts for the repurchase and
retirement of our common stock, partially offset by an increase in cash paid for the purchases of subsidiaries, net of cash acquired.
Financial Condition
We maintained a strong financial condition and liquidity position, with consolidated cash, cash equivalents and investments in
fixed maturity and equity securities of $33,660 at December 31, 2021. Since December 31, 2020, total cash, cash equivalents and
investments in fixed maturity and equity securities increased by $2,365, primarily due to cash generated from operations. This increase
was partially offset by cash used for acquisitions, common stock repurchases, purchases of property and equipment and cash dividends
paid to shareholders.
Many of our subsidiaries are subject to various government regulations that restrict the timing and amount of dividends and other
distributions that may be paid to their respective parent companies. Certain accounting practices prescribed by insurance regulatory
authorities, or statutory accounting practices, differ from GAAP. Changes that occur in statutory accounting practices, if any, could
impact our subsidiaries’ future dividend capacity. In addition, we have agreed to certain undertakings to regulatory authorities,
including the requirement to maintain certain capital levels in certain of our subsidiaries.
At December 31, 2021, we held $1,194 of cash, cash equivalents and investments at the parent company, which are available for
general corporate use, including investment in our businesses, acquisitions, potential future common stock repurchases and dividends
to shareholders, repurchases of debt securities and debt and interest payments. 
Periodically, we access capital markets and issue debt (“Notes”) for long-term borrowing purposes, for example, to refinance
debt, to finance acquisitions or for share repurchases. Certain of these Notes may have a call feature that allows us to redeem the Notes
at any time at our option and/or a put feature that allows a Note holder to redeem the Notes upon the occurrence of both a change in
control event and a downgrade of the Notes below an investment grade rating. For more information on our debt, including
redemptions and issuances, see Note 13, “Debt” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this
Annual Report on Form 10-K.
We calculate our consolidated debt-to-capital ratio, a non-GAAP measure, from the amounts presented on our audited
consolidated balance sheets included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K. Our debt-to-capital ratio is calculated as
total debt divided by total debt plus total shareholders’ equity. Total debt is the sum of short-term borrowings, current portion of long-
term debt and long-term debt, less current portion. We believe our debt-to-capital ratio assists investors and rating agencies in
measuring our overall leverage and additional borrowing capacity. In addition, our bank covenants include a maximum debt-to-capital
ratio that we cannot and did not exceed. Our debt-to-capital ratio may not be comparable to similarly titled measures reported by other
companies. Our consolidated debt-to-capital ratio was 38.9% and 37.6% as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Our senior debt is rated “A” by S&P Global, “BBB” by Fitch Ratings, Inc., “Baa2” by Moody’s Investor Service, Inc. and “bbb+”
by AM Best Company, Inc. We intend to maintain our senior debt investment grade ratings. If our credit ratings are downgraded, our
business, financial condition and results of operations could be adversely impacted by limitations on future borrowings and a potential
increase in our borrowing costs.
Capital Resources
We have a shelf registration statement on file with the SEC to register an unlimited amount of any combination of debt or equity
securities in one or more offerings. Specific information regarding terms and securities being offered will be provided at the time of an
offering. Proceeds from future offerings are expected to be used for general corporate purposes,
-63-
including, but not limited to, the repayment of debt, investments in or extensions of credit to our subsidiaries and the financing of
possible acquisitions or business expansions.
We have a senior revolving credit facility (the “5-Year Facility”) available in the amount of $2,500 with a group of lenders for
general corporate purposes. On June 3, 2021, we terminated our 364-day senior revolving credit facility, which was scheduled to
mature in June 2021 (the “prior 364-Day Facility”), and entered into a new 364-day senior revolving credit facility (the “new 364-Day
Facility” and together with the 5-Year Facility, the “Credit Facilities”) with a group of lenders for general corporate purposes. The new
364-Day Facility provides for credit in the amount of $1,000 and matures in June 2022. Our ability to borrow under these Credit
Facilities is subject to compliance with certain covenants, including covenants requiring us to maintain a defined debt-to-capital ratio
of not more than 60%, subject to increase in certain circumstances set forth in the applicable credit agreement. We do not believe the
restrictions contained in these covenants materially affect our financial or operating flexibility. As of December 31, 2021, we were in
compliance with all of our debt covenants. There were no amounts outstanding under the 5-Year Facility or the new 364-Day Facility
at December 31, 2021.
Through certain subsidiaries, we have entered into multiple 364-day lines of credit (the “Subsidiary Credit Facilities”) with
separate lenders for general corporate purposes. The Subsidiary Credit Facilities provide combined credit up to $200. Our ability to
borrow under the Subsidiary Credit Facilities is subject to compliance with certain covenants. At December 31, 2021, we had no
outstanding borrowings under the Subsidiary Credit Facilities.
We have a $3,500 commercial paper program, the proceeds of which may be used for general corporate purposes. Should
commercial paper issuance be unavailable, we have the ability to use a combination of cash on hand and/or our Credit Facilities,
which provide for combined credit in the amount of $3,500, to redeem any outstanding commercial paper upon maturity. While there
is no assurance in the current economic environment, we believe the lenders participating in our credit facilities, if market conditions
allow, would be willing to provide financing in accordance with their legal obligations. At December 31, 2021, we had $300
outstanding under our commercial paper program.
We are a member, through certain subsidiaries, of the Federal Home Loan Bank of Indianapolis, the Federal Home Loan Bank of
Cincinnati, the Federal Home Loan Bank of Atlanta and the Federal Home Loan Bank of New York, collectively (the “FHLBs”). As a
member, we have the ability to obtain short-term cash advances, subject to certain minimum collateral requirements. At December 31,
2021, we had $275 outstanding short-term borrowings from the FHLBs.
As discussed in “Financial Condition” above, many of our subsidiaries are subject to various government regulations that restrict
the timing and amount of dividends and other distributions that may be paid. Based upon these requirements, we currently estimate
that approximately $3,000 of dividends will be paid to the parent company during 2022. During 2021, we received $3,134 of
dividends from our subsidiaries.
In addition to regulations regarding the timing and amount of dividends, our regulated subsidiaries’ states of domicile have
statutory risk-based capital (“RBC”) requirements for health and other insurance companies and HMOs largely based on the National
Association of Insurance Commissioners (“NAIC”) Risk-Based Capital (RBC) For Health Organizations Model Act (“RBC Model
Act”). These RBC requirements are intended to measure capital adequacy, taking into account the risk characteristics of an insurer’s
investments and products. The NAIC sets forth the formula for calculating the RBC requirements, which are designed to take into
account asset risks, insurance risks, interest rate risks and other relevant risks with respect to an individual insurance company’s
business. In general, under the RBC Model Act, an insurance company must submit a report of its RBC level to the state insurance
department or insurance commissioner, as appropriate, at the end of each calendar year. Our regulated subsidiaries’ respective RBC
levels as of December 31, 2021, which was the most recent date for which reporting was required, were in excess of all applicable
mandatory RBC requirements. In addition to exceeding these RBC requirements, we are in compliance with the liquidity and capital
requirements for a licensee of the BCBSA and with the tangible net worth requirements applicable to certain of our California
subsidiaries. For additional information, see Note 22, “Statutory Information,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
-64-
Future Sources and Uses of Liquidity
Short-Term Liquidity Requirements
As previously described, our cash disbursements result mainly from claims payments, administrative expenses, taxes, purchases
of investment securities, interest expense, payments on borrowings, acquisitions, capital expenditures, repurchases of our debt
securities and common stock and the payment of cash dividends. We believe cash on hand, operating cash receipts, investments and
amounts available under our commercial paper and Credit Facilities will be adequate to fund our expected cash disbursements over the
next twelve months.
Long-Term Liquidity Requirements
As of December 31, 2021, our long-term cash disbursements required under various contractual obligations and commitments
were:
•Debt and interest expense: Future debt and estimated interest payments were $24,412, with $2,935 due within the next twelve
months. For additional information, see Note 13 “Debt” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II,
Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
•Operating leases: We lease office space and certain computer equipment, for which the future estimated payments were $1,092,
with $211 due within the next twelve months. For additional information, see Note 18 “Leases” of the Notes to Consolidated
Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
•Other liabilities: These liabilities primarily consist of future policy reserves, projected other postretirement benefits, deferred
compensation, supplemental executive retirement plan liabilities and certain other miscellaneous long-term obligations. Amounts
due within twelve months were $29, with $1,233 due in future periods. Estimated future payments for funded pension benefits
have been excluded from these numbers, as we had no funding requirements under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act
of 1974, as amended, at December 31, 2021, as a result of the value of the assets in the plans. In addition, gross liabilities for
uncertain tax positions and interest for which we cannot reasonably estimate the timing of the resolutions with the respective
taxing authorities have not been included. For further information, see Note 8, “Income Taxes,” of the Notes to Consolidated
Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
•Purchase obligations: These obligations include estimated payments for future services under contractual arrangements from
third-party service vendors. Amounts due within the next twelve months for these purchase obligations were $886, while longer
term payments were $5,048. For further information, see Note 14, “Commitments and Contingencies,” of the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
•Investment commitments: These include unfunded capital commitments for alternative investments and low-income housing tax
credits. Estimated amounts due were $1,558, including $249 due within the next twelve months.
In addition to the contractual obligations and commitments discussed above, we have a variety of other contractual agreements
related to acquiring materials and services used in our operations. However, we do not believe these other agreements contain material
noncancelable commitments. 
We regularly review the appropriate use of capital, including acquisitions, common stock and debt security repurchases and
dividends to shareholders. The declaration and payment of any dividends or repurchases of our common stock or debt is at the
discretion of our Board of Directors and depends upon our financial condition, results of operations, future liquidity needs, regulatory
and capital requirements and other factors deemed relevant by our Board of Directors.
On January 25, 2022, our Audit Committee declared a quarterly cash dividend to shareholders of $1.28 per share on the
outstanding shares of our common stock. This quarterly dividend is payable on March 25, 2022 to the shareholders of record as of
March 10, 2022.
Under our Board of Directors’ authorization, we maintain a common stock repurchase program. On January 26, 2021, our Audit
Committee, pursuant to authorization granted by the Board of Directors, authorized a $5,000 increase to our common stock repurchase
program. As of December 31, 2021, we had Board authorization of $4,192 to repurchase our common stock.
-65-
We believe that funds from future operating cash flows, cash and investments and funds available under our senior revolving
credit facilities and/or from public or private financing sources will be sufficient for future operations and commitments, and for
capital acquisitions and other strategic transactions.
We do not have any off-balance sheet derivative instruments, guarantee transactions, agreements or other contractual
arrangements or any indemnification agreements that will require funding in future periods. We have not transferred assets to an
unconsolidated entity that serves as credit, liquidity or market risk support to such entity. We do not hold any variable interest in an
unconsolidated entity where such entity provides us with financing, liquidity, market risk or credit risk support. See Note 2
“Subsidiary Transactions” of the Notes to Condensed Financial Statements included in Part III, Item 15 of this Annual Report on Form
10-K for additional detail on the Anthem, Inc. parent guarantees of certain subsidiaries.
ITEM 7A. QUANTITATIVE AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK. 
(In Millions, Except As Otherwise Stated Herein)
As a result of our investing and borrowing activities, we are exposed to financial market risks, including those resulting from
changes in interest rates and changes in market valuations. Potential impacts discussed below are based upon sensitivity analyses
performed on our financial position as of December 31, 2021. Actual results could vary from these estimates. Our primary objectives
with our investment portfolio are to provide safety and preservation of capital, sufficient liquidity to meet cash flow requirements, the
integration of investment strategy with the business operations and an attainment of a competitive after-tax total return.
Investments
Our investment portfolio is exposed to three primary sources of risk: credit quality risk, interest rate risk and market valuation
risk.
The primary risks associated with our fixed maturity securities, which are classified as available-for-sale, are credit quality risk
and interest rate risk. Credit quality risk is defined as the risk of a credit event, such as a ratings downgrade or default, to an individual
fixed maturity security and the potential loss attributable to that event. Credit quality risk is managed through our investment policy,
which establishes credit quality limitations on the overall portfolio as well as diversification and percentage limits on securities of
individual issuers. The result is a well-diversified portfolio of fixed maturity securities, with an average credit rating of approximately
“A.” Interest rate risk is defined as the potential for economic losses on fixed maturity securities due to a change in market interest
rates. Our fixed maturity portfolio is invested primarily in U.S. government securities, corporate bonds, asset-backed bonds, mortgage-
related securities and municipal bonds, all of which have exposure to changes in the level of market interest rates. Interest rate risk is
managed by maintaining asset duration within a band based upon our liabilities, operating performance and liquidity needs.
Additionally, we have the capability of holding any security to maturity, which would allow us to realize full par value.
Investments in fixed maturity securities include corporate securities, which account for 46.0% of our total fixed maturity
securities at December 31, 2021 and are subject to credit/default risk. In a declining economic environment, corporate yields will
usually increase, prompted by concern over the ability of corporations to make interest payments, thus causing a decrease in the price
of corporate securities, and the decline in value of the corporate fixed maturity portfolio. We manage this risk through fundamental
credit analysis, diversification of issuers and industries and an average credit rating of our corporate fixed maturity portfolio of
approximately “BBB.”
Market risk for fixed maturity securities is addressed by actively managing the duration, allocation and diversification of our
investment portfolio. We have evaluated the impact on the fixed maturity portfolio’s fair value considering an immediate 100 basis
point change in interest rates. A 100 basis point increase in interest rates would result in an approximate $1,114 decrease in fair value,
whereas a 100 basis point decrease in interest rates would result in an approximate $1,152 increase in fair value. While we classify our
fixed maturity securities as “available-for-sale” for accounting purposes, we believe our cash flows and the duration of our portfolio
should allow us to hold securities to maturity, thereby avoiding the recognition of losses should interest rates rise significantly.
Our equity portfolio is comprised of large capitalization and small capitalization domestic equities, foreign equities, exchange-
traded funds and index mutual funds. Our equity portfolio is subject to the volatility inherent in the stock market,
-66-
driven by concerns over economic conditions, earnings and sales growth, inflation, and consumer confidence. These systemic risks
cannot be managed through diversification alone. However, more routine risks, such as stock/industry specific risks, are managed by
investing in a diversified equity portfolio.
Our other invested assets, reported within our long-term investments, are primarily subject to private market exposures, including
private equity, real estate, and private credit investments. These investments are also indirectly subject to market valuation risk, as
public market valuations will form a basis for valuations for these investments. Given their illiquid nature, we focus on appropriate
sizing of these investments relative to our liquidity needs and risk tolerance. Our risk tolerance is formed by the level of illiquidity and
short-term price movements from market valuation risk we are willing to accept relative to the higher long-term expected returns over
the life of these investments.
As of December 31, 2021, 6.5% of our marketable investments were equity securities. An immediate 10% decrease in each equity
investment’s value, arising from market movement, would result in a fair value decrease of $188. Alternatively, an immediate 10%
increase in each equity investment’s value, attributable to the same factor, would result in a fair value increase of $188.
For additional information regarding our investments, see Note 5, “Investments,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial
Statements included in Part II, Item 8 and “Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates - Investments” within Part II, Item 7
“Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” included in this Annual Report on Form
10-K.
Long-Term Debt
Our total long-term debt at December 31, 2021 consisted of senior unsecured notes, convertible debentures, commercial paper and
subordinated surplus notes issued by one of our insurance subsidiaries. At December 31, 2021, the carrying value and estimated fair
value of our long-term debt was $22,756 and $26,136, respectively. This debt is subject to interest rate risk, as these instruments have
fixed interest rates and the fair value is affected by changes in market interest rates. Should interest rates increase or decrease in the
future, the estimated fair value of our fixed rate debt would decrease or increase accordingly.
For additional information regarding our long-term debt, see Note 7, “Fair Value” and Note 13, “Debt,” of the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Derivatives
We have exposure to economic losses due to interest rate risk arising from changes in the level or volatility of interest rates. We
attempt to mitigate our exposure to interest rate risk through the use of derivative financial instruments. These strategies include the
use of interest rate swaps and forward contracts, which are used to lock-in interest rates or to hedge (on an economic basis) interest
rate risks associated with variable rate debt. We have used these types of instruments as designated hedges against specific liabilities.
Changes in interest rates will affect the estimated fair value of these derivatives. As of December 31, 2021, we recorded a net
asset of $18, the estimated fair value of the swaps at that date. We have evaluated the impact on the interest rate swaps’ fair value
considering an immediate 100 basis point change in interest rates. A 100 basis point increase in interest rates would result in an
approximate $32 decrease in fair value, whereas a 100 basis point decrease in interest rates would result in an approximate $32
increase in fair value.
For additional information regarding our derivatives, see Note 6, “Derivative Financial Instruments” of the Notes to Consolidated
Financial Statements included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
-67-
ITEM 8. FINANCIAL STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA.
 
ANTHEM, INC.
 CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS
 Years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
 Contents
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm (PCAOB ID:42) 69
Audited Consolidated Financial Statements:
Consolidated Balance Sheets 71
Consolidated Statements of Income 72
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income 73
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows 74
Consolidated Statements of Shareholders’ Equity 75
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 76
-68-
Report of Independent Register ed
Public Accounting Firm
To the Shareholders and the Board of Directors of Anthem, Inc.
 
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Anthem, Inc. (the Company) as of December 31, 2021 and 2020,
the related consolidated statements of income, comprehensive income, shareholders’ equity, and cash flows for each of the three years
in the period ended December 31, 2021, and the related notes and financial statement schedule listed in the Index at Item 15(c)
(collectively referred to as the “consolidated financial statements”). In our opinion, the consolidated financial statements present fairly,
in all material respects, the financial position of the Company at December 31, 2021 and 2020, and the results of its operations and its
cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2021, in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting
principles.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2021, based on criteria established in Internal
Control-Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (2013
framework), and our report dated February 16, 2022 expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
 
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the
Company’s financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to
be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and
regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit
to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement, whether due to error or fraud.
Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the financial statements, whether due to
error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures included examining, on a test basis, evidence
regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also included evaluating the accounting principles used
and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall presentation of the financial statements. We believe
that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matter
The critical audit matter communicated below is a matter arising from the current period audit of the financial statements that was
communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that: (1) relates to accounts or disclosures that are material
to the financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective, or complex judgments. The communication of the
critical audit matter does not alter in any way our opinion on the consolidated financial statements, taken as a whole, and we are not,
by communicating the critical audit matter below, providing a separate opinion on the critical audit matter or on the account or
disclosures to which it relates.
-69-
Valuation of Incurred but Not Paid Claims
Description of the
MatterMedical claims payable was $13,518 million at December 31, 2021, a significant portion of which related
to the Company’s estimate for claims that are incurred but not paid. As discussed in Note 2 to the
consolidated financial statements, the Company’s liability for incurred but not paid claims is determined
using actuarial methods that include a number of factors and assumptions, including completion factors,
which represent the average percentage of total incurred claims that have been paid through a given date
after being incurred based on historical paid claims data, and trend factors, which represent an estimate of
claims expense based on recent claims expense levels and healthcare cost levels. There is significant
uncertainty inherent in determining management’s best estimate of completion and trend factors, which are
used to calculate actuarial estimates of incurred but not paid claims.
Auditing management’s estimate of incurred but not paid claims was complex and required the
involvement of our actuarial specialists due to the highly judgmental nature of the completion and trend
factor assumptions used in the valuation process. The significant judgment was primarily due to the
sensitivity of management’s best estimate of completion and trend factor assumptions, which have a
significant impact on the valuation of incurred but not paid claims.
How We Addressed
the Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design and tested the operating effectiveness of controls over
the Company’s actuarial process for estimating the liability for incurred but not paid claims. These audit
procedures included among others, testing management review controls over completion and trend factor
assumptions and the review and approval processes that management has in place for estimating the
liability for incurred but not paid claims.
To test the Company’s liability for incurred but not paid claims, our audit procedures included, among
others, testing the completeness and accuracy of the underlying claims and membership data recorded in
the source claims processing and disbursement systems to the data used by management in developing
completion and trend factor assumptions and agreeing a sample of incurred and paid claims to source
documentation. With the support of actuarial specialists, we analyzed the Company’s completion and trend
factor assumptions based on historical claim experience and emerging cost trends, and independently
calculated a range of reasonable reserve estimates for comparison to management’s best estimate of the
liability for incurred but not paid claims. Additionally, we performed a review of the prior period liabilities
for incurred but not paid claims to subsequent claims development.
                                    /s/ Ernst & Young LLP
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 1944.
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 16, 2022
-70-
Anthem, Inc.
Consolidated Balance Sheets
December 31,
2021December 31,
2020
(In millions, except share data)   
Assets
Current assets:
Cash and cash equivalents $ 4,880 $ 5,741 
Fixed maturity securities (amortized cost of $25,641 and $22,222; allowance for credit losses of $6 and $7) 26,267 23,433 
Equity securities 1,881 1,559 
Premium receivables 5,681 5,279 
Self-funded receivables 4,010 2,849 
Other receivables 3,749 2,830 
Other current assets 4,654 4,060 
Total current assets 51,122 45,751 
Long-term investments:
Fixed maturity securities (amortized cost of $616 and $532; allowance for credit losses of $0 and $0) 632 562 
Other invested assets 5,225 4,285 
Property and equipment, net 3,919 3,483 
Goodwill 24,228 21,691 
Other intangible assets 10,615 9,405 
Other noncurrent assets 1,719 1,438 
Total assets $ 97,460 $ 86,615 
Liabilities and shareholders’ equity
Liabilities
Current liabilities:
Medical claims payable $ 13,518 $ 11,359 
Other policyholder liabilities 5,521 4,590 
Unearned income 1,153 1,259 
Accounts payable and accrued expenses 4,970 5,493 
Short-term borrowings 275 — 
Current portion of long-term debt 1,599 700 
Other current liabilities 7,849 6,052 
Total current liabilities 34,885 29,453 
Long-term debt, less current portion 21,157 19,335 
Reserves for future policy benefits 802 794 
Deferred tax liabilities, net 2,805 2,019 
Other noncurrent liabilities 1,683 1,815 
Total liabilities 61,332 53,416 
Commitments and contingencies—Note 14
Shareholders’ equity
Preferred stock, without par value, shares authorized - 100,000,000; shares issued and outstanding - none — — 
Common stock, par value $0.01, shares authorized - 900,000,000; shares issued and outstanding - 241,770,746 and
245,401,430 2 3 
Additional paid-in capital 9,148 9,244 
Retained earnings 27,088 23,802 
Accumulated other comprehensive (loss) income (178) 150 
Total shareholders’ equity 36,060 33,199 
Noncontrolling interests 68 — 
Total equity 36,128 33,199 
Total liabilities and equity $ 97,460 $ 86,615 
See accompanying notes.
-71-
Anthem, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Income
 Years Ended December 31
(In millions, except per share data) 2021 2020 2019
Revenues
Premiums $ 117,373 $ 104,109 $ 94,173 
Product revenue 12,657 10,384 2,760 
Administrative fees and other revenue 6,913 6,315 6,208 
Total operating revenue 136,943 120,808 103,141 
Net investment income 1,378 877 1,005 
Net gains on financial instruments 318 182 67 
Total revenues 138,639 121,867 104,213 
Expenses
Benefit expense 102,645 88,045 81,786 
Cost of products sold 10,895 8,953 1,992 
Selling, general and administrative expense 15,914 17,450 13,364 
Interest expense 798 784 746 
Amortization of other intangible assets 441 361 338 
Loss on extinguishment of debt 21 36 2 
Total expenses 130,714 115,629 98,228 
Income before income tax expense 7,925 6,238 5,985 
Income tax expense 1,830 1,666 1,178 
Net income 6,095 4,572 4,807 
Net loss attributable to noncontrolling interests 9 — — 
Shareholders’ net income $ 6,104 $ 4,572 $ 4,807 
Shareholders’ net income per share
Basic $ 25.04 $ 18.23 $ 18.81 
Diluted $ 24.73 $ 17.98 $ 18.47 
Dividends per share $ 4.52 $ 3.80 $ 3.20 
See accompanying notes.
-72-
Anthem, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Compr ehensive Income
 
 Years Ended December 31
(In millions) 2021 2020 2019
Net income $ 6,095 $ 4,572 $ 4,807 
Other comprehensive (loss) income, net of tax:
Change in net unrealized gains/losses on investments (457) 428 680 
Change in non-credit component of impairment losses on investments 2 — — 
Change in net unrealized gains/losses on cash flow hedges 11 12 (16)
Change in net periodic pension and postretirement costs 123 (1) 26 
Foreign currency translation adjustments (9) 7 — 
Other comprehensive (loss) income (330) 446 690 
Net loss attributable to noncontrolling interests 9 — — 
Other comprehensive loss attributable to noncontrolling interests 2 — — 
Total shareholders’ comprehensive income $ 5,776 $ 5,018 $ 5,497 
 
See accompanying notes.
-73-
Anthem, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
 Years Ended December  31
(In millions) 2021 2020 2019
Operating activities
Net income $ 6,095  $ 4,572  $ 4,807  
Adjustments to reconcile net income to net cash provided by operating activities:
Net gains on financial instruments (318) (182) (67)
Equity in net earnings of other invested assets (562) (51) (93)
Depreciation and amortization 1,302  1,154  1,133  
Deferred income taxes 326 (540) 81 
Impairment of property and equipment 73 198 — 
Share-based compensation 255 283 294 
Changes in operating assets and liabilities:
Receivables, net (2,138 ) (256) (1,053 )
Other invested assets (70) (32) (48)
Other assets 37 (283) (170)
Policy liabilities 2,597  3,528  1,826  
Unearned income (113) 202 115 
Accounts payable and other liabilities 719 1,978  (445)
Income taxes 140 72 (325)
Other , net 21 45 6 
Net cash pr ovided by operating activities 8,364  10,688  6,061  
Investing activities
Purchases of investments (18,669 ) (19,492 ) (22,954 )
Proceeds from sale of investments 10,269  11,318  18,598  
Maturities, calls and redemptions from investments 4,344  4,741  2,437  
Changes in securities lending collateral (956) (849) 254 
Purchases of subsidiaries, net of cash acquired (3,476 ) (1,976 ) — 
Purchases of property and equipment (1,087 ) (1,021 ) (1,077 )
Other , net (63) (45) (50)
Net cash used in investing activities (9,638 ) (7,324 ) (2,792 )
Financing activities
Net proceeds from (repayments of) commercial paper borrowings 50 (150) (297)
Proceeds from long-term borrowings 3,462  2,484  2,473  
Repayments of long-term borrowings (1,068 ) (1,932 ) (1,123 )
Proceeds from short-term borrowings 1,325  970 7,590  
Repayments of short-term borrowings (1,050 ) (1,670 ) (8,035 )
Changes in securities lending payable 956 849 (254)
Repurchase and retirement of common stock (1,900 ) (2,700 ) (1,701 )
Cash dividends (1,104 ) (954) (818)
Proceeds from issuance of common stock under employee stock plans 203 176 187 
Taxes paid through withholding of common stock under employee stock plans (102) (128) (84)
Other , net (349) 488 (204)
Net cash pr ovided by (used in) financing activities 423 (2,567 ) (2,266 )
Effect of for eign exchange rates on cash and cash equivalents (10) 7 — 
Change in cash and cash equivalents (861) 804 1,003  
Cash and cash equivalents at beginning of year 5,741  4,937  3,934  
Cash and cash equivalents at end of year $ 4,880  $ 5,741  $ 4,937  
See accompanying notes.
-74-
Anthem, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Shar eholders’  Equity
 Common Stock
Additional
Paid-in
CapitalAccumulated
Other
Comprehensive
(Loss) IncomeNoncontrolling
InterestsTotal
Equity (In millions)Number
of SharesPar
ValueRetained
Earnings
January 1, 2019 257.4  $ 3 $ 9,536  $ 20,014  $ (986)$ — $ 28,567  
Net income — — — 4,807  — — 4,807  
Other comprehensive income — — — — 690 — 690 
Repurchase and retirement of
common stock (6.3) — (275) (1,426 ) — — (1,701 )
Dividends and dividend
equivalents — — — (822) — — (822)
Issuance of common stock under
employee stock plans, net of
related tax benefits 1.8 — 396 — — — 396 
Convertible debenture
repurchases and conversions — — (209) — — — (209)
December 31, 2019 252.9  3 9,448  22,573  (296) — 31,728  
Adoption of Accounting
Standards Update No. 2016-13
(Note 2) — — — (35) — — (35)
January 1, 2020 252.9  3 9,448  22,538  (296) — 31,693  
Net income — — — 4,572  — — 4,572  
Other comprehensive income — — — — 446 — 446 
Repurchase and retirement of
common stock (9.4) — (353) (2,347 ) — — (2,700 )
Dividends and dividend
equivalents — — — (961) — — (961)
Issuance of common stock under
employee stock plans, net of
related tax benefits 1.9 — 330 — — — 330 
Convertible debenture
repurchases and conversions — — (181) — — — (181)
December 31, 2020 245.4  3 9,244  23,802  150 — 33,199  
Net income — — — 6,104  — (9) 6,095  
Other comprehensive loss — — — — (328) (2) (330)
Accumulated noncontrolling
interest — — — — — 79 79 
Repurchase and retirement of
common stock (5.1) (1) (192) (1,707 ) — — (1,900 )
Dividends and dividend
equivalents — — — (1,111) — — (1,111)
Issuance of common stock under
employee stock plans, net of
related tax benefits 1.5 — 355 — — — 355 
Convertible debenture
repurchases and conversions — — (259) — — — (259)
December 31, 2021 241.8  $ 2 $ 9,148  $ 27,088  $ (178)$ 68 $ 36,128  
See accompanying notes.
-75-
Anthem, Inc.
 
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
 
December 31, 2021
 
(In Millions, Except Per Share Data or As Otherwise Stated Herein)
1. Organization
References to the terms “we,” “our,” “us” or “Anthem” used throughout these Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements refer to
Anthem, Inc., an Indiana corporation, and unless the context otherwise requires, its direct and indirect subsidiaries.
We are one of the largest health benefits companies in the United States in terms of medical membership, serving greater than 45
million medical members through our affiliated health plans as of December 31, 2021. We offer a broad spectrum of network-based
managed care risk-based plans to Individual, Group, Medicaid and Medicare markets. In addition, we provide a broad array of
managed care services to fee-based customers, including claims processing, stop loss insurance, provider network access, medical
management, care management and wellness programs, actuarial services and other administrative services. We also provide services
to the federal government in connection with our Federal Health Products & Services business, which administers the Federal
Employees Health Benefits (“FEHB”) Program. We provide an array of specialty services both to our subsidiary health plans and also
unaffiliated health plans, including pharmacy benefit management (“PBM”) services and dental, vision, life, disability and
supplemental health insurance benefits, as well as integrated health services.
We are an independent licensee of the Blue Cross and Blue Shield Association (“BCBSA”), an association of independent health
benefit plans. We serve our members as the Blue Cross licensee for California and as the Blue Cross and Blue Shield (“BCBS”)
licensee for Colorado, Connecticut, Georgia, Indiana, Kentucky, Maine, Missouri (excluding 30 counties in the Kansas City area),
Nevada, New Hampshire, New York (in the New York City metropolitan area and upstate New York), Ohio, Virginia (excluding the
Northern Virginia suburbs of Washington, D.C.) and Wisconsin. In a majority of these service areas, we do business as Anthem Blue
Cross, Anthem Blue Cross and Blue Shield, and Empire Blue Cross Blue Shield or Empire Blue Cross. We also conduct business
through arrangements with other BCBS licensees as well as other strategic partners. Through our subsidiaries, we also serve customers
in numerous states and Puerto Rico as AIM Specialty Health, Amerigroup, Aspire Health, Beacon, CareMore, Freedom Health,
HealthLink, HealthSun, MMM, Optimum HealthCare, Simply Healthcare, and/or UniCare. PBM services are offered through our
IngenioRx, Inc. (“IngenioRx”) subsidiary. We are licensed to conduct insurance operations in all 50 states, the District of Columbia
and Puerto Rico through our subsidiaries.
2. Basis of Presentation and Significant Accounting Policies
Basis of Presentation: The accompanying consolidated financial statements include the accounts of Anthem and its subsidiaries
and have been prepared in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles (“GAAP”). All significant intercompany
accounts and transactions have been eliminated in consolidation.
Certain of our subsidiaries operate outside of the United States and have functional currencies other than the U.S. dollar (“USD”).
We translate the assets and liabilities of those subsidiaries to USD using the exchange rate in effect at the end of the period. We
translate the revenues and expenses of those subsidiaries to USD using the average exchange rates in effect during the period. The net
effect of these translation adjustments is included in “Foreign currency translation adjustments” in our consolidated statements of
comprehensive income.
Reclassifications: Certain prior year amounts have been reclassified to conform to the current year presentation.
Use of Estimates: The preparation of consolidated financial statements in conformity with GAAP requires us to make estimates
and assumptions that affect the amounts reported in our consolidated financial statements and accompanying notes. Our most
significant estimate relates to estimates and judgments for medical claims payable. Actual results could differ from those estimates.
-76-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Cash and Cash Equivalents: Cash and cash equivalents includes available cash and all highly liquid investments with maturities
of three months or less when purchased. We control a number of bank accounts that are used exclusively to hold customer funds for
the administration of customer benefits, and we have cash and cash equivalents on deposit to meet certain regulatory requirements.
These amounts totaled $173 and $170 at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively, and are included in the cash and cash equivalents
line on our consolidated balance sheets.
Investments: We classify fixed maturity securities in our investment portfolio as “available-for-sale” and report those securities at
fair value. Certain fixed maturity securities are available to support current operations and, accordingly, we classify such investments
as current assets without regard to their contractual maturity. Investments used to satisfy contractual, regulatory or other requirements
are classified as long-term, without regard to contractual maturity.
Prior to 2020, our fixed maturity securities were evaluated for other-than-temporary impairment where credit-related impairments
were presented within the other-than-temporary impairment losses recognized in our consolidated statements of income with an
adjustment to the security’s amortized cost basis. Effective January 1, 2020, if a fixed maturity security is in an unrealized loss
position and we have the intent to sell the fixed maturity security, or it is more likely than not that we will have to sell the fixed
maturity security before recovery of its amortized cost basis, we write down the fixed maturity security’s cost basis to fair value and
record an impairment loss in our consolidated statements of income. For impaired fixed maturity securities that we do not intend to
sell or if it is more likely than not that we will not have to sell such securities, but we expect that we will not fully recover the
amortized cost basis, we recognize the credit component of the impairment as an allowance for credit loss in our consolidated balance
sheets and record an impairment loss in our consolidated statements of income. The non-credit component of the impairment is
recognized in accumulated other comprehensive (loss) income. Furthermore, unrealized losses entirely caused by non-credit-related
factors related to fixed maturity securities for which we expect to fully recover the amortized cost basis continue to be recognized in
accumulated other comprehensive (loss) income.
The credit component of an impairment is determined primarily by comparing the net present value of projected future cash flows
with the amortized cost basis of the fixed maturity security. The net present value is calculated by discounting our best estimate of
projected future cash flows at the effective interest rate implicit in the fixed maturity security at the date of purchase. For mortgage-
backed and asset-backed securities, cash flow estimates are based on assumptions regarding the underlying collateral, including
prepayment speeds, vintage, type of underlying asset, geographic concentrations, default rates, recoveries and changes in value. For all
other securities, cash flow estimates are driven by assumptions regarding probability of default, including changes in credit ratings and
estimates regarding timing and amount of recoveries associated with a default.
For asset-backed securities included in fixed maturity securities, we recognize income using an effective yield based on
anticipated prepayments and the estimated economic life of the securities. When estimates of prepayments change, the effective yield
is recalculated to reflect actual payments to date and anticipated future payments. The net investment in the securities is adjusted to the
amount that would have existed had the new effective yield been applied since the purchase date of the securities. Such adjustments
are reported within net investment income.
The changes in fair value of our marketable equity securities are recognized in our results of operations within net gains and
losses on financial instruments. Certain marketable equity securities are held to satisfy contractual obligations, and are reported under
the caption “Other invested assets” in our consolidated balance sheets.
We have corporate-owned life insurance policies on certain participants in our deferred compensation plans and other members of
management. The cash surrender value of the corporate-owned life insurance policies is reported under the caption “Other invested
assets” in our consolidated balance sheets.
We use the equity method of accounting for investments in companies in which our ownership interest may enable us to influence
the operating or financial decisions of the investee company. Our proportionate share of equity in net income of these unconsolidated
affiliates is reported within net investment income. The equity method investments are reported under the caption “Other invested
assets” in our consolidated balance sheets.
Investment income is recorded when earned. All securities sold resulting in investment realized gains and losses are recorded on
the trade date. Realized gains and losses are determined on the basis of the cost or amortized cost of the specific securities sold.
-77-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
We participate in securities lending programs whereby marketable securities in our investment portfolio are transferred to
independent brokers or dealers in exchange for cash and securities collateral. Under Financial Accounting Standards Board (“FASB”)
guidance related to accounting for transfers and servicing of financial assets and extinguishments of liabilities, we recognize the
collateral as an asset, which is reported in other current assets on our consolidated balance sheets, and we record a corresponding
liability for the obligation to return the collateral to the borrower, which is reported in other current liabilities. The securities on loan
are reported in the applicable investment category on our consolidated balance sheets. Unrealized gains or losses on securities lending
collateral are included in accumulated other comprehensive income as a separate component of shareholders’ equity. The market value
of loaned securities and that of the collateral pledged can fluctuate in non-synchronized fashions. To the extent the loaned securities’
value appreciates faster or depreciates slower than the value of the collateral pledged, we are exposed to the risk of the shortfall. As a
primary mitigating mechanism, the loaned securities and collateral pledged are marked to market on a daily basis and the shortfall, if
any, is collected accordingly. Secondarily, the collateral level is set at 102% of the value of the loaned securities, which provides a
cushion before any shortfall arises. The investment of the cash collateral is subject to market risk, which is managed by limiting the
investments to higher quality and shorter duration instruments.
Receivables: Receivables are reported net of amounts for expected credit losses. The allowance for doubtful accounts is based on
historical collection trends, future forecasts and our judgment regarding the ability to collect specific accounts.
Premium receivables include the uncollected amounts from insured groups, individuals and government programs. Premium
receivables are reported net of an allowance for doubtful accounts of $142 and $146 at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Self-funded receivables include administrative fees, claims and other amounts due from fee-based customers. Self-funded
receivables are reported net of an allowance for doubtful accounts of $50 and $54 at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Other receivables include pharmacy rebates, provider advances, claims recoveries, reinsurance receivables, proceeds due from
brokers on investment trades, accrued investment income and other miscellaneous amounts due to us. These receivables are reported
net of an allowance for doubtful accounts of $648 and $374 at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Income Taxes: We file a consolidated U.S. federal income tax return. Deferred income tax assets and liabilities are recognized for
temporary differences between the financial statement and tax return basis of assets and liabilities based on enacted tax rates and laws
and are reported net on our consolidated balance sheets. The deferred tax benefits of the deferred tax assets are recognized to the
extent realization of such benefits is more likely than not. Deferred income tax expense or benefit generally represents the net change
in deferred income tax assets and liabilities during the year, excluding the impact from amounts initially recorded for business
combinations, if any, and amounts recorded to accumulated other comprehensive income. Current income tax expense represents the
tax consequences of revenues and expenses currently taxable or deductible on various income tax returns for the year reported.
The Internal Revenue Code subjects a U.S. shareholder to tax on Global Intangible Low-Taxed Income (“GILTI”) earned by
certain foreign subsidiaries. We have elected to account for GILTI tax in the year the tax is incurred.
We account for income tax contingencies in accordance with FASB guidance that contains a model to address uncertainty in tax
positions and clarifies the accounting for income taxes by prescribing a minimum recognition threshold, which all income tax
positions must achieve before being recognized in the financial statements.
Property and Equipment: Property and equipment is recorded at cost, net of accumulated depreciation. Depreciation is computed
principally by the straight-line method over estimated useful lives ranging from fifteen to thirty-nine years for buildings and
improvements, three to five years for computer equipment and software, and the lesser of the remaining life of the building lease, if
any, or seven years for furniture and other equipment. Leasehold improvements are depreciated over the term of the related lease.
Certain costs related to the development or purchase of internal-use software are capitalized and amortized over estimated useful lives
ranging from three to ten years.
Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets: FASB guidance requires business combinations to be accounted for using the acquisition
method of accounting, and it also specifies the types of acquired intangible assets that are required to be recognized and reported
separately from goodwill. Goodwill represents the excess of the cost of acquisition over the fair
-78-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
value of net assets acquired. Other intangible assets represent the values assigned to customer relationships, provider and hospital
networks, Blue Cross and Blue Shield and other trademarks, licenses and other agreements, such as non-compete agreements.
Goodwill and other intangible assets are allocated to reportable segments based on the relative fair value of the components of the
businesses acquired.
Goodwill and other intangible assets with indefinite lives are not amortized but are tested for impairment at least annually.
Goodwill and other intangible assets are allocated to reporting units for purposes of the annual goodwill impairment test. Other
intangible assets with indefinite lives, such as trademarks, are tested for impairment separately. We complete our annual impairment
tests of existing goodwill and other intangible assets with indefinite lives during the fourth quarter of each year. Our impairment tests
require us to make assumptions and judgments regarding the estimated fair value of our reporting units, including goodwill and other
intangible assets with indefinite lives. Certain interim impairment tests are also performed when potential impairment indicators exist
or changes in our business or other triggering events occur.
FASB guidance allows for qualitative assessments of whether it is more likely than not that the fair value of a reporting unit is less
than its carrying amount for purposes of a goodwill impairment analysis and whether it is more likely than not that an indefinite-lived
intangible asset is impaired for purposes of an indefinite-lived intangible asset impairment analysis. Estimated fair values developed
based on our assumptions and judgments might be different if other reasonable assumptions and estimates were to be used. Qualitative
analysis involves assessing situations and developments that could affect key drivers used to evaluate whether the fair value of our
goodwill and indefinite-lived intangible assets are impaired. Our procedures include assessing our financial performance,
macroeconomic conditions, industry and market considerations, various asset specific factors, and entity specific events.
Quantitative analysis must be performed if qualitative analyses are not conclusive. Entities also have the option to bypass the
assessment of qualitative factors and proceed directly to performing quantitative analyses. Fair value for purposes of a quantitative
goodwill impairment test is calculated using a blend of the projected income and market valuation approaches. The projected income
approach is developed using assumptions about future revenue, expenses and net income derived from our internal planning process.
Our assumed discount rate is based on our industry’s weighted-average cost of capital and reflects volatility associated with the cost of
equity capital. Market valuations include market comparisons to publicly traded companies in our industry and are based on observed
multiples of certain measures including revenue; earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization (“EBITDA”); and book
value of invested capital.
A goodwill impairment loss is recognized to the extent that the carrying amount exceeds the asset’s fair value. This determination
consists of a one step test comparing the fair value of a reporting unit, including goodwill, to its carrying amount. If the carrying
amount of a reporting unit exceeds its fair value, an impairment loss is recognized. This goodwill impairment loss is equal to the
excess of the reporting unit’s carrying amount over its fair value.
Fair value for purposes of a quantitative impairment test for indefinite-lived intangible assets is estimated using a projected
income approach. We recognize an impairment loss when the estimated fair value of indefinite-lived intangible assets is less than the
carrying value. If significant impairment indicators are noted relative to other intangible assets subject to amortization, we may be
required to record impairment losses against future income.
Derivative Financial Instruments: We primarily invest in the following types of derivative financial instruments: interest rate
swaps, futures, forward contracts, put and call options, collars, swaptions, embedded derivatives and warrants. Derivatives embedded
within non-derivative instruments, such as options embedded in convertible fixed maturity securities, are bifurcated from the host
instrument when the embedded derivative is not clearly and closely related to the host instrument. Our use of derivatives is limited by
statutes and regulations promulgated by the various regulatory bodies to which we are subject, and by our own derivative policy. Our
derivative use is generally limited to hedging purposes, on an economic basis, and we generally do not use derivative instruments for
speculative purposes.
We have exposure to economic losses due to interest rate risk arising from changes in the level or volatility of interest rates. We
attempt to mitigate our exposure to interest rate risk through active portfolio management, including rebalancing our existing
portfolios of assets and liabilities, as well as changing the characteristics of investments to be purchased or sold in the future. In
addition, derivative financial instruments are used to modify the interest rate exposure of certain liabilities or forecasted transactions.
These strategies include the use of interest rate swaps and forward contracts, which are used to lock-
-79-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
in interest rates or to hedge, on an economic basis, interest rate risks associated with variable rate debt. We have used these types of
instruments as designated hedges against specific liabilities.
All investments in derivatives are recorded as assets or liabilities at fair value. If certain correlation, hedge effectiveness and risk
reduction criteria are met, a derivative may be specifically designated as a hedge of exposure to changes in fair value or cash flow. The
accounting for changes in the fair value of a derivative depends on the intended use of the derivative and the nature of any hedge
designation thereon. Amounts excluded from the assessment of hedge effectiveness, if any, are reported in results of operations
immediately. If the derivative is not designated as a hedge, the gain or loss resulting from the change in the fair value of the derivative
is recognized in results of operations in the period of change. Cash flows associated with the settlement of non-designated derivatives
are shown on a net basis in investing activity in our consolidated statements of cash flow.
From time to time, we may also purchase derivatives to hedge, on an economic basis, our exposure to foreign currency exchange
fluctuations associated with the operations of certain of our subsidiaries. We generally use futures or forward contracts for these
transactions. We generally do not designate these contracts as hedges and, accordingly, the changes in fair value of these derivatives
are recognized in results of operations immediately.
Credit exposure associated with non-performance by the counterparties to derivative instruments is generally limited to the
uncollateralized fair value of the asset related to instruments recognized in the consolidated balance sheets. We attempt to mitigate the
risk of non-performance by selecting counterparties with high credit ratings and monitoring their creditworthiness and by diversifying
derivatives among multiple counterparties. At December 31, 2021, we believe there were no material concentrations of credit risk with
any individual counterparty.
We generally enter into master netting agreements, which reduce credit risk by permitting net settlement of transactions with the
same counterparty. Certain of our derivative agreements also contain credit support provisions that require us or the counterparty to
post collateral if there are declines in the derivative fair value or our credit rating. The derivative assets and derivative liabilities are
reported at their fair values net of collateral and netting by the counterparty.
Retirement Benefits: We recognize the funded status of pension and other postretirement benefit plans on the consolidated
balance sheets based on fiscal-year-end measurements of plan assets and benefit obligations. Prepaid pension benefits represent
prepaid costs related to defined benefit pension plans and are reported with other noncurrent assets. Postretirement benefits represent
outstanding obligations for retiree medical, life, vision and dental benefits. Liabilities for pension and other postretirement benefits are
reported with noncurrent assets, current liabilities and noncurrent liabilities based on the amount by which the actuarial present value
of benefits payable in the next twelve months included in the benefit obligation exceeds the fair value of plan assets.
We determine the expected return on plan assets using the calculated value of plan assets, which recognizes changes in the fair
value of plan assets in a systematic manner over three years. We apply a corridor approach to amortize unrecognized actuarial gains or
losses. Under this approach, only accumulated net actuarial gains or losses in excess of 10% of the greater of the projected benefit
obligation or the fair value of plan assets are amortized over the average remaining service or lifetime of the workforce as a
component of net periodic benefit cost.
The discount rate reflects the current rate at which the pension liabilities could be effectively settled at the end of the year based
on our most recent measurement date. We use the annual spot rate approach for setting our discount rate. Under the spot rate approach,
individual spot rates from a full yield curve of published rates are used to discount each plan’s cash flows to determine the plan’s
obligations.
The assumed healthcare cost trend rates used to measure the expected cost of other postretirement benefits are based on an initial
assumed healthcare cost trend rate declining to an ultimate healthcare cost trend rate over a select number of years.
Medical Claims Payable: Liabilities for medical claims payable include estimated provisions for incurred but not paid claims on
an undiscounted basis, as well as estimated provisions for expenses related to the processing of claims. Incurred but not paid claims
include (1) an estimate for claims that are incurred but not reported, as well as claims reported to us but not yet processed through our
systems; and (2) claims reported to us and processed through our systems but not yet paid.
-80-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Liabilities for both claims incurred but not reported and reported but not yet processed through our systems are determined in the
aggregate, employing actuarial methods that are commonly used by health insurance actuaries and meet Actuarial Standards of
Practice. Our reserving practice for claim liabilities is to consistently recognize the appropriate amount of reserve within a level of
confidence required by Actuarial Standards of Practice. We determine the amount of the liability for incurred but not paid claims by
following a detailed actuarial process that uses both historical claim payment patterns as well as emerging medical cost trends to
project our best estimate of claim liabilities. Under this process, historical paid claims data is formatted into “claim triangles,” which
compare claim incurred dates to the dates of claim payments. This information is analyzed to create “completion factors” that
represent the average percentage of total incurred claims that have been paid through a given date after being incurred. Completion
factors are applied to claims paid through the period-end date to estimate the ultimate claim expense incurred for the period. Actuarial
estimates of incurred but not paid claim liabilities are then determined by subtracting the actual paid claims from the estimate of the
ultimate incurred claims. 
For the most recent incurred months (typically the most recent two months), the percentage of claims paid for claims incurred in
those months is generally low. This makes the completion factor methodology less reliable for such months. Therefore, incurred
claims for recent months are not projected from historical completion and payment patterns; rather, they are projected by estimating
the claims expense for those months based on recent claims expense levels and healthcare trend levels (“trend factors”).
We regularly review and set assumptions regarding cost trends and utilization when initially establishing claim liabilities. We
continually monitor and adjust the claims liability and benefit expense based on subsequent paid claims activity. If it is determined that
our assumptions regarding cost trends and utilization are materially different than actual results, our income statement and financial
position could be impacted in future periods.
Premium deficiencies are recognized when it is probable that expected claims and administrative expenses will exceed future
premiums on existing medical insurance contracts without consideration of investment income. Determination of premium
deficiencies for longer duration life and disability contracts includes consideration of investment income. For purposes of premium
deficiencies, contracts are deemed to be either short or long duration and are grouped in a manner consistent with our method of
acquiring, servicing and measuring the profitability of such contracts. Once established, premium deficiencies are released
commensurate with actual claims experience over the remaining life of the contract. No premium deficiencies were established at
December 31, 2021 or 2020.
Benefit expense includes incurred medical claims as well as quality improvement expenses for our risk-based members. Quality
improvement activities are those designed to improve member health outcomes, prevent hospital readmissions and improve patient
safety. They also include expenses for wellness and health promotion provided to our members.
 Other Policyholder Liabilities: Other policyholder liabilities include rate stabilization reserves associated with retrospectively
rated insurance contracts and certain case-specific reserves. Other policyholder liabilities also include liabilities for premium refunds
based upon the minimum medical loss ratio (“MLR”), the relative health risk of members, and other contractual or regulatory
requirements. Rate stabilization reserves represent accumulated premiums that exceed what customers owe us based on actual claim
experience. The timing of payment of these retrospectively rated refunds is based on the contractual terms with our customers and can
vary from period to period based on the specific contractual requirements.
We are required to meet certain minimum MLR thresholds prescribed by the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act and the
Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010, as amended (collectively the “ACA”). If we do not meet or exceed the
minimum MLR thresholds specified by the ACA, we are required to pay rebates to certain customers. Minimum MLR rebates are
calculated by subsidiary, state and applicable line of business in accordance with regulations issued by the Department of Health and
Human Services (“HHS”). Such calculations are made using estimated calendar year medical loss expense and premiums, as defined
by HHS.
We follow HHS guidelines for determining the types of expenses that may be included in our minimum MLR rebate calculations,
which differ from benefit expense and premiums as reported in our consolidated financial statements prepared in conformity with
GAAP. Certain amounts reported as expense in our consolidated GAAP financial statements may be reported as a reduction of
premiums in accordance with HHS regulations. In addition, profit amounts included in our payments to third-party administrative
service providers are recorded as benefit expense in our consolidated GAAP financial
-81-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
statements, while HHS does not allow for the inclusion of these expenses within the medical loss expense for purposes of calculating
minimum MLR.
Reserves for Future Policy Benefits: Reserves for future policy benefits include liabilities for life and long-term disability
insurance policy benefits based upon interest, mortality and morbidity assumptions from published actuarial tables, modified based
upon our experience. Future policy benefits also include liabilities for insurance policies for which some of the premiums received in
earlier years are intended to pay anticipated benefits to be incurred in future years. Future policy benefits are continually monitored
and reviewed, and when reserves are adjusted, differences are reflected in benefit expense.
We believe that our liabilities for future policy benefits, along with future premiums received, are adequate to satisfy our ultimate
benefit liability; however, these estimates are inherently subject to a number of variable circumstances. Consequently, the actual
results could differ materially from the amounts recorded in our consolidated financial statements.
Revenue Recognition: Premiums for risk-based contracts are recognized as revenue over the period insurance coverage is
provided, and, if applicable, net of amounts recognized for MLR rebates, risk adjustment, reinsurance and risk corridor under
contractual premium stabilization arrangements, the ACA or other regulatory requirements. Premium payments from contracted
government agencies are based on eligibility lists produced by the government agencies. Premiums related to the unexpired
contractual coverage periods are reflected in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets as unearned income. Premiums include
revenue adjustments for retrospectively rated contracts where revenue is based on the estimated loss experience of the contract.
Premium rates for certain lines of business are subject to approval by the Department of Insurance of each respective state.
Additionally, delays in annual premium rate changes from contracted government agencies require that we defer the recognition of any
increases to the period in which the premium rates become final. The value of the impact can be significant in the period in which it is
recognized depending on the magnitude of the premium rate increase, the membership to which it applies and the length of the delay
between the effective date of the rate increase and the final contract date. Premium rate decreases are recognized in the period the
change in premium rate becomes effective and the change in the rate is known, which may be prior to the period when the contract
amendment affecting the rate is finalized.
Administrative fees and other revenue include revenue from certain group contracts that provide for the group to be at risk for all,
or with supplemental insurance arrangements, a portion, of their claims experience. We charge these fee-based groups an
administrative fee, which is based on the number of members in a group or the group’s claim experience. In addition, administrative
fees and other revenue include amounts received for the administration of Medicare or certain other government programs. Under our
fee-based arrangements, revenue is recognized as administrative services are performed. All benefit payments under these programs
are excluded from benefit expense.
Product revenue includes revenue for services performed by our IngenioRx PBM for unaffiliated PBM customers. Unaffiliated
PBM customers include our fee-based groups that have contracted with IngenioRx for PBM services and, beginning on January 1,
2020, third-party health plans. Product revenues and costs of goods sold for our affiliated health plans are eliminated in consolidation.
Product revenue for PBM services is recognized using the gross method at the negotiated contract price when IngenioRx has
concluded that it is the principal and it controls the services before prescription drugs are transferred to the customer. IngenioRx
determined it is the principal due to its contractual rights to design and develop a listing of prescription drugs offered to the customer
(formulary management); its control over establishing the pharmacy network available to the customer to have its prescription fulfilled
(network management); and its discretion over establishing the pricing for prescription drugs. Overall, control over these activities
indicate IngenioRx is primarily responsible for fulfilling the promise to provide PBM services. Product revenue includes ingredient
costs (net of any rebates or discounts), including any co-payments made by or on behalf of the customer, and administrative fees.
IngenioRx recognizes revenue when control of the prescription drugs is transferred to customers, in an amount it expects to be entitled
to in exchange for the products or services provided.
For our non-risk-based contracts, we had no material contract assets, contract liabilities or deferred contract costs recorded on our
consolidated balance sheet at December 31, 2021. Revenue recognized in 2021 and 2020 from performance obligations related to prior
years, such as due to changes in transaction price, was not material. For contracts that have an original expected duration of greater
than one year, revenue expected to be recognized in future periods related to unfulfilled contractual performance obligations and
contracts with variable consideration related to undelivered performance obligations is not material.
-82-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Cost of Products Sold: IngenioRx’s cost of products sold includes the cost of prescription drugs dispensed to unaffiliated PBM
customers (net of rebates or discounts). This cost includes any co-payments made by or on behalf of the customer. Cost of products
sold also includes per-claim administrative fees for prescription fulfillment by its vendor and certain IngenioRx direct costs related to
sales and administration of customer contracts.
Share-Based Compensation: Our current compensation philosophy provides for share-based compensation, including stock
options, restricted stock awards and an employee stock purchase plan. Stock options are granted for a fixed number of shares with an
exercise price at least equal to the fair value of the shares at the date of the grant. Restricted stock awards are issued at the fair value of
the stock on the grant date. The employee stock purchase plan allows for a purchase price per share which is 90% of the fair value of a
share of common stock on the lower of the first or last trading day of the plan quarter. The employee stock purchase plan discount is
recognized as compensation expense based on GAAP guidance. All other share-based payments to employees are recognized as
compensation expense in our consolidated statements of income based on their fair values. Additionally, excess tax benefits, which
result from actual tax benefits realized when awards vest or options are exercised exceeding deferred tax benefits previously
recognized based on grant date fair value, are recognized as tax benefits in the consolidated statements of income.
Advertising and Marketing Costs: We use print, broadcast and other advertising to promote our products and to develop our
corporate image. We market our products through direct marketing activities and an extensive network of independent agents, brokers
and retail partnerships for Individual and Medicare customers, and for certain Group risk-based customers with a smaller employee
base. Products for Group risk-based customers with a larger employee base are generally sold through independent brokers or
consultants retained by the customer who work with industry specialists from our in-house sales force. In the Individual and Group
markets, we offer products through state or federally facilitated marketplaces, or Public Exchanges, and off-exchange products. The
cost of advertising and marketing for product promotion is expensed as incurred, while advertising and marketing costs associated
with our corporate image are expensed when first aired. Total advertising and marketing expense was $588, $558 and $467 for the
years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Health Insurance Provider Fee: The ACA imposed an annual Health Insurance Provider Fee (“HIP Fee”) on health insurers that
wrote certain types of health insurance on U.S. risks, which has been permanently repealed effective January 1, 2021. The HIP Fee
was non-deductible for federal income tax purposes. Our affected products were priced to cover the increased selling, general and
administrative and income tax expenses associated with the HIP Fee when it was in effect. The HIP Fee was suspended for 2019,
resumed and increased to $15,523 for 2020 and was permanently eliminated beginning in 2021. For the year ended December 31,
2020, we recognized $1,570 as selling, general and administrative expense related to the HIP Fee. There was no corresponding HIP
Fee expense for 2019 or 2021.
Leases: We lease office space and certain computer and related equipment under noncancelable operating leases. We determine
whether an arrangement is or contains a lease at its inception. We recognize lease liabilities based on the present value of the minimum
lease payments not yet paid by using the lease term, any amounts probable of being owed under any residual value guarantees and the
discount rate determined at lease commencement. As our leases do not generally provide an implicit rate, we use our incremental
secured borrowing rate commensurate with the underlying lease terms to determine the present value of our lease payments. Our lease
liabilities may include amounts for options to extend or terminate a lease when it is reasonably certain that we will exercise that
option. We recognize operating right-of-use (“ROU”) assets at an amount equal to the lease liability adjusted for prepaid or accrued
rent, the remaining balance of any lease incentives and unamortized initial direct costs.
The operating lease liabilities are reported in other current liabilities and other noncurrent liabilities and the related ROU assets
are reported in other noncurrent assets on our consolidated balance sheets. Lease expense for our operating leases is calculated on a
straight-line basis over the lease term and is reported in selling, general and administrative expense on our consolidated statements of
income. For our office space leases, we account for the lease and non-lease components (such as common area maintenance) as a
single lease component. We also do not recognize a lease liability or ROU asset for our office space leases whose lease terms, at
commencement, are twelve months or less and that do not include a purchase option or option to extend that we are reasonably certain
to exercise.
We assess our ROU assets for impairment when there are indicators and compare the carrying amount of the ROU asset to its
estimated undiscounted future cash flows. If the estimated undiscounted future cash flows are less than the carrying
-83-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
amount of the ROU asset, an impairment calculation is performed. An impairment loss is recorded for the difference of the ROU
asset’s carrying value that exceeds its estimated discounted cash flows. During the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, we
recorded $136 and $258, respectively, for impairment and abandonment of ROU assets. See Note 18, “Leases” for additional
information about the ROU asset impairment and abandonment charges.
Earnings per Share: Earnings per share amounts, on a basic and diluted basis, have been calculated based upon the weighted-
average common shares outstanding for the period.
Basic earnings per share excludes dilution and is computed by dividing income available to common shareholders by the
weighted-average number of common shares outstanding for the period. Diluted earnings per share may include the dilutive effect of
stock options, restricted stock and convertible debentures, using the treasury stock method. The treasury stock method assumes
exercise of stock options and vesting of restricted stock, with the assumed proceeds used to purchase common stock at the average
market price for the period. The difference between the number of shares assumed issued and the number of shares assumed purchased
represents the dilutive shares.
Recently Adopted Accounting Guidance: In January 2021, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2021-01,
Reference Rate Reform (Topic 848) (“ASU 2021-01”). The amendments in ASU 2021-01 provide optional expedients and exceptions
for applying GAAP to contract modifications and hedging relationships, subject to meeting certain criteria, that reference the London
Interbank Offered Rate (“LIBOR”) or another reference rate expected to be discontinued because of the reference rate reform. The
provisions must be applied at a Topic, Subtopic, or Industry Subtopic level for all transactions other than derivatives, which may be
applied at a hedging relationship level. We adopted ASU 2021-01 on January 7, 2021, and the adoption did not have an impact on our
consolidated financial position, results of operations or cash flows.
In October 2020, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2020-08, Codification Improvements to Subtopic 310-20,
Receivables—Nonrefundable Fees and Other Costs (“ASU 2020-08”). The amendments in ASU 2020-08 clarify when an entity should
assess whether a callable debt security is within the scope of accounting guidance, which impacts the amortization period for
nonrefundable fees and other costs. ASU 2020-08 became effective for interim and annual reporting periods beginning after December
15, 2020. The amendments are to be applied on a prospective basis as of the beginning of the period of adoption for existing or newly
purchased callable debt securities. We adopted ASU 2020-08 on January 1, 2021, and the adoption did not have an impact on our
consolidated financial position, results of operations or cash flows.
In August 2020, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2020-06, Debt—Debt with Conversion and Other Options
(Subtopic 470-20) and Derivatives and Hedging—Contracts in Entity’s Own Equity (Subtopic 815-40): Accounting for Convertible
Instruments and Contracts in an Entity’s Own Equity (“ASU 2020-06”). The amendments eliminate two of the three accounting
models that require separate accounting for convertible features of debt securities, simplify the contract settlement assessment for
equity classification, require the use of the if-converted method for all convertible instruments in the diluted earnings per share
calculation and expand disclosure requirements. The amendments are effective for our annual and interim reporting periods beginning
after December 15, 2021. We adopted ASU 2020-06 on January 1, 2022 and are using the modified retrospective transition method
which resulted in an increase to our reported debt outstanding and a corresponding cumulative-effect reduction to opening retained
earnings; the amounts are not material to our overall consolidated financial position. The adoption of ASU 2020-06 did not have an
impact on our results of operations or our consolidated cash flows. Use of the if-converted method is not expected to have a material
impact on our overall earnings per share calculation.
In December 2019, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2019-12, Income Taxes (Topic 740): Simplifying the
Accounting for Income Taxes (“ASU 2019-12”). The amendments in ASU 2019-12 remove certain exceptions to the general principles
in Accounting Standards Codification Topic 740. The amendments also clarify and amend existing guidance to improve consistent
application. The amendments became effective for our annual reporting periods beginning after December 15, 2020. The transition
method (retrospective, modified retrospective, or prospective basis) related to the amendments depends on the applicable guidance,
and all amendments for which there is no transition guidance specified are to be applied on a prospective basis. We adopted ASU
2019-12 on January 1, 2021, and the adoption did not have an impact on our consolidated financial position, results of operations or
cash flows.
In June 2016, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2016-13, Financial Instruments—Credit Losses (Topic 326):
Measurement of Credit Losses on Financial Instruments (“ASU 2016-13”). ASU 2016-13 introduces a current
-84-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
expected credit loss model for measuring expected credit losses for certain types of financial instruments held at the reporting date
based on historical experience, current conditions and reasonable supportable forecasts. ASU 2016-13 replaces the incurred loss model
for measuring expected credit losses, requires expected losses on available-for-sale debt securities to be recognized through an
allowance for credit losses rather than as reductions in the amortized cost of the securities and provides for additional disclosure
requirements. ASU 2016-13 requires a cumulative-effect adjustment to the opening balance of retained earnings on the balance sheet
at the date of adoption and a prospective transition approach for debt securities for which an other-than-temporary impairment had
been recognized before the adoption date. The effect of a prospective transition approach is to maintain the same amortized cost basis
before and after the date of adoption. We adopted ASU 2016-13 on January 1, 2020, and recognized a cumulative-effect adjustment of
$35 to our opening retained earnings for credit related allowances on receivables. The adoption did not have an impact on our
consolidated statements of income or cash flows.
Recent Accounting Guidance Not Yet Adopted: In November 2020, the FASB issued Accounting Standards Update No. 2020-11,
Financial Services—Insurance (Topic 944): Effective Date and Early Application (“ASU 2020-11”). The amendments in ASU 2020-
11 make changes to the effective date and early application of Accounting Standards Update No. 2018-12, Financial Services—
Insurance (Topic 944): Targeted Improvements to the Accounting for Long-Duration Contracts (“ASU 2018-12”) which was issued in
November 2018. The amendments in ASU 2020-11 have extended the original effective date by one year and now the amendments are
required for our interim and annual reporting periods beginning after December 15, 2022. The amendments in ASU 2018-12 make
changes to a variety of areas to simplify or improve the existing recognition, measurement, presentation and disclosure requirements
for long-duration contracts issued by an insurance entity. The amendments require insurers to annually review the assumptions they
make about their policyholders and update the liabilities for future policy benefits if the assumptions change. The amendments also
simplify the amortization of deferred contract acquisition costs and add new disclosure requirements about the assumptions insurers
use to measure their liabilities and how they may affect future cash flows. The amendments related to the liability for future policy
benefits for traditional and limited-payment contracts and deferred acquisition costs are to be applied to contracts in force as of the
beginning of the earliest period presented, with an option to apply such amendments retrospectively with a cumulative-effect
adjustment to the opening balance of retained earnings as of the earliest period presented. The amendments for market risk benefits are
to be applied retrospectively. We are currently evaluating the effects the adoption of ASU 2020-11 and ASU 2018-12 will have on our
consolidated financial position, results of operations, cash flows, and related disclosures.
There were no other new accounting pronouncements that were issued or became effective during the year ended December 31,
2021 that had, or are expected to have, a material impact on our financial position, results of operations, cash flows or financial
statement disclosures.
3. Business Acquisitions
Completed Acquisitions
During the year ended December 31, 2021, the Company completed business combinations for total cash consideration of
approximately $4,021. These acquisitions included myNEXUS, Inc. (“myNEXUS”), a comprehensive home-based nursing
management company for payors, and MMM Holdings, LLC (“MMM”), including its Medicare Advantage plan, Medicaid plan, and
other affiliated companies. The purchase price was allocated to the tangible and intangible net assets acquired based on management's
final estimates of their fair values, of which $1,577 has been allocated to finite-lived intangible assets, $20 to indefinite-lived
intangible assets, and $2,521 to goodwill. The majority of goodwill is not deductible for income tax purposes.
During the year ended December 31, 2020, the Company completed business combinations for total cash consideration of
approximately $2,488. These acquisitions included Beacon Health Options, Inc. (“Beacon”) a behavioral health managed care
organization. The purchase price was allocated to the tangible and intangible net assets acquired based on management's final
estimates of their fair values, of which $868 was allocated to finite-lived intangible assets, $225 to indefinite-lived intangible assets,
and $1,231 to goodwill. The majority of goodwill is not deductible for income tax purposes.
-85-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Acquired tangible assets (liabilities) at the acquisition date were:
2021 2020
Cash, cash equivalents and short-term investments $ 808 $ 659 
Accounts receivable and other current assets 295 282 
Property, equipment and other long-term assets 102 296 
Medical claims and other policyholder liabilities payable (571) (580)
Accounts payable and other current liabilities (179) (257)
Other long-term liabilities (6) (49)
Total net tangible assets $ 449 $ 351 
The preliminary purchase price allocations for the various business combinations are subject to adjustment as valuation analyses,
primarily related to intangible assets and contingent and tax liabilities, are finalized.
Acquisition date fair values and weighted-average useful lives assigned to intangible assets include:
2021 2020
Fair ValueWeighted
Average Useful
Life Fair ValueWeighted
Average Useful
Life
Customer relationships $ 1,313 13 years$ 680 19 years
Provider and hospital relationships 5 15 years 94 20 years
Other 259 13 years 93 19 years
State Medicaid Licenses 20 Indefinite 225 Indefinite
Total intangible assets $ 1,597 $ 1,092 
The results of operations and financial condition of acquired entities have been included in our consolidated results and the results
of the corresponding operating segment as of the date of acquisition. Through December 31, 2021, the impact of the acquired entities
on revenue and net earnings was not material. Unaudited pro forma revenues for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 as if
the acquisitions had occurred on January 1, 2020 were immaterial for both periods. The pro forma effects of the acquisitions on net
earnings were immaterial for both years.
Pending Acquisition
On November 10, 2021, we announced our entrance into an agreement with Personal Touch Holding Corporation to acquire
Integra Managed Care (“Integra”). Integra is a managed long-term care plan that serves New York state Medicaid members, enabling
adults with long-term care needs and disabilities to live safely and independently in their own home. The acquisition is expected to
close by the end of the second quarter of 2022 and is subject to standard closing conditions and customary approvals.
4.    Business Optimization Initiatives
We believe that our properties are adequate and suitable for our business as presently conducted; however, we are continuing to
evaluate our real estate strategy as it relates to the impact of the COVID-19 pandemic and the changing needs of a more hybrid remote
and in-office workforce. As a result, during 2021, we identified additional reductions of office space and recorded a charge of $202 in
selling, general and administrative expenses. This charge includes $136 for impairment and abandonment of operating-lease related
ROU assets and $66 for impairment and abandonment of property and equipment. The charges recognized in the Commercial &
Specialty Business, Government Business, IngenioRx and Other segments in 2021, were $108, $60, $1 and $33, respectively. See also
Note 20, “Segment Information.”
-86-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
During 2020, our management introduced enterprise-wide initiatives to optimize our business and, as a result, we recorded a
charge of $653 in selling, general and administrative expenses. This charge included $258 for impairment and abandonment of
operating-lease related ROU assets, $198 for impairment and abandonment of property and equipment and $197 for future payments
for employee termination costs in connection with the repositioning and reskilling of our workforce. The charges recognized in the
Commercial & Specialty Business, Government Business, IngenioRx and Other segments in 2020, were $311, $205, $4 and $133,
respectively. See also Note 20, “Segment Information.” We believe these initiatives largely represent our progression towards
becoming a more agile organization, including process automation and a reduction in our office space footprint.
A summary of the activity of the 2020 employee termination costs for the year ended December 31, 2021 and ending balance at
December 31, 2021 is as follows:
Commercial &
Specialty
BusinessGovernment
Business IngenioRx Other Total
2020 Business Optimization Initiatives
Employee termination costs:
Liabilities for employee termination costs at January 1,
2021 $ 92 $ 88 $ 1 $ 6 $ 187 
Payments (26) (25) — (3) (54)
Releases (5) (6) — — (11)
Total liabilities for employee termination costs ending
balance at December 31, 2021 $ 61 $ 57 $ 1 $ 3 122 
We expect the employee termination costs to be paid by the end of 2022.
-87-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
5. Investments
A summary of current and long-term fixed maturity securities, available-for-sale, at December 31, 2021 and 2020 is as follows:
Cost or
Amortized
CostGross
Unrealized
GainsGross
Unrealized
LossesAllowance
For Credit
LossesEstimated
Fair Value
December 31, 2021
Fixed maturity securities:
United States Government securities $ 1,443 $ 7 $ (18)$ — $ 1,432 
Government sponsored securities 65 4 (1) — 68 
Foreign government securities 353 7 (13) — 347 
States, municipalities and political subdivisions, tax-exempt 5,321 310 (10) — 5,621 
Corporate securities 12,044 401 (78) (4) 12,363 
Residential mortgage-backed securities 4,059 75 (35) (2) 4,097 
Commercial mortgage-backed securities 65 2 (3) — 64 
Other securities 2,907 24 (24) — 2,907 
Total fixed maturity securities $26,257 $ 830 $ (182)$ (6)$26,899 
December 31, 2020
Fixed maturity securities:
United States Government securities $ 765 $ 11 $ (2)$ — $ 774 
Government sponsored securities 63 6 — — 69 
Foreign government securities 290 17 (2) — 305 
States, municipalities and political subdivisions, tax-exempt 5,185 395 (1) — 5,579 
Corporate securities 10,233 697 (31) (7) 10,892 
Residential mortgage-backed securities 4,208 154 (17) — 4,345 
Commercial mortgage-backed securities 73 3 (4) — 72 
Other securities 1,937 33 (11) — 1,959 
Total fixed maturity securities $22,754 $ 1,316 $ (68)$ (7)$23,995 
-88-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
For fixed maturity securities in an unrealized loss position at December 31, 2021 and 2020, the following table summarizes the
aggregate fair values and gross unrealized losses by length of time those securities have continuously been in an unrealized loss
position.
 Less than 12 Months 12 Months or Greater
 Number of
SecuritiesEstimated
Fair ValueGross
Unrealized
LossNumber of
SecuritiesEstimated
Fair ValueGross
Unrealized
Loss
(Securities are whole amounts)       
December 31, 2021
Fixed maturity securities:
United States Government securities 51 $ 990 $ (11) 27 $ 176 $ (7)
Government sponsored securities — — — 1 1 (1)
Foreign government securities 188 143 (8) 68 41 (5)
States, municipalities and political
subdivisions, tax-exempt 281 634 (9) 8 16 (1)
Corporate securities 1,846 3,310 (57) 403 485 (21)
Residential mortgage-backed securities 692 1,967 (26) 125 173 (9)
Commercial mortgage-backed securities 2 4 (1) 4 8 (2)
Other securities 511 1,707 (19) 50 85 (5)
Total fixed maturity securities 3,571 $ 8,755 $ (131) 686 $ 985 $ (51)
December 31, 2020
Fixed maturity securities:
United States Government securities 27 $ 301 $ (2) — $ — $ — 
Government sponsored securities — — — 1 — — 
Foreign government securities 55 35 (2) 9 4 — 
States, municipalities and political
subdivisions, tax-exempt 36 57 (1) 1 3 — 
Corporate securities 646 765 (20) 150 169 (11)
Residential mortgage-backed securities 224 442 (8) 90 110 (9)
Commercial mortgage-backed securities 6 16 (1) 3 4 (3)
Other securities 207 509 (5) 79 179 (6)
Total fixed maturity securities 1,201 $ 2,125 $ (39) 333 $ 469 $ (29)
Below are discussions by security type for unrealized losses and credit losses as of December 31, 2021:
Corporate securities: An allowance for credit losses on certain retail, travel and entertainment, energy, and basic materials sector fixed
maturity corporate securities has been determined based on qualitative and quantitative factors including credit rating, decline in fair
value and industry condition along with other available market data. With multiple risk factors present, these securities were reviewed
for expected future cash flow to determine the portion of unrealized losses that were credit related and to record an allowance for
credit losses. Unrealized losses on our other corporate securities were largely due to market conditions relating to the COVID-19
pandemic; however, qualitative factors did not indicate a credit loss as of December 31, 2021. We do not intend to sell these
investments and it is likely we will not have to sell these investments prior to maturity or recovery of amortized cost.
Residential mortgage-backed securities: An allowance for credit loss was established on certain residential mortgage-backed
securities. Notification of maturity and coupon default, as well as a significant and sustained decline in fair value, were factors to
indicate a credit loss. No other mortgage securities had material unrealized losses or qualitative factors to indicate a credit loss. We do
not intend to sell these investments and it is likely we will not be required to sell these investments prior to maturity or recovery of
amortized cost.
-89-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
As for the remaining securities shown in the table above, unrealized losses on these securities have not been recognized into
income because we do not intend to sell these investments and it is likely that we will not be required to sell these investments prior to
their anticipated recovery. The decline in fair value is largely due to changes in interest rates and other market conditions. We have
evaluated these securities for any change in credit rating and have determined that no allowance is necessary. The fair value is
expected to recover as the securities approach maturity.
The tables below present a roll-forward by major security type of the allowance for credit losses on fixed maturity securities
available-for-sale held at period end for the years ended December 31, 2021, and 2020:
Year Ended December 31, 2021Corporate
SecuritiesResidential
Mortgage-backed
Securities Total
Allowance for credit losses:
Beginning balance $ 7 $ — $ 7 
Additions for securities for which no previous expected credit losses were
recognized 1 — 1 
Securities sold during the period (2) — (2)
(Decreases) increases to the allowance for credit losses on securities (2) 2 — 
Total allowance for credit losses $ 4 $ 2 $ 6 
Year Ended December 31, 2020Corporate
SecuritiesForeign
Government
Securities Total
Allowance for credit losses:
Beginning balance $ — $ — $ — 
Additions for securities for which no previous expected credit losses were
recognized 64 1 65 
Securities sold during the period (17) (1) (18)
Decreases to the allowance for credit losses on securities (40) — (40)
Total allowance for credit losses $ 7 $ — $ 7 
The amortized cost and fair value of fixed maturity securities at December 31, 2021, by contractual maturity, are shown below.
Expected maturities may differ from contractual maturities because the issuers of the securities may have the right to prepay
obligations.
Amortized
CostEstimated
Fair Value
Due in one year or less $ 719 $ 720 
Due after one year through five years 6,570 6,717 
Due after five years through ten years 8,967 9,156 
Due after ten years 5,877 6,145 
Mortgage-backed securities 4,124 4,161 
Total fixed maturity securities $ 26,257 $ 26,899 
-90-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Equity Securities
A summary of current equity securities at December 31, 2021 and 2020 is as follows:
December 31,
2021December 31,
2020
Equity Securities:
Exchange traded funds $ 1,750 $ 1,154 
Fixed maturity mutual funds — 144 
Common equity securities 42 201 
Private equity securities 89 60 
Total $ 1,881 $ 1,559 
Investment Income
The major categories of net investment income for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 are as follows:
2021 2020 2019
Fixed maturity securities $ 755 $ 725 $ 721 
Equity securities 43 71 100 
Cash equivalents 5 28 64 
Other invested assets 616 91 149 
Investment income 1,419 915 1,034 
Investment expenses (41) (38) (29)
Net investment income $ 1,378 $ 877 $ 1,005 
Investment Gains
Net investment gains (losses) for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 are as follows:
2021 2020 2019
Net gains (losses):
Fixed maturity securities:
Gross realized gains from sales $ 170 $ 175 $ 125 
Gross realized losses from sales (44) (105) (59)
Impairment recoveries (losses) recognized in income 1 (7) (13)
Net gains on fixed maturity securities 127 63 53 
Equity securities:
Gross gains 37 269 147 
Gross losses (108) (75) (84)
Net (losses) gains on equity securities (71) 194 63 
Other investments:
Gross gains 293 18 3 
Gross losses (22) — (1)
Impairment losses recognized in income (16) (91) (34)
Net gains (losses) on other investments 255 (73) (32)
Net gains on investments $ 311 $ 184 $ 84 
-91-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
The gains and losses related to equity securities for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020, and 2019 are as follows:
2021 2020 2019
Net (losses) gains recognized on equity securities $ (71)$ 194 $ 63 
Less: Net realized (losses) gains recognized on equity securities sold during the
period (73) 61 39 
Unrealized gains recognized in income on equity securities still held at
December 31 $ 2 $ 133 $ 24 
A primary objective in the management of our fixed maturity and equity portfolios is to maximize total return relative to
underlying liabilities and respective liquidity needs. In achieving this goal, assets may be sold to take advantage of market conditions
or other investment opportunities as well as tax considerations. Sales will generally produce realized gains and losses. In the ordinary
course of business, we may sell securities at a loss for a number of reasons, including, but not limited to: (i) changes in the investment
environment; (ii) expectations that the fair value could deteriorate further; (iii) desire to reduce exposure to an issuer or an industry;
(iv) changes in credit quality; or (v) changes in expected cash flow.
Total proceeds from sales, maturities, calls or redemptions of fixed maturity securities was $10,565, $11,122 and $8,351 for the
years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
A significant judgment in the valuation of investments is the determination of when a credit loss has occurred. We follow a
consistent and systematic process for recognizing impairments on securities that sustain credit declines in value. We have established a
committee responsible for the impairment review process. The decision to impair a security incorporates both quantitative criteria and
qualitative information. The impairment review process considers a number of factors including, but not limited to: (i) the extent to
which the fair value is less than book value, (ii) the financial condition and near term prospects of the issuer, (iii) our intent and ability
to retain impaired investments for a period of time sufficient to allow for any anticipated recovery in fair value, (iv) our intent to sell
or the likelihood that we will need to sell a fixed maturity security before recovery of its amortized cost basis, (v) whether the debtor is
current on interest and principal payments, (vi) the reasons for the decline in value (i.e., credit event compared to liquidity, general
credit spread widening, currency exchange rate or interest rate factors) and (vii) general market conditions and industry or sector
specific factors. For securities that are deemed to be credit impaired, an allowance is created.
Investment securities are exposed to various risks, such as interest rate, market and credit. Due to the level of risk associated with
certain investment securities and the level of uncertainty related to changes in the value of investment securities, it is possible that
changes in these risk factors in the near term could have a material adverse impact on our results of operations or shareholders’ equity.
At December 31, 2021 and 2020, there were no individual investments that exceeded 10% of shareholders’ equity.
At December 31, 2021 and 2020, there were two and three, respectively, fixed maturity investments that did not produce income
during the years then ended.
As of December 31, 2021 and 2020, we had committed approximately $1,558 and $1,320, respectively, to future capital calls
from various third-party investments in exchange for an ownership interest in the related entities.
At December 31, 2021 and 2020, securities with carrying values of approximately $632 and $562, respectively, were deposited by
our insurance subsidiaries under requirements of regulatory authorities.
Accrued Investment Income
Accrued investment income totaled $205 and $188, at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively. We recognize accrued
investment income under the caption “Other receivables” on our consolidated balance sheets.
Securities Lending Programs
The fair value of the collateral received at the time of the securities lending transactions amounted to $2,155 and $1,199 at
December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively. The value of the collateral represented 102% of the market value of the securities on loan
at each of December 31, 2021 and 2020.
-92-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
We recognize the collateral as an asset under the caption “Other current assets” in our consolidated balance sheets, and we
recognize a corresponding liability for the obligation to return the collateral to the borrower under the caption “Other current
liabilities.” The securities on loan are reported in the applicable investment category on our consolidated balance sheets.
At December 31, 2021 and 2020, the remaining contractual maturities of our securities lending transactions included overnight
and continuous transactions of cash for $1,874 and $1,056, respectively, and United States Government securities for $281 and $143,
respectively.
-93-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
6. Derivative Financial Instruments
We primarily invest in the following types of derivative financial instruments: interest rate swaps, futures, forward contracts, put
and call options, collars, swaptions, embedded derivatives and warrants. We also enter into master netting agreements which reduce
credit risk by permitting net settlement of transactions. At December 31, 2021 and 2020, we had received collateral of $18 and $37,
respectively, related to our derivative financial instruments.
A summary of the aggregate contractual or notional amounts and estimated fair values related to derivative financial instruments
at December 31, 2021 and 2020 is as follows:
 Contractual/
Notional
Amount Balance Sheet LocationEstimated Fair Value
Asset (Liability)
December 31, 2021
Hedging instruments
Interest rate swaps - fixed to floating $ 825 Other assets/other liabilities $ 23 $ (5)
Non-hedging instruments
Interest rate swaps 119 Equity securities/other assets/other
liabilities — (5)
Options 100 Other assets/other liabilities — — 
Collars 19 Equity securities 21 (17)
Futures 344 Equity securities 3 (2)
Subtotal non-hedging 582 Subtotal non-hedging 24 (24)
Total derivatives $ 1,407 Total derivatives 47 (29)
Amounts netted (21) 21 
Net derivatives $ 26 $ (8)
December 31, 2020
Hedging instruments
Interest rate swaps - fixed to floating $ 575 Other assets/other liabilities $ 37 $ — 
Non-hedging instruments
Interest rate swaps 27 Equity securities — — 
Futures 183 Equity securities 6 (5)
Subtotal non-hedging 210 Subtotal non-hedging 6 (5)
Total derivatives $ 785 Total derivatives 43 (5)
Amounts netted — — 
Net derivatives $ 43 $ (5)
-94-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Fair Value Hedges
We have entered into various interest rate swap contracts to convert a portion of our interest rate exposure on our long-term debt
from fixed rates to floating rates. The floating rates payable on all of our fair value hedges are benchmarked to the LIBOR. A summary
of our outstanding fair value hedges at December 31, 2021 and 2020 is as follows:
Type of Fair Value HedgesYear
Entered
IntoOutstanding Notional Amount
Interest Rate
Received Expiration Date 2021 2020
Interest rate swap 2021 $ 150 $ — 2.550 % September 15, 2030
Interest rate swap 2021 100 — 2.250 November 15, 2029
Interest rate swap 2020 75 75 4.101 September 1, 2027
Interest rate swap 2018 50 50 4.101 September 1, 2027
Interest rate swap 2018 450 450 3.300 January 15, 2023
Total notional amount outstanding $ 825 $ 575 
The following amounts were recorded on our consolidated balance sheets related to cumulative basis adjustments for fair value
hedges at December 31, 2021 and 2020:
Balance Sheet Classification in Which
Hedged Item is IncludedCarrying Amount of Hedged LiabilityCumulative Amount of Fair Value Hedging
Adjustment Included in the Carrying Amount of the
Hedged Liability
2021 2020 2021 2020
Current portion of long term-debt $ 1,599 $ 700 $ 23 $ 37 
Long-term debt 21,157 19,335 (5) — 
Cash Flow Hedges
We have entered into a series of forward starting pay fixed interest rate swaps with the objective of eliminating the variability of
cash flows in the interest payments on future financings that were anticipated at the time of entering into the swaps. During 2021 and
2020, swaps in the notional amount of $450 and $725, respectively, were terminated.
The unrecognized loss for all expired and terminated cash flow hedges included in accumulated other comprehensive loss, net of
tax, was $239 and $250 at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively. As of December 31, 2021, the total amount of amortization over
the next twelve months for all cash flow hedges is estimated to increase interest expense by approximately $13. No amounts were
excluded from effectiveness testing.
-95-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Non-Hedging Derivatives
A summary of the effect of non-hedging derivatives on our consolidated statements of income for the years ended December 31,
2021, 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
Type of Non-hedging DerivativesIncome Statement Location of
Gain (Loss) RecognizedDerivative
Gain (Loss)
Recognized
Year ended December 31, 2021
Interest rate swaps Net gains on financial instruments $ (4)
Collars Net gains on financial instruments 4 
Futures Net gains on financial instruments 7 
Total $ 7 
Year ended December 31, 2020
Interest rate swaps Net gains on financial instruments $ (1)
Options Net gains on financial instruments (5)
Futures Net gains on financial instruments 4 
Total $ (2)
Year ended December 31, 2019
Interest rate swaps Net gains on financial instruments $ 1 
Options Net gains on financial instruments (8)
Futures Net gains on financial instruments (10)
Total $ (17)
7. Fair Value
Assets and liabilities recorded at fair value in the consolidated balance sheets are categorized based upon the level of judgment
associated with the inputs used to measure their fair value. Level inputs, as defined by FASB guidance for fair value measurements
and disclosures, are as follows:
Level Input: Input Definition:
Level I  Inputs are unadjusted, quoted prices for identical assets or liabilities in active markets at the measurement date.
Level II
 Inputs other than quoted prices included in Level I that are observable for the asset or liability through
corroboration with market data at the measurement date.
Level III
 Unobservable inputs that reflect management’s best estimate of what market participants would use in pricing the
asset or liability at the measurement date.
The following methods, assumptions and inputs were used to determine the fair value of each class of the following assets and
liabilities recorded at fair value in the consolidated balance sheets:
Cash equivalents: Cash equivalents primarily consist of highly rated money market funds with maturities of three months or less,
and are purchased daily at par value with specified yield rates. Due to the high ratings and short-term nature of the funds, we designate
all cash equivalents as Level I.
Fixed maturity securities, available-for-sale: Fair values of available-for-sale fixed maturity securities are based on quoted market
prices, where available. These fair values are obtained primarily from third-party pricing services, which generally use Level I or
Level II inputs for the determination of fair value to facilitate fair value measurements and disclosures. Level II securities primarily
include corporate securities, securities from states, municipalities and political subdivisions, mortgage-backed securities, United States
Government securities, foreign government securities, and certain other asset-backed securities. For securities not actively traded, the
pricing services may use quoted market prices of comparable instruments or discounted cash flow analyses, incorporating inputs that
are currently observable in the markets
-96-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
for similar securities. We have controls in place to review the pricing services’ qualifications and procedures used to determine fair
values. In addition, we periodically review the pricing services’ pricing methodologies, data sources and pricing inputs to ensure the
fair values obtained are reasonable. Inputs that are often used in the valuation methodologies include, but are not limited to, broker
quotes, benchmark yields, credit spreads, default rates and prepayment speeds. We also have certain fixed maturity securities,
primarily corporate debt securities, that are designated Level III securities. For these securities, the valuation methodologies may
incorporate broker quotes or discounted cash flow analyses using assumptions for inputs such as expected cash flows, benchmark
yields, credit spreads, default rates and prepayment speeds that are not observable in the markets.
Equity securities: Fair values of equity securities are generally designated as Level I and are based on quoted market prices. For
certain equity securities, quoted market prices for the identical security are not always available, and the fair value is estimated by
reference to similar securities for which quoted prices are available. These securities are designated Level II. We also have certain
equity securities, including private equity securities, for which the fair value is estimated based on each security’s current condition
and future cash flow projections. Such securities are designated Level III. The fair values of these private equity securities are
generally based on either broker quotes or discounted cash flow projections using assumptions for inputs such as the weighted-average
cost of capital, long-term revenue growth rates and earnings before interest, taxes, depreciation and amortization, and/or revenue
multiples that are not observable in the markets.
Securities lending collateral: Fair values of securities lending collateral are based on quoted market prices, where available. These
fair values are obtained primarily from third-party pricing services, which generally use Level I or Level II inputs for the
determination of fair value, to facilitate fair value measurements and disclosures.
Derivatives: Fair values are based on the quoted market prices by the financial institution that is the counterparty to the derivative
transaction. We independently verify prices provided by the counterparties using valuation models that incorporate market observable
inputs for similar derivative transactions. Derivatives are designated as Level II securities. Derivatives presented within the fair value
hierarchy table below are presented on a gross basis and not on a master netting basis by counterparty.
In addition, the following methods and assumptions were used to determine the fair value of each class of pension benefit plan
assets and other benefit plan assets not defined above (see Note 11, “Retirement Benefits,” for fair values of benefit plan assets):
Mutual funds: Fair values are based on quoted market prices, which represent the net asset value (“NAV”) of the shares held.
Partnership investments: Fair values are estimated based on the plan’s proportionate share of the undistributed partners’ capital as
reported in audited financial statements of the partnership. In accordance with FASB guidance, certain investments that are measured
at fair value using the NAV per share as a practical expedient or the fair value measurement alternative have been classified in the fair
value hierarchy. The fair value amounts presented are intended to permit reconciliation of the fair value hierarchy to the total
investments of the master trust.
Commingled fund: Fair value is based on NAV per fund share, primarily derived from the quoted prices in active markets on the
underlying equity securities.
Contract with insurance company: Fair value of the contract in the insurance company general investment account is determined
by the insurance company based on the fair value of the underlying investments of the account.
Investment in DOL 103-12 trust: Fair value is based on the plan’s proportionate share of the fair value of investments held by the
trust, qualified as a Department of Labor Regulation 2520.103-12 entity (“DOL 103-12 trust”) as reported in the audited financial
statements of the trust, where the trustee applies fair value measurements to the underlying investments of the trust.
Life insurance contracts: Fair value is based on the cash surrender value of the policies as reported by the insurer.
-97-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
A summary of fair value measurements by level for assets and liabilities measured at fair value on a recurring basis at
December 31, 2021 and 2020 is as follows:
Level I Level II Level III Total
December 31, 2021
Assets:
Cash equivalents $ 2,415 $ — $ — $ 2,415 
Fixed maturity securities, available-for-sale:
United States Government securities — 1,432 — 1,432 
Government sponsored securities — 68 — 68 
Foreign government securities — 347 — 347 
States, municipalities and political subdivisions, tax-exempt — 5,621 — 5,621 
Corporate securities — 12,027 336 12,363 
Residential mortgage-backed securities — 4,092 5 4,097 
Commercial mortgage-backed securities — 64 — 64 
Other securities — 2,888 19 2,907 
Total fixed maturity securities, available-for-sale — 26,539 360 26,899 
Equity securities:
Exchange traded funds 1,750 — — 1,750 
Common equity securities 8 34 — 42 
Private equity securities — — 89 89 
Total equity securities 1,758 34 89 1,881 
Other invested assets - common equity securities 138 — — 138 
Securities lending collateral — 2,155 — 2,155 
Derivatives - other assets — 19 — 19 
Total assets $ 4,311 $28,747 $ 449 $33,507 
Liabilities:
Derivatives - other liabilities $ — $ (1)$ — $ (1)
Total liabilities $ — $ (1)$ — $ (1)
December 31, 2020
Assets:
Cash equivalents $ 3,163 $ — $ — $ 3,163 
Fixed maturity securities, available-for-sale:
United States Government securities — 774 — 774 
Government sponsored securities — 69 — 69 
Foreign government securities — 305 — 305 
States, municipalities and political subdivisions, tax-exempt — 5,579 — 5,579 
Corporate securities — 10,567 325 10,892 
Residential mortgage-backed securities — 4,343 2 4,345 
Commercial mortgage-backed securities — 72 — 72 
Other securities — 1,954 5 1,959 
Total fixed maturity securities, available-for-sale — 23,663 332 23,995 
Equity securities:
Exchange traded funds 1,154 — — 1,154 
Fixed maturity mutual funds — 144 — 144 
Common equity securities 171 30 — 201 
Private equity securities — — 60 60 
Total equity securities 1,325 174 60 1,559 
Securities lending collateral — 1,199 — 1,199 
Derivatives — 43 — 43 
Total assets $ 4,488 $25,079 $ 392 $29,959 
Liabilities:
Derivatives $ — $ (5)$ — $ (5)
Total liabilities $ — $ (5)$ — $ (5)
-98-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending balances of assets measured at fair value on a recurring basis using Level III inputs
for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
Corporate
SecuritiesResidential
Mortgage-
backed
SecuritiesOther
SecuritiesEquity
Securities Total
Year ended December 31, 2021
Beginning balance at January 1, 2021 $ 325 $ 2 $ 5 $ 60 $ 392 
Total gains (losses):
Recognized in net income 2 — — 17 19 
Recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income 3 — — — 3 
Purchases 179 4 17 16 216 
Sales (18) — — (4) (22)
Settlements (157) — — — (157)
Transfers into Level III 3 — — — 3 
Transfers out of Level III (1) (1) (3) — (5)
Ending balance at December 31, 2021 $ 336 $ 5 $ 19 $ 89 $ 449 
Change in unrealized gains or losses included in net income related to
assets still held at December 31, 2021 $ — $ — $ — $ 18 $ 18 
Year ended December 31, 2020
Beginning balance at January 1, 2020 $ 303 $ 2 $ 7 $ 85 $ 397 
Total gains (losses):
Recognized in net income (3) — — (19) (22)
Recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income (5) — — — (5)
Purchases 85 — — 16 101 
Sales (19) — — (22) (41)
Settlements (44) — (2) — (46)
Transfers into Level III 10 — — — 10 
Transfers out of Level III (2) — — — (2)
Ending balance at December 31, 2020 $ 325 $ 2 $ 5 $ 60 $ 392 
Change in unrealized gains or losses included in net income related to
assets still held at December 31, 2020 $ — $ — $ — $ (19)$ (19)
Year ended December 31, 2019
Beginning balance at January 1, 2019 $ 287 $ 6 $ 17 $ 313 $ 623 
Total gains (losses):
Recognized in net income (7) — — (6) (13)
Recognized in accumulated other comprehensive loss 3 — — — 3 
Purchases 122 — 2 65 189 
Sales (22) — — (79) (101)
Settlements (71) (2) (6) — (79)
Transfers into Level III — — 3 2 5 
Transfers out of Level III (9) (2) (9) (210) (230)
Ending balance at December 31, 2019 $ 303 $ 2 $ 7 $ 85 $ 397 
Change in unrealized gains or losses included in net income related to
assets still held at December 31, 2019 $ — $ — $ — $ 6 $ 6 
There were no individually material transfers into or out of Level III during the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 or 2019.
Certain assets and liabilities are measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis; that is, the instruments are not measured at fair
value on an ongoing basis but are subject to fair value adjustments only in certain circumstances. As disclosed in Note 3, “Business
Acquisitions,” we completed our acquisitions of myNEXUS and MMM during the second quarter of 2021, as well as our acquisition
of Beacon during the first quarter of 2020. The net assets acquired in our acquisitions of myNEXUS,
-99-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
MMM and Beacon and resulting goodwill and other intangible assets were recorded at fair value primarily using Level III inputs. The
majority of assets acquired and liabilities assumed were recorded at their carrying values as of the respective date of acquisition, as
their carrying values approximated their fair values due to their short-term nature. The fair values of goodwill and other intangible
assets acquired in our acquisitions of myNEXUS, MMM and Beacon were internally estimated based on the income approach. The
income approach estimates fair value based on the present value of the cash flows that the assets could be expected to generate in the
future. We developed internal estimates for the expected cash flows and discount rate in the present value calculation. Other than the
assets acquired and liabilities assumed in our acquisitions of myNEXUS, MMM and Beacon described above, there were no material
assets or liabilities measured at fair value on a nonrecurring basis during the years ended December 31, 2021 or 2020.
Our valuation policy is determined by members of our treasury and accounting departments. Whenever possible, our policy is to
obtain quoted market prices in active markets to estimate fair values for recognition and disclosure purposes. Where quoted market
prices in active markets are not available, fair values are estimated using discounted cash flow analyses, broker quotes, unobservable
inputs or other valuation techniques. These techniques are significantly affected by our assumptions, including discount rates and
estimates of future cash flows. The use of assumptions for unobservable inputs for the determination of fair value involves a level of
judgment and uncertainty. Changes in assumptions that reasonably could have been different at the reporting date may result in a
higher or lower determination of fair value. Changes in fair value measurements, if significant, may affect performance of cash flows.
Potential taxes and other transaction costs are not considered in estimating fair values. Our valuation policy is generally to obtain
quoted prices for each security from third-party pricing services, which are derived through recently reported trades for identical or
similar securities making adjustments through the reporting date based upon available market observable information. As we are
responsible for the determination of fair value, we perform analysis on the prices received from the pricing services to determine
whether the prices are reasonable estimates of fair value. This analysis is performed by our internal treasury personnel who are
familiar with our investment portfolios, the pricing services engaged and the valuation techniques and inputs used. Our analysis
includes procedures such as a review of month-to-month price fluctuations and price comparisons to secondary pricing services. There
were no adjustments to quoted market prices obtained from the pricing services during the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 or
2019.
In addition to the preceding disclosures on assets recorded at fair value in the consolidated balance sheets, FASB guidance also
requires the disclosure of fair values for certain other financial instruments for which it is practicable to estimate fair value, whether or
not such values are recognized in the consolidated balance sheets.
Non-financial instruments such as real estate, property and equipment, other current assets, deferred income taxes, intangible
assets and certain financial instruments, such as policy liabilities, are excluded from the fair value disclosures. Therefore, the fair value
amounts cannot be aggregated to determine our underlying economic value.
The carrying amounts reported in the consolidated balance sheets for cash, premium receivables, self-funded receivables, other
receivables, unearned income, accounts payable and accrued expenses, and certain other current liabilities approximate fair value
because of the short-term nature of these items. These assets and liabilities are not listed in the table below.
The following methods and assumptions were used to estimate the fair value of each class of financial instrument that is recorded
at its carrying value on the consolidated balance sheets:
Other invested assets: Other invested assets primarily include our investments in limited partnerships, joint ventures and other
non-controlled corporations and mortgage loans, as well as the cash surrender value of corporate-owned life insurance policies.
Investments in limited partnerships, joint ventures and other non-controlled corporations are carried at our share in the entities’
undistributed earnings, which approximates fair value. Mortgage loans are carried at amortized cost, which approximates fair value.
The carrying value of corporate-owned life insurance policies represents the cash surrender value as reported by the respective insurer,
which approximates fair value.
Short-term borrowings: The fair value of our short-term borrowings is based on quoted market prices for the same or similar debt,
or if no quoted market prices were available, on the current market interest rates estimated to be available to us for debt of similar
terms and remaining maturities.
-100-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Long-term debt—commercial paper: The carrying amount for commercial paper approximates fair value, as the underlying
instruments have variable interest rates at market value.
Long-term debt—senior unsecured notes and surplus notes: The fair values of our notes are based on quoted market prices in
active markets for the same or similar debt, or, if no quoted market prices are available, on the current market observable rates
estimated to be available to us for debt of similar terms and remaining maturities.
Long-term debt—convertible debentures: The fair value of our convertible debentures is based on the quoted market price in the
active private market in which the convertible debentures trade.
A summary of the estimated fair values by level of each class of financial instrument that is recorded at its carrying value on our
consolidated balance sheets at December 31, 2021 and 2020 is as follows:
 Carrying
ValueEstimated Fair Value
 Level I Level II Level III Total
December 31, 2021
Assets:
Other invested assets $ 5,087 $ — $ — $ 5,087 $ 5,087 
Liabilities:
Debt:
Short-term borrowings 275 — 275 — 275 
Commercial paper 300 — 300 — 300 
Notes 22,384 — 25,150 — 25,150 
Convertible debentures 72 — 687 — 687 
December 31, 2020
Assets:
Other invested assets $ 4,285 $ — $ — $ 4,285 $ 4,285 
Liabilities:
Debt:
Commercial paper 250 — 250 — 250 
Notes 19,677 — 23,307 — 23,307 
Convertible debentures 108 — 712 — 712 
-101-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
8. Income Taxes
The components of deferred income taxes at December 31, 2021 and 2020 are as follows:
2021 2020
Deferred income tax assets:
Accrued expenses $ 511 $ 588 
Bad debt reserves 246 143 
Insurance reserves 156 187 
Lease liabilities 216 204 
Retirement liabilities 170 205 
Deferred compensation 35 31 
Federal and state operating loss carryforwards 201 274 
Other 207 113 
Subtotal 1,742 1,745 
Less: valuation allowance (212) (84)
Total deferred income tax assets 1,530 1,661 
Deferred income tax liabilities:
U.S. federal and state intangible assets 2,071 2,073 
Non-U.S. intangible assets 452 — 
Capitalized software 777 670 
Depreciation and amortization 45 37 
Investment basis 295 407 
Retirement assets 314 260 
Lease right-of-use asset 126 131 
Prepaid expenses 152 102 
Total deferred income tax liabilities 4,232 3,680 
Net deferred income tax liabilities $ 2,702 $ 2,019 
Deferred tax liabilities, net totaled $2,702 and $2,019 at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively in our consolidated balance
sheet. We recognized $103 and $0 of deferred tax asset under the caption “Other noncurrent assets” at December 31, 2021 and 2020,
respectively. We recognized $2,805 and $2,019 of deferred tax liability under the caption “Deferred tax liabilities, net” at December
31, 2021 and 2020.
As of December 31, 2021, and as a result of acquisitions during the year, we established U.S. deferred taxes for undistributed
earnings from certain non-U.S. subsidiaries, which are included in the Investment basis component above. As of December 31, 2020,
our undistributed earnings from all non-U.S. subsidiaries were intended to be indefinitely reinvested in non-U.S. operations, and
therefore no U.S. deferred taxes were recorded.
-102-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Significant components of the provision for income taxes for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 consist of the
following:
2021 2020 2019
Current tax expense:
Federal $ 1,485 $ 1,731 $ 1,019 
State and local 165 461 84 
Total current tax expense 1,650 2,192 1,103 
Deferred tax expense (benefit) 180 (526) 75 
Total income tax expense $ 1,830 $ 1,666 $ 1,178 
State and local current tax expense is reported gross of federal benefit in the preceding table, and includes amounts related to audit
settlements, uncertain tax positions, state tax credits and true up of prior years’ tax. Such items are included on a net of federal tax
basis in multiple lines in the following rate reconciliation table.
A reconciliation of income tax expense recorded in the consolidated statements of income and amounts computed at the statutory
federal income tax rate for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
 2021 2020 2019
 Amount Percent Amount Percent Amount Percent
Amount at statutory rate $ 1,664 21.0 %$ 1,310 21.0 %$ 1,257 21.0 %
State and local income taxes net of federal tax
expense/benefit 258 3.3 235 3.8 138 2.3 
Tax exempt interest and dividends received
deduction (22) (0.3) (22) (0.4) (24) (0.4)
HIP fee — — 330 5.3 — — 
Basis adjustments from recent acquisitions — — (110) (1.8) — — 
Other, net (70) (0.9) (77) (1.2) (193) (3.2)
Total income tax expense $ 1,830 23.1 %$ 1,666 26.7 %$ 1,178 19.7 %
During the year ended December 31, 2021, we recognized income tax expense of $1,830, or $7.41 per diluted share. The HIP Fee
payment was eliminated beginning in 2021.
During the year ended December 31, 2020, we recognized income tax expense of $1,666, or $6.55 per diluted share, which
included income tax expense of $330, or $1.30 per diluted share as a result of the non-tax deductibility of the HIP Fee payment, which
was reinstated for 2020.
During the year ended December 31, 2019, we recognized income tax expense of $1,178, or $4.53 per diluted share. The HIP Fee
payment was suspended for 2019.
The change in the carrying amount of gross unrecognized tax benefits from uncertain tax positions for the years ended
December 31, 2021 and 2020 is as follows:
2021 2020
Balance at January 1 $ 249 $ 146 
Additions based on:
Tax positions related to current year 10 76 
Tax positions related to prior years 17 40 
Reductions based on:
Tax positions related to prior years (5) (13)
Balance at December 31 $ 271 $ 249 
-103-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
The table above excludes interest, net of related tax benefits, which is treated as income tax expense (benefit) under our
accounting policy. The interest is included in the amounts described in the following paragraph.
The amount of unrecognized tax benefits that would impact our effective tax rate in future periods, if recognized, was $250 and
$227 at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively. Also included in the table above, at December 31, 2021, is $2 that would be
recognized as an adjustment to additional paid-in capital, which would not affect our effective tax rate. In addition to the contingent
liabilities included in the table above, we filed protective state income tax refund claims of approximately $310 during 2017. There
were no equivalent protective state income tax refund claims filed in 2021, 2020 or 2019.
For the year ended December 31, 2021, we recognized a net interest expense of $9. For the years ended December 31, 2020 and
2019, we recognized a net interest expense (benefit) of $7 and ($11), respectively. We had accrued approximately $42 and $33 for the
payment of interest at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
As of December 31, 2021, as further described below, certain tax years remain open to examination by the Internal Revenue
Service (“IRS”) and various state and local authorities. As a result of these examinations and discussions with taxing agencies, we
have recorded amounts for uncertain tax positions. It is anticipated that the amount of unrecognized tax benefits will change in the
next twelve months due to possible settlements of audits and changes in temporary items. However, the ultimate resolution of these
items is dependent on the completion of negotiations with various taxing authorities. While it is difficult to determine when other tax
settlements will actually occur, it is reasonably possible that one could occur in the next twelve months and our unrecognized tax
benefits could change within a range of approximately ($14) to ($105).
We are a member of the IRS Compliance Assurance Process (“CAP”). The objective of CAP is to reduce taxpayer burden and
uncertainty while assuring the IRS of the accuracy of tax returns prior to filing, thereby reducing or eliminating the need for post-filing
examinations.
As of December 31, 2021, the IRS examination of our 2021 tax year continues to be in process.
In certain states, we pay premium taxes in lieu of state income taxes. Premium taxes are reported in selling, general and
administrative expense.
At December 31, 2021, we had federal net operating loss carryforwards of $181 that will expire beginning 2032 through 2041 and
$153 that have an indefinite carryforward period; state net operating loss carryforwards expire beginning 2022 through 2041, with
some having an indefinite carryforward period.
Income taxes receivable totaled $173 and $262 at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively. We recognize the income tax
receivable as an asset under the caption “Other current assets” in our consolidated balance sheets.
During 2021, 2020 and 2019, federal income taxes paid totaled $1,299, $1,790 and $1,403, respectively.
9. Property and Equipment
A summary of property and equipment at December 31, 2021 and 2020 is as follows:
2021 2020
Computer software, purchased and internally developed $ 6,115 $ 5,247 
Computer equipment, furniture and other equipment 1,314 1,218 
Leasehold improvements 641 671 
Building and improvements 172 174 
Land and improvements 17 17 
Property and equipment, gross 8,259 7,327 
Accumulated depreciation and amortization (4,340) (3,844)
Property and equipment, net $ 3,919 $ 3,483 
-104-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Depreciation expense for 2021, 2020 and 2019 was $136, $176 and $147, respectively. Amortization expense on computer
software and leasehold improvements for 2021, 2020 and 2019 was $532, $462 and $528, respectively, which includes amortization
expense on computer software, both purchased and internally developed, for 2021, 2020 and 2019 of $485, $412 and $450,
respectively. Capitalized costs related to the internal development of software of $5,626 and $4,783 at December 31, 2021 and 2020,
respectively, are reported with computer software.
Impairment of property and equipment for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 was $73 and $198, respectively, which is
included in selling, general and administrative expenses. Included in these amounts was impairment of property and equipment related
to our activities as disclosed in Note 4, “Business Optimization Initiatives.” For the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020, we
recorded impairment charges for property and equipment related to these initiatives of $66 and $198, respectively.
10. Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets
A summary of the change in the carrying amount of goodwill for our segments (see Note 20, “Segment Information”) for 2021
and 2020 is as follows:
Commercial
and Specialty
BusinessGovernment
Business IngenioRx Other Total
Balance as of January 1, 2020 $ 11,551 $ 8,279 $ — $ 670 $ 20,500 
Acquisitions and adjustments 42 52 48 1,049 1,191 
Balance as of December 31, 2020 11,593 8,331 48 1,719 21,691 
Acquisitions and adjustments — 2,018 11 508 2,537 
Balance as of December 31, 2021 $ 11,593 $ 10,349 $ 59 $ 2,227 $ 24,228 
Accumulated impairment as of December 31, 2021 $ — $ — $ — $ — $ — 
As required by FASB guidance, we completed annual impairment tests of existing goodwill and other intangible assets with
indefinite lives during 2021, 2020 and 2019. We perform these annual impairment tests during the fourth quarter. FASB guidance also
requires interim impairment testing to be performed when potential impairment indicators exist. These tests involve the use of
estimates related to the fair value of goodwill and intangible assets with indefinite lives and require a significant degree of
management judgment and the use of subjective assumptions. Qualitative testing procedures include assessing our financial
performance, macroeconomic conditions, industry and market considerations, various asset specific factors and entity specific events.
For quantitative testing, the fair values are estimated using the projected income and market valuation approaches, incorporating Level
III internal estimates for inputs, including, but not limited to, revenue projections, income projections, cash flows and discount
rates. We did not incur any impairment losses in 2021, 2020 or 2019, as the estimated fair values of our reporting units were
substantially in excess of their carrying values.
-105-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
The components of other intangible assets as of December 31, 2021 and 2020 are as follows:
 2021 2020
Gross
Carrying
AmountAccumulated
AmortizationNet
Carrying
AmountGross
Carrying
AmountAccumulated
AmortizationNet
Carrying
Amount
Intangible assets with finite lives:
Customer relationships $ 5,598 $ (3,236)$ 2,362 $ 5,180 $ (3,766)$ 1,414 
Provider and hospital relationships 324 (129) 195 323 (114) 209 
Other 610 (141) 469 444 (177) 267 
Total 6,532 (3,506) 3,026 5,947 (4,057) 1,890 
Intangible assets with indefinite lives:
Blue Cross and Blue Shield and other
trademarks 6,299 — 6,299 6,299 — 6,299 
State Medicaid licenses 1,290 — 1,290 1,216 — 1,216 
Total 7,589 — 7,589 7,515 — 7,515 
Other intangible assets $ 14,121 $ (3,506)$10,615 $ 13,462 $ (4,057)$ 9,405 
Intangible assets, along with the related accumulated amortization, are removed from the table above at the end of the fiscal year
in which they become fully amortized.
As of December 31, 2021, the estimated amortization expense for each of the five succeeding years is as follows: 2022, $483;
2023, $429; 2024, $369; 2025, $317; and 2026, $264.
11. Retirement Benefits
We sponsor various non-contributory employee defined benefit plans through certain subsidiaries. 
The Anthem Cash Balance Plan A and the Anthem Cash Balance Plan B are cash balance pension plans covering certain eligible
employees of the affiliated companies that participate in these plans. Effective January 1, 2006, benefits were curtailed, with the result
that most participants stopped accruing benefits but continue to earn interest on benefits accrued prior to the curtailment. Certain
participants subject to collective bargaining and certain other participants who met grandfathering rules continued to accrue benefits.
Participants who did not receive credits and/or benefit accruals were included in the Anthem Cash Balance Plan A, while employees
who were still receiving credits and/or benefits participated in the Anthem Cash Balance Plan B. Effective January 1, 2019, benefits
under the Anthem Cash Balance Plan B were curtailed. All grandfathered participants no longer have pay credits added to their
accounts but continue to earn interest on existing account balances. Participants continue to earn years of pension service for vesting
purposes. Several pension plans acquired through various corporate mergers and acquisitions were merged into these plans in prior
years.
The Employees’ Retirement Plan of Blue Cross of California (the “BCC Plan”) is a defined benefit pension plan that covers
eligible employees of Blue Cross of California who are covered by a collective bargaining agreement. Effective January 1, 2007,
benefits were curtailed under the BCC Plan with the result that no Blue Cross of California employees hired or rehired after
December 31, 2006 are eligible to participate in the BCC Plan.
All of the plans’ assets consist primarily of equity securities, fixed maturity securities, investment funds and cash. The funding
policies for all plans are to contribute amounts at least sufficient to meet the minimum funding requirements set forth in the Employee
Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended (“ERISA”), as further amended by the Pension Protection Act of 2006, and in
accordance with income tax regulations, plus such additional amounts as are necessary to provide assets sufficient to meet the benefits
to be paid to plan participants.
The following tables disclose consolidated “pension benefits,” which include the defined benefit pension plans described above,
and consolidated “other benefits,” which include postretirement health and welfare benefits including medical, vision and dental
benefits offered to certain employees. Calculations were computed using assumptions at the December 31 measurement dates.
-106-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
The reconciliation of the benefit obligation is as follows:
 Pension Benefits Other Benefits
 2021 2020 2021 2020
Benefit obligation at beginning of year $ 2,009 $ 1,880 $ 399 $ 423 
Service cost — — 1 1 
Interest cost 34 47 5 10 
Plan participant contributions — — 17 18 
Actuarial (gain) loss (33) 219 (31) (15)
Settlements (90) (80) — — 
Benefits paid (61) (57) (48) (38)
Benefit obligation at end of year $ 1,859 $ 2,009 $ 343 $ 399 
The changes in the fair value of plan assets are as follows:
 Pension Benefits Other Benefits
 2021 2020 2021 2020
Fair value of plan assets at beginning of year $ 2,186 $ 2,026 $ 391 $ 367 
Actual return on plan assets 174 290 33 33 
Employer contributions 7 7 — 11 
Plan participant contributions — — 17 18 
Settlements (90) (80) (29) — 
Benefits paid (61) (57) (41) (38)
Fair value of plan assets at end of year $ 2,216 $ 2,186 $ 371 $ 391 
 The net amount included in the consolidated balance sheets is as follows:
 Pension Benefits Other Benefits
 2021 2020 2021 2020
Noncurrent assets $ 415 $ 248 $ 28 $ — 
Current liabilities (6) (6) — — 
Noncurrent liabilities (52) (65) — (8)
Net amount at December 31 $ 357 $ 177 $ 28 $ (8)
 The net amounts included in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) that have not been recognized as components of net
periodic benefit costs are as follows:
 Pension Benefits Other Benefits
 2021 2020 2021 2020
Net actuarial loss (gain) $ 625 $ 749 $ (36)$ 3 
Prior service credit — — (8) (12)
Net amount before tax at December 31 $ 625 $ 749 $ (44)$ (9)
The accumulated benefit obligation for the defined benefit pension plans was $1,857 and $2,007 at December 31, 2021 and 2020,
respectively. 
As of December 31, 2021, certain pension plans had accumulated benefit obligations in excess of plan assets. Such plans had
accumulated benefit obligation and fair value of plan assets of $56 and $0, respectively. In addition, certain plans had
-107-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
projected benefit obligations in excess of plan assets. Such plans had projected benefit obligation and fair value of plan assets of $107
and $49, respectively.
The weighted-average assumptions used in calculating the benefit obligations for all plans are as follows: 
 Pension Benefits Other Benefits
 2021 2020 2021 2020
Discount rate 2.70 % 2.24 % 2.49 % 1.99 %
Rate of compensation increase 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 %
Expected rate of return on plan assets 5.02 % 6.72 % 6.43 % 6.60 %
Interest crediting rate 3.82 % 3.82 % 1.56 % 0.87 %
The components of net periodic benefit credit included in the consolidated statements of income are as follows:
2021 2020 2019
Pension Benefits
Interest cost $ 34 $ 47 $ 62 
Expected return on assets (134) (138) (138)
Recognized actuarial loss 25 24 17 
Settlement loss 26 29 9 
Net periodic benefit credit $ (49)$ (38)$ (50)
Other Benefits
Service cost $ 1 $ 1 $ 1 
Interest cost 5 10 15 
Expected return on assets (26) (25) (22)
Recognized actuarial loss — — 2 
Amortization of prior service credit (4) (7) (12)
Net periodic benefit credit $ (24)$ (21)$ (16)
During the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, we incurred total settlement losses of $26, $29 and $9, respectively,
as lump-sum payments exceeded the service cost and interest cost components of net periodic benefit cost for certain of our plans. 
The weighted-average assumptions used in calculating the net periodic benefit cost for all plans are as follows:
2021 2020 2019
Pension Benefits
Discount rate 2.24 % 3.11 % 4.15 %
Rate of compensation increase 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 %
Expected rate of return on plan assets 6.72 % 7.33 % 7.44 %
Interest crediting rate 3.82 % 3.82 % 3.83 %
Other Benefits
Discount rate 1.99 % 2.93 % 4.04 %
Rate of compensation increase 3.00 % 3.00 % 3.00 %
Expected rate of return on plan assets 6.60 % 7.00 % 7.00 %
Interest crediting rate 0.87 % 1.81 % 3.12 %
-108-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
The assumed healthcare cost trend rates used to measure the expected cost of pre-Medicare (those who are not currently eligible
for Medicare benefits) other benefits at our December 31, 2021 measurement date was 7.00% for 2022, with a gradual decline to
4.50% by the year 2033. The assumed healthcare cost trend rates used to measure the expected cost of post-Medicare (those who are
currently eligible for Medicare benefits) other benefits at our December 31, 2021 measurement date was 5.50% for 2022, with a
gradual decline to 4.50% by the year 2033. These estimated trend rates are subject to change in the future.
Plan assets include a diversified mix of equity securities, investment grade fixed maturity securities and other types of
investments across a range of sectors and levels of capitalization to maximize long-term return for a prudent level of risk. The
weighted-average target allocation for pension benefit plan assets is 44% equity securities, 48% fixed maturity securities, and 8% to
all other types of investments. Equity securities primarily include a mix of domestic securities, foreign securities and mutual funds
invested in equities. Fixed maturity securities primarily include treasury securities, corporate bonds and asset-backed investments
issued by corporations and the U.S. government. Other types of investments primarily include insurance contracts designed
specifically for employee benefit plans and a commingled fund comprised primarily of equity securities. As of December 31, 2021,
there were no significant concentrations of investments in the pension benefit assets or other benefit assets. No plan assets were
invested in Anthem common stock.
The partnerships hold various types of underlying assets such as real estate and investments in oil and gas companies. Generally,
the partnership interests are not redeemable and are transferable only with the consent of the general partner. Unfunded commitments
related to all partnership interests totaled approximately $3 at each of December 31, 2021 and 2020.
Pension benefit assets and other benefit assets recorded at fair value are categorized based upon the level of judgment associated
with the inputs used to measure their fair value.
-109-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
 The fair values of our pension benefit assets and other benefit assets by asset category and level inputs at December 31, 2021,
excluding cash, investment income receivable and amounts due to/from brokers, resulting in a net asset of $48, and excluding
estimated claims settlements to be paid from other benefit assets of ($29), are as follows (see Note 7, “Fair Value,” for additional
information regarding the definition of level inputs):
Level I Level II Level III Total
December 31, 2021
Pension Benefit Assets:
Equity securities:
U.S. securities $ 682 $ — $ — $ 682 
Foreign securities 204 — — 204 
Mutual funds 49 — — 49 
Fixed maturity securities:
Government securities — 395 — 395 
Corporate securities — 379 — 379 
Asset-backed securities — 98 — 98 
Other types of investments:
Commingled fund — 106 — 106 
Insurance company contracts — — 179 179 
Total pension benefit assets at fair value $ 935 $ 978 $ 179 2,092 
Partnership investments 78 
Total pension benefit assets $ 2,170 
Other Benefit Assets:
Equity securities:
U.S. securities $ 10 $ — $ — $ 10 
Foreign securities 2 — — 2 
Mutual funds 24 — — 24 
Fixed maturity securities:
Government securities — 4 — 4 
Corporate securities — 4 — 4 
Asset-backed securities — 3 — 3 
Other types of investments:
Commingled fund — 2 — 2 
Life insurance contracts — — 338 338 
Investment in DOL 103-12 trust — 11 — 11 
Total other benefit assets $ 36 $ 24 $ 338 $ 398 
-110-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
The fair values of our pension benefit assets and other benefit assets by asset category and level inputs at December 31, 2020,
excluding cash, investment income receivable and amounts due to/from brokers, resulting in a net asset of $64, are as follows:
Level I Level II Level III Total
December 31, 2020
Pension Benefit Assets:
Equity securities:
U.S. securities $ 710 $ — $ — $ 710 
Foreign securities 238 — — 238 
Mutual funds 42 — — 42 
Fixed maturity securities:
Government securities — 237 — 237 
Corporate securities — 394 — 394 
Asset-backed securities — 137 — 137 
Other types of investments:
Commingled fund — 112 — 112 
Insurance company contracts — — 189 189 
Total pension benefit assets at fair value $ 990 $ 880 $ 189 2,059 
Partnership investments 74 
Total pension benefit assets $ 2,133 
Other Benefit Assets:
Equity securities:
U.S. securities $ 9 $ — $ — $ 9 
Foreign securities 3 — — 3 
Mutual funds 23 — — 23 
Fixed maturity securities:
Government securities — 2 — 2 
Corporate securities — 4 — 4 
Asset-backed securities — 3 — 3 
Other types of investments:
Commingled fund — 2 — 2 
Life insurance contracts — — 323 323 
Investment in DOL 103-12 trust — 11 — 11 
Total other benefit assets $ 35 $ 22 $ 323 $ 380 
-111-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending balances of plan assets measured at fair value using Level III inputs for the years
ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
Insurance
Company
ContractsLife
Insurance
Contracts Total
Year ended December 31, 2021
Beginning balance at January 1, 2021 $ 189 $ 323 $ 512 
Actual return on plan assets relating to assets still held at the reporting date (6) 26 20 
Purchases 5 — 5 
Sales (9) (11) (20)
Ending balance at December 31, 2021 $ 179 $ 338 $ 517 
Year ended December 31, 2020
Beginning balance at January 1, 2020 $ 175 $ 294 $ 469 
Actual return on plan assets relating to assets still held at the reporting date 7 29 36 
Purchases 15 — 15 
Sales (8) — (8)
Ending balance at December 31, 2020 $ 189 $ 323 $ 512 
Year ended December 31, 2019
Beginning balance at January 1, 2019 $ 166 $ 249 $ 415 
Actual return on plan assets relating to assets still held at the reporting date 12 45 57 
Purchases 6 — 6 
Sales (9) — (9)
Ending balance at December 31, 2019 $ 175 $ 294 $ 469 
There were no other transfers into or out of Level III during the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 or 2019.
Our current funding strategy is to fund an amount at least equal to the minimum required funding as determined under ERISA
with consideration of maximum tax deductible amounts. We may elect to make discretionary contributions up to the maximum amount
deductible for income tax purposes. For the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, no material contributions were necessary
to meet ERISA required funding levels. However, during each of the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, we made tax
deductible discretionary contributions to the pension benefit plans of $7, $7, and $4, respectively. Employer contributions to other
benefit plans represent discretionary contributions and do not include payments to retirees for current benefits.
Our estimated future payments for pension benefits and other benefits, which reflect expected future service, as appropriate, are as
follows:
Pension
BenefitsOther
Benefits
2022 $ 131 $ 32 
2023 127 31 
2024 123 30 
2025 119 28 
2026 117 27 
2027 - 2031 539 112 
-112-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
In addition to the defined benefit plans, we maintain the Anthem 401(k) Plan, which is a qualified defined contribution plan
covering substantially all employees. Voluntary employee contributions are matched by us subject to certain limitations. Contributions
made by us totaled $241, $221 and $201 during 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
12. Medical Claims Payable
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending balances for medical claims payable, by segment (see Note 20, “Segment
Information”), for the year ended December 31, 2021 is as follows:
Commercial
& Specialty
BusinessGovernment
Business Other Total
Gross medical claims payable, beginning of year $ 3,294 $ 7,646 $ 195 $ 11,135 
Ceded medical claims payable, beginning of year (13) (33) — (46)
Net medical claims payable, beginning of year 3,281 7,613 195 11,089 
Business combinations and purchase adjustments — 375 45 420 
Net incurred medical claims:
Current year 28,132 70,670 1,638 100,440 
Prior years redundancies (465) (1,222) (16) (1,703)
Total net incurred medical claims 27,667 69,448 1,622 98,737 
Net payments attributable to:
Current year medical claims 24,502 62,233 1,421 88,156 
Prior years medical claims 2,612 6,054 163 8,829 
Total net payments 27,114 68,287 1,584 96,985 
Net medical claims payable, end of year 3,834 9,149 278 13,261 
Ceded medical claims payable, end of year 13 8 — 21 
Gross medical claims payable, end of year $ 3,847 $ 9,157 $ 278 $ 13,282 
-113-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending balances for medical claims payable, by segment, for the year ended December 31,
2020 is as follows:
Commercial
& Specialty
BusinessGovernment
Business Other Total
Gross medical claims payable, beginning of year $ 3,039 $ 5,608 $ — $ 8,647 
Ceded medical claims payable, beginning of year (14) (19) — (33)
Net medical claims payable, beginning of year 3,025 5,589 — 8,614 
Business combinations and purchase adjustments — 141 198 339 
Net incurred medical claims:
Current year 24,894 58,912 1,288 85,094 
Prior years redundancies (375) (262) — (637)
Total net incurred medical claims 24,519 58,650 1,288 84,457 
Net payments attributable to:
Current year medical claims 21,736 51,602 1,291 74,629 
Prior years medical claims 2,527 5,165 — 7,692 
Total net payments 24,263 56,767 1,291 82,321 
Net medical claims payable, end of year 3,281 7,613 195 11,089 
Ceded medical claims payable, end of year 13 33 — 46 
Gross medical claims payable, end of year $ 3,294 $ 7,646 $ 195 $ 11,135 
A reconciliation of the beginning and ending balances for medical claims payable, by segment, for the year ended December 31,
2019 is as follows:
Commercial
& Specialty
BusinessGovernment
Business Total
Gross medical claims payable, beginning of year $ 2,586 $ 4,680 $ 7,266 
Ceded medical claims payable, beginning of year (10) (24) (34)
Net medical claims payable, beginning of year 2,576 4,656 7,232 
Net incurred medical claims:
Current year 25,942 52,753 78,695 
Prior years redundancies (190) (310) (500)
Total net incurred medical claims 25,752 52,443 78,195 
Net payments attributable to:
Current year medical claims 23,026 47,268 70,294 
Prior years medical claims 2,277 4,242 6,519 
Total net payments 25,303 51,510 76,813 
Net medical claims payable, end of year 3,025 5,589 8,614 
Ceded medical claims payable, end of year 14 19 33 
Gross medical claims payable, end of year $ 3,039 $ 5,608 $ 8,647 
Amounts incurred related to prior years vary from previously estimated liabilities as the claims are ultimately settled. Liabilities at
any period-end are continually reviewed and re-estimated as information regarding actual claims payments, or runout, becomes
known. This information is compared to the originally established year end liability. Negative amounts reported for incurred medical
claims related to prior years result from claims being settled for amounts less than originally estimated. The prior year redundancy of
$1,703 shown above for the year ended December 31, 2021 represents an estimate
-114-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
based on paid claim activity from January 1, 2021 to December 31, 2021. Medical claim liabilities are usually described as having a
“short tail,” which means that they are generally paid within twelve months of the member receiving service from the provider.
Accordingly, the majority of the $1,703 redundancy relates to claims incurred in calendar year 2020.
The following table provides a summary of the two key assumptions having the most significant impact on our incurred but not
paid liability estimates for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, which are the completion and trend factors. These two
key assumptions can be influenced by utilization levels, unit costs, mix of business, benefit plan designs, provider reimbursement
levels, processing system conversions and changes, claim inventory levels, claim processing patterns, claim submission patterns and
operational changes resulting from business combinations. The impact from COVID-19 on healthcare utilization and medical claims
submission patterns has increased estimation uncertainty on our incurred but not reported liability at December 31, 2021. Slowdowns
in claims submission patterns and increases in utilization levels for COVID-19 testing and treatment during the fourth quarter of 2021
are the primary factors that lead to the increased estimation uncertainty.
 Favorable Developments
by Changes in Key Assumptions
 2021 2020 2019
Assumed trend factors $ (1,429)$ (599)$ (325)
Assumed completion factors (274) (38) (175)
Total $ (1,703)$ (637)$ (500)
The favorable development recognized in 2021 resulted primarily from trend factors in late 2020 developing more favorably than
originally expected as well as a smaller but significant contribution from completion factor development.
The favorable development recognized in 2020 resulted primarily from trend factors in late 2019 developing more favorably than
originally expected as well as a smaller contribution from completion factor development.
The favorable development recognized in 2019 resulted from trend and completion factors developing more favorably than
originally expected as well as a smaller but significant contribution from completion factor development.
The reconciliation of net incurred medical claims to benefit expense included in the consolidated statements of income is as
follows:
Years Ended December 31
2021 2020 2019
Net incurred medical claims:
Commercial & Specialty Business $ 27,667 $ 24,519 $ 25,752 
Government Business 69,448 58,650 52,443 
Other 1,622 1,288 — 
Total net incurred medical claims 98,737 84,457 78,195 
Quality improvement and other claims expense 3,908 3,588 3,591 
Benefit expense $ 102,645 $ 88,045 $ 81,786 
-115-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Incurred claims development, net of reinsurance, for the Commercial & Specialty Business for the years ended December 31,
2021, 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
Commercial & Specialty BusinessCumulative Incurred Claims and Allocated Claim
Adjustment Expenses, Net of Reinsurance
2019 2020
Claim Years (Unaudited) (Unaudited) 2021
2019 & Prior $ 28,328 $ 27,953 $ 28,249 
2020 24,894 24,133 
2021 28,132 
Total $ 80,514 
Paid claims development, net of reinsurance, for the Commercial & Specialty Business for the years ended December 31, 2021,
2020 and 2019 is as follows:
Commercial & Specialty BusinessCumulative Paid Claims and Allocated Claim
Adjustment Expenses, Net of Reinsurance
2019 2020
Claim Years (Unaudited) (Unaudited) 2021
2019 & Prior $ 25,303 $ 27,830 $ 28,216 
2020 21,736 23,962 
2021 24,502 
Total $ 76,680 
At December 31, 2021, the total of incurred but not reported liabilities plus expected development on reported claims for the
Commercial & Specialty Business was $33, $171 and $3,630 for the claim years 2019 and prior, 2020 and 2021, respectively.
At December 31, 2021, the cumulative number of reported claims for the Commercial & Specialty Business was 91, 80 and 80 for
the claim years 2019 and prior, 2020 and 2021, respectively.
Incurred claims development, net of reinsurance, for the Government Business as of and for the years ended December 31, 2021,
2020 and 2019 is as follows:
Government BusinessCumulative Incurred Claims and Allocated Claim
Adjustment Expenses, Net of Reinsurance
2019 2020
Claim Years (Unaudited) (Unaudited) 2021
2019 & Prior $ 57,099 $ 56,837 $ 56,537 
2020 59,053 58,131 
2021 71,045 
Total $ 185,713 
-116-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Paid claims development, net of reinsurance, for the Government Business as of and for the years ended December 31, 2021,
2020 and 2019 is as follows:
Government BusinessCumulative Paid Claims and Allocated Claim
Adjustment Expenses, Net of Reinsurance
2019 2020
Claim Years (Unaudited) (Unaudited) 2021
2019 & Prior $ 51,510 $ 56,675 $ 56,447 
2020 51,602 57,884 
2021 62,233 
Total $ 176,564 
At December 31, 2021, the total of incurred but not reported liabilities plus expected development on reported claims for the
Government Business was $90, $247 and $8,812 for the claim years 2019 and prior, 2020 and 2021, respectively.
At December 31, 2021, the cumulative number of reported claims for the Government Business was 253, 263 and 300 for the
claim years 2019 and prior, 2020 and 2021, respectively.
Incurred claims development, net of reinsurance, for Other as of and for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 is as
follows:
OtherCumulative Incurred Claims and Allocated Claim
Adjustment Expenses, Net of Reinsurance
2019 2020
Claim Years (Unaudited) (Unaudited) 2021
2019 & Prior $ — $ — $ — 
2020 1,486 1,470 
2021 1,683 
Total $ 3,153 
Paid claims development, net of reinsurance, for Other as of and for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 is as
follows:
OtherCumulative Paid Claims and Allocated Claim
Adjustment Expenses, Net of Reinsurance
2019 2020
Claim Years (Unaudited) (Unaudited) 2021
2019 & Prior $ — $ — $ — 
2020 1,291 1,454 
2021 1,421 
Total $ 2,875 
At December 31, 2021, the total of incurred but not reported liabilities plus expected development on reported claims for Other
was $0, $16 and $262 for the claim years 2019 and prior, 2020 and 2021, respectively.
At December 31, 2021, the cumulative number of reported claims for Other was 0, 28, and 25 for the claim years 2019 and prior,
2020 and 2021, respectively.
The information about incurred claims development, paid claims development and cumulative number of reported claims for the
years ended December 31, 2019 and 2020 for our Commercial & Specialty Business, Government Business and Other, is unaudited
and presented as supplementary information.
The cumulative number of reported claims for each claim year for our Commercial & Specialty Business, Government Business
and Other have been developed using historical data captured by our claim payment systems. The provided claim
-117-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
amounts are not a precise tool for understanding utilization of medical services. They could be impacted by a variety of factors,
including changes in provider billing practices, provider reimbursement arrangements, mix of services, benefit design or processing
systems. The cumulative number of reported claims has been provided to comply with FASB accounting standards and is not used by
management in its claims analysis. Our cumulative number of reported claims may not be comparable to similar measures reported by
other health benefits companies.
The reconciliation of the Commercial & Specialty Business, Government Business and Other incurred and paid claims
development information for the three years ended December 31, 2021, reflected in the tables above, to the consolidated ending
balance for medical claims payable included in the consolidated balance sheet, as of December 31, 2021, is as follows:
Commercial
& Specialty
BusinessGovernment
Business Other Total
Cumulative incurred claims and allocated claim adjustment expenses,
net of reinsurance $ 80,514 $ 185,713 $ 3,153 $ 269,380 
Less: Cumulative paid claims and allocated claim adjustment
expenses, net of reinsurance 76,680 176,564 2,875 256,119 
Net medical claims payable, end of year 3,834 9,149 278 13,261 
Ceded medical claims payable, end of year 13 8 — 21 
Insurance lines other than short duration — 236 — 236 
Gross medical claims payable, end of year $ 3,847 $ 9,393 $ 278 $ 13,518 
13. Debt
Short-term Borrowings
We are a member, through certain subsidiaries, of the Federal Home Loan Bank of Indianapolis, the Federal Home Loan Bank of
Cincinnati, the Federal Home Loan Bank of Atlanta and the Federal Home Loan Bank of New York, (collectively, the “FHLBs”). As a
member we have the ability to obtain short-term cash advances, subject to certain minimum collateral requirements. At December 31,
2021 and 2020, $275 and $0, respectively, were outstanding under our short-term FHLB borrowings. Outstanding short-term FHLB
borrowings at December 31, 2021 had fixed interest rates of 0.180%.
Through certain subsidiaries, we have entered into multiple 364-day lines of credit (the “Subsidiary Credit Facilities”) with
separate lenders for general corporate purposes. The Subsidiary Credit Facilities provide combined credit of up to $200. The interest
rate on each line of credit is based on the LIBOR rate plus a predetermined rate. Our ability to borrow under the lines of credit is
subject to compliance with certain covenants. At each of December 31, 2021 and 2020, $0 was outstanding under our Subsidiary
Credit Facilities.
-118-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Long-term Debt
The carrying value of long-term debt at December 31, 2021 and 2020 consists of the following:
2021 2020
Senior unsecured notes:
3.700%, due 2021 $ — $ 700 
2.950%, due 2022 749 749 
3.125%, due 2022 850 848 
3.300%, due 2023 1,014 1,027 
0.450%, due 2023 499 — 
3.350%, due 2024 848 847 
3.500%, due 2024 797 796 
2.375%, due 2025 1,253 1,253 
1.500%, due 2026 745 — 
3.650%, due 2027 1,592 1,591 
4.101%, due 2028 1,251 1,257 
2.875%, due 2029 820 819 
2.250%, due 2030 1,089 1,089 
2.550%, due 2031 992 — 
5.950%, due 2034 334 334 
5.850%, due 2036 396 396 
6.375%, due 2037 364 366 
5.800%, due 2040 114 114 
4.625%, due 2042 859 873 
4.650%, due 2043 974 978 
4.650%, due 2044 767 779 
5.100%, due 2044 548 565 
4.375%, due 2047 1,387 1,387 
4.550%, due 2048 839 839 
3.700%, due 2049 812 811 
3.125%, due 2050 987 987 
3.600%, due 2051 1,232 — 
4.850%, due 2054 247 247 
Surplus note:
9.000%, due 2027 25 25 
Senior convertible debentures:
2.750%, due 2042 72 108 
Variable rate debt:
Commercial paper program 300 250 
Total long-term debt 22,756 20,035 
Current portion of long-term debt (1,599) (700)
Long-term debt, less current portion $ 21,157 $ 19,335 
-119-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
All debt is a direct obligation of Anthem, Inc., except for the surplus note, the FHLB borrowings and the Subsidiary Credit
Facilities.
We generally issue senior unsecured notes (“Notes”) for long-term borrowing purposes. Certain of these Notes may have a call
feature that allows us to redeem the Notes at any time at our option and/or a put feature that allows a Note holder to redeem the Notes
upon the occurrence of both a change in control event and a downgrade of the Notes below an investment grade rating.
On May 15, 2021, we redeemed the $700 outstanding principal balance of our 3.700% Notes due August 15, 2021 at a redemption
price equal to 100% of the aggregate principal amount of the notes being redeemed, plus accrued and unpaid interest.
On March 17, 2021, we issued $500 aggregate principal amount of 0.450% Notes due 2023 (the “2023 Notes”), $750 aggregate
principal amount of 1.500% Notes due 2026 (the “2026 Notes”), $1,000 aggregate principal amount of 2.550% Notes due 2031 (the
“2031 Notes”) and $1,250 aggregate principal amount of 3.600% Notes due 2051 (the “2051 Notes”) under our shelf registration
statement. Interest on the 2023 Notes, 2026 Notes, 2031 Notes and 2051 Notes is payable semiannually in arrears on March 15 and
September 15 of each year, commencing September 15, 2021. We used the net proceeds for working capital and general corporate
purposes, including, but not limited to, the funding of acquisitions, repayment of short-term and long-term debt and the repurchase of
our common stock pursuant to our share repurchase program.
Additionally, during the year ended December 31, 2021, we repurchased $52 of outstanding principal amount of certain other
senior unsecured notes, plus applicable premium for early redemption plus accrued and unpaid interest, for cash totaling $67. We
recognized a loss on extinguishment of debt of $15 for the repurchase of these notes.
On November 23, 2020, we repaid, at maturity, the $900 outstanding balance of our 2.500% senior unsecured notes. On August
17, 2020, we repaid, at maturity, the $700 outstanding balance of our 4.350% senior unsecured notes.
Additionally, during the year ended December 31, 2020, we repurchased $79 of outstanding principal amount of certain other
senior unsecured notes, plus applicable premium for early redemption plus accrued and unpaid interest, for cash totaling $109. We
recognized a loss on extinguishment of debt of $30 for the repurchase of these notes.
On May 5, 2020, we issued $400 aggregate principal amount of additional senior notes pursuant to a reopening of our existing
2.375% Notes due 2025 (the “2025 Notes”), $1,100 aggregate principal amount of 2.250% Notes due 2030 (the “2030 Notes”), and
$1,000 aggregate principal amount of 3.125% Notes due 2050 (the “2050 Notes”) under our shelf registration statement. The 2025
Notes constitute an additional issuance of our 2.375% notes due 2025, of which $850 aggregate principal amount was issued on
September 9, 2019. Interest on the 2025 Notes is deemed to have accrued from January 15, 2020 and is payable semi-annually in
arrears on January 15 and July 15 of each year, commencing July 15, 2020. Interest on the 2030 Notes and 2050 Notes is payable
semi-annually in arrears on May 15 and November 15 of each year, commencing November 15, 2020. The proceeds were used for
working capital and general corporate purposes, including, but not limited to, repayment of short-term and long-term debt, repurchase
of our common stock pursuant to our share repurchase program and to fund acquisitions.
On September 9, 2019, we issued $850 aggregate principal amount of the 2025 Notes, $825 aggregate principal amount of
2.875% Notes due 2029 (the “2029 Notes”), and $825 aggregate principal amount of 3.700% Notes due 2049 (the “2049 Notes”)
under our shelf registration statement. Interest on the 2025 Notes is payable semi-annually in arrears on January 15 and July 15 of
each year, commencing January 15, 2020. Interest on the 2029 Notes and the 2049 Notes is payable semi-annually in arrears on March
15 and September 15 each year, commencing March 15, 2020. The proceeds were used for working capital and general corporate
purposes, including, but not limited to, the repurchase of our common stock pursuant to our share repurchase program, repayment of
short-term and long-term debt and to fund acquisitions.
On August 15, 2019, we repaid, at maturity, the $850 outstanding balance of our 2.250% senior unsecured notes.
-120-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
The surplus note is an unsecured obligation of Anthem Insurance Companies, Inc. (“Anthem Insurance”), a wholly owned
subsidiary, and is subordinate in right of payment to all of Anthem Insurance’s existing and future indebtedness. Any payment of
interest or principal on the surplus note may be made only with the prior approval of the Indiana Department of Insurance (“IDOI”)
and only out of capital and surplus funds of Anthem Insurance that the IDOI determines to be available for the payment under Indiana
insurance laws.
We have a senior revolving credit facility (the “5-Year Facility”) with a group of lenders for general corporate purposes. The 5-
Year Facility provides credit up to $2,500 and matures in June 2024. On June 3, 2021, we terminated our 364-day senior revolving
credit facility, which was scheduled to mature in June 2021 (the “prior 364-Day Facility”), and entered into a new 364-day senior
revolving credit facility (the “new 364-Day Facility,” and together with the 5-Year Facility, the “Credit Facilities”) with a group of
lenders for general corporate purposes. The new 364-Day Facility provides for credit in the amount of $1,000 and matures in June
2022. Our ability to borrow under these credit facilities is subject to compliance with certain covenants, including covenants requiring
us to maintain a defined debt-to-capital ratio of not more than 60%, subject to increase in certain circumstances set forth in the
applicable credit agreement. As of December 31, 2021, our debt-to-capital ratio, as defined and calculated under the credit facilities,
was 38.9%. We do not believe the restrictions contained in any of our credit facility covenants materially affect our financial or
operating flexibility. As of December 31, 2021, we were in compliance with all of the debt covenants under these credit facilities.
There were no amounts outstanding under the prior 364-Day Facility or the new 364-day Facility at any time during the years ended
December 31, 2021 or the year ended December 31, 2020. At December 31, 2021 and December 31, 2020, there were no amounts
outstanding under our 5-Year Facility.
We have an authorized commercial paper program of up to $3,500, the proceeds of which may be used for general corporate
purposes. At December 31, 2021, we had $300 outstanding under our commercial paper program with a weighted-average interest rate
of 0.150%. At December 31, 2020, we had $250 outstanding under our commercial paper program with a weighted-average interest
rate of 0.160%. Commercial paper borrowings have been classified as long-term debt at December 31, 2021 and 2020, as our general
practice and intent is to replace short-term commercial paper outstanding at expiration with additional short-term commercial paper
for an uninterrupted period extending for more than one year, and we have the ability to redeem our commercial paper with
borrowings under the senior revolving credit facilities described above.
Convertible Debentures
On October 9, 2012, we issued $1,500 of senior convertible debentures (the “Debentures”) in a private offering to qualified
institutional buyers pursuant to Rule 144A under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the “Securities Act”). The Debentures are
governed by an indenture dated as of October 9, 2012 between us and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A., as trustee
(the “Indenture”). The Debentures bear interest at a rate of 2.750% per year, payable semi-annually in arrears in cash on April 15 and
October 15 of each year, and mature on October 15, 2042, unless earlier redeemed, repurchased or converted into shares of common
stock at the applicable conversion rate. The Debentures also have a contingent interest feature that will require us to pay additional
interest based on certain thresholds and for certain events, as defined in the Indenture, beginning on October 15, 2022.
Holders may convert their Debentures at their option prior to the close of business on the business day immediately preceding
April 15, 2042, only under the following circumstances: (1) during any fiscal quarter if the last reported sale price of our common
stock for at least 20 trading days during a period of 30 consecutive trading days ending on the last trading day of the preceding fiscal
quarter is greater than or equal to 130% of the applicable conversion price on each applicable trading day; (2) during the five business
day period after any 10 consecutive trading day period (the “measurement period”) in which the trading price per $1,000 (whole
dollars) principal amount of Debentures for each trading day of that measurement period was less than 98% of the product of the last
reported sale price of our common stock and the applicable conversion rate on each such day; (3) if we call any or all of the
Debentures for redemption, at any time prior to the close of business on the third scheduled trading day prior to the redemption date;
or (4) upon the occurrence of specified corporate events, as defined in the Indenture. On and after April 15, 2042 and until the close of
business on the third scheduled trading day immediately preceding the Debentures’ maturity date of October 15, 2042, holders may
convert their Debentures into common stock at any time irrespective of the preceding circumstances. The Debentures are redeemable
at our option at any time on or after October 20, 2022, upon the occurrence of certain events, as defined in the Indenture.
-121-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Upon conversion of the Debentures, we will deliver cash up to the aggregate principal amount of the Debentures converted. With
respect to any conversion obligation in excess of the aggregate principal amount of the Debentures converted, we have the option to
settle the excess with cash, shares of our common stock or a combination thereof based on a daily conversion value, determined in
accordance with the Indenture. The initial conversion rate for the Debentures was 13.2319 shares of our common stock per Debenture,
which represented a 25% conversion premium based on the closing price of $60.46 per share of our common stock on October 2, 2012
(the date the Debentures’ terms were finalized) and is equivalent to an initial conversion price of $75.575 per share of our common
stock.
During the year ended December 31, 2021, $54 aggregate principal amount of the Debentures was surrendered for conversion by
certain holders in accordance with the terms and provisions of the Indenture. We elected to settle the excess of the principal amount of
the conversions with cash for total payments of $302. We recognized a loss on the extinguishment of debt related to the Debentures of
$6, based on the fair values of the debt on the conversion settlement dates. During the year ended December 31, 2020, $56 aggregate
principal amount of the Debentures was surrendered for conversion by certain holders in accordance with the terms and provisions of
the Indenture. We elected to settle the excess of the principal amount of the conversions with cash for total payments of $222. We
recognized a loss on the extinguishment of debt related to the Debentures of $6, based on the fair values of the debt on the conversion
settlement dates. During the year ended December 31, 2019, we repurchased $15 of the aggregate principal balance of the Debentures.
In addition, $57 aggregate principal amount of the Debentures was surrendered for conversion by certain holders in accordance with
the terms and provisions of the Indenture. We elected to settle the excess of the principal amount of the repurchases and conversions
with cash for total payments of $273. We recognized a loss on the extinguishment of debt related to the Debentures of $2. 
As of December 31, 2021, our common stock was last traded at a price of $463.54 per share. If the remaining Debentures had
been converted or matured at December 31, 2021, we would have been obligated to pay the principal of the Debentures plus an
amount in cash or shares equal to $584. The Debentures and underlying shares of our common stock have not been and will not be
registered under the Securities Act, or any state securities laws, and may not be offered or sold in the United States absent registration
or an applicable exemption from registration requirements.
We have accounted for the Debentures in accordance with the cash conversion guidance in FASB guidance for debt with
conversion and other options. As a result, the value of the embedded conversion option, net of deferred taxes and equity issuance
costs, has been bifurcated from its debt host and recorded as a component of additional paid-in capital in our consolidated balance
sheets.
The following table summarizes, at December 31, 2021, the related balances, conversion rate and conversion price of the
Debentures:
Outstanding principal amount $ 105 
Unamortized debt discount $ 32 
Net debt carrying amount $ 72 
Equity component carrying amount $ 38 
Conversion rate (shares of common stock per $1,000 of principal amount) 14.2080 
Effective conversion price (per $1,000 of principal amount) $ 70.3829 
The remaining amortization period of the unamortized debt discount as of December 31, 2021 is approximately 21 years. The
unamortized discount will be amortized into interest expense using the effective interest method based on an effective interest rate of
5.130%, which represents the market interest rate for a comparable debt instrument that does not have a conversion feature. During the
years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, we recognized $4, $6 and $9, respectively, of interest expense related to the
Debentures, of which $3, $5 and $7, respectively, represented interest expense recognized at the stated interest rate of 2.750% and $1,
$1 and $2, respectively, represented interest expense resulting from amortization of the debt discount.
Interest paid on our total outstanding debt during 2021, 2020 and 2019 was $822, $794, and $755, respectively. 
We were in compliance with all applicable covenants under all of our outstanding debt agreements at December 31, 2021 and
2020.
-122-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Future maturities of all long-term debt outstanding at December 31, 2021 are as follows: 2022, $1,899; 2023, $1,513; 2024,
$1,645; 2025, $1,253; 2026, $745 and thereafter, $15,701.
14. Commitments and Contingencies
Litigation and Regulatory Proceedings
In the ordinary course of business, we are defendants in, or parties to, a number of pending or threatened legal actions or
proceedings. To the extent a plaintiff or plaintiffs in the following cases have specified in their complaint or in other court filings the
amount of damages being sought, we have noted those alleged damages in the descriptions below. With respect to the cases described
below, we contest liability and/or the amount of damages in each matter and believe we have meritorious defenses.
Where available information indicates that it is probable that a loss has been incurred as of the date of the consolidated financial
statements and we can reasonably estimate the amount of that loss, we accrue the estimated loss by a charge to income. In many
proceedings, however, it is difficult to determine whether any loss is probable or reasonably possible. In addition, even where loss is
possible or an exposure to loss exists in excess of the liability already accrued with respect to a previously identified loss contingency,
it is not always possible to reasonably estimate the amount of the possible loss or range of loss.
With respect to many of the proceedings to which we are a party, we cannot provide an estimate of the possible losses, or the
range of possible losses in excess of the amount, if any, accrued, for various reasons, including but not limited to some or all of the
following: (i) there are novel or unsettled legal issues presented, (ii) the proceedings are in early stages, (iii) there is uncertainty as
to the likelihood of a class being certified or decertified or the ultimate size and scope of the class, (iv) there is uncertainty as to the
outcome of pending appeals or motions, (v) there are significant factual issues to be resolved, and/or (vi) in many cases, the
plaintiffs have not specified damages in their complaint or in court filings. For those legal proceedings where a loss is probable, or
reasonably possible, and for which it is possible to reasonably estimate the amount of the possible loss or range of losses, we
currently believe that the range of possible losses, in excess of established reserves is, in the aggregate, from $0 to approximately
$250 at December 31, 2021. This estimated aggregate range of reasonably possible losses is based upon currently available
information taking into account our best estimate of such losses for which such an estimate can be made.
Blue Cross Blue Shield Antitrust Litigation
We are a defendant in multiple lawsuits that were initially filed in 2012 against the BCBSA and Blue Cross and/or Blue Shield
licensees (the “Blue plans”) across the country. Cases filed in twenty-eight states were consolidated into a single, multi-district
proceeding captioned In re Blue Cross Blue Shield Antitrust Litigation that is pending in the United States District Court for the
Northern District of Alabama (the “Court”). Generally, the suits allege that the BCBSA and the Blue plans have conspired to
horizontally allocate geographic markets through license agreements, best efforts rules that limit the percentage of non-Blue revenue
of each plan, restrictions on acquisitions, rules governing the BlueCardand National Accounts programs and other arrangements in
violation of the Sherman Antitrust Act (“Sherman Act”) and related state laws. The cases were brought by two putative nationwide
classes of plaintiffs, health plan subscribers and providers.
In April 2018, the Court issued an order on the parties’ cross motions for partial summary judgment, determining that the
defendants’ aggregation of geographic market allocations and output restrictions are to be analyzed under a per se standard of review,
and the BlueCardprogram and other alleged Section 1 Sherman Act violations are to be analyzed under the rule of reason standard of
review. The Court also found that there remain genuine issues of material fact as to whether the defendants operate as a single entity
with regard to the enforcement of the Blue Cross Blue Shield trademarks. In April 2019, the plaintiffs filed motions for class
certification, which defendants opposed.
The BCBSA and Blue plans have approved a settlement agreement and release (the “Subscriber Settlement Agreement”) with the
subscriber plaintiffs. If approved by the Court, the Subscriber Settlement Agreement will require the defendants to make a monetary
settlement payment, our portion of which is estimated to be $594, and will contain certain terms imposing non-monetary obligations
including (i) eliminating the “national best efforts” rule in the BCBSA license agreements (which rule limits the percentage of non-
Blue revenue permitted for each Blue plan) and (ii) allowing for some large national employers with self-funded benefit plans to
request a bid for insurance coverage from a second Blue plan in addition to the® 
® 
-123-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
local Blue plan. As of December 31, 2021, the liability balance accrued for our estimated payment obligation was $507, net of
payments made.
In November 2020, the Court issued an order preliminarily approving the Subscriber Settlement Agreement, following which
members of the subscriber class were provided notice of the Subscriber Settlement Agreement and an opportunity to opt out of the
class. All terms of the Subscriber Settlement Agreement are subject to final approval by the Court. The deadline for objections to the
settlement as well as the deadline for those who wish to opt-out from the settlement was in July 2021 and a small number of
subscribers submitted valid opt outs by the deadline. The claims deadline was in November 2021 and in excess of eight thousand
claims were submitted. A final approval hearing was held in October 2021. The Court took the request for approval under advisement
and requested supplemental briefing that has been submitted. If the Court grants approval of the Subscriber Settlement Agreement, and
after all appellate rights have expired or have been exhausted in a manner that affirms the Court’s final order and judgment, the
defendants’ payment and non-monetary obligations under the Subscriber Settlement Agreement will become effective.
In October 2020, after the Court lifted the stay as to the provider litigation, provider plaintiffs filed a renewed motion for class
certification, which defendants opposed. In March 2021, the Court issued an order terminating the pending motion for class
certification until the Court determines the standard of review applicable to providers’ claims. In May 2021, the defendants and
provider plaintiffs filed renewed standard of review motions, which are now fully briefed. In June 2021, the parties filed summary
judgment motions not critically dependent on class certification, which are now fully briefed and no decision has been rendered. We
intend to continue to vigorously defend the provider suit, which we believe is without merit; however, its ultimate outcome cannot be
presently determined.
Blue Cross of California Taxation Litigation
In July 2013, our California affiliate Blue Cross of California (doing business as Anthem Blue Cross) (“BCC”) was named as a
defendant in a California taxpayer action filed in Los Angeles County Superior Court (the “Superior Court”) captioned Michael D.
Myers v. State Board of Equalization, et al. This action was brought under a California statute that permits an individual taxpayer to
sue a governmental agency when the taxpayer believes the agency has failed to enforce governing law. Plaintiff contends that BCC, a
licensed Health Care Service Plan, is an “insurer” for purposes of taxation despite acknowledging it is not an “insurer” under
regulatory law. At the time, under California law, “insurers” were required to pay a gross premiums tax (“GPT”) calculated as 2.35%
on gross premiums. As a licensed Health Care Service Plan, BCC has paid the California Corporate Franchise Tax (“CFT”), the tax
paid by California businesses generally. Plaintiff contends that BCC must pay the GPT rather than the CFT, and seeks a writ of
mandate directing the taxing agencies to collect the GPT and an order requiring BCC to pay GPT back taxes, interest, and penalties
for the eight-year period prior to the filing of the complaint.
Because the GPT is constitutionally imposed in lieu of certain other taxes, BCC has filed protective tax refund claims with the
City of Los Angeles, the California Department of Health Care Services and the Franchise Tax Board to protect its rights to recover
certain taxes previously paid should BCC eventually be determined to be subject to the GPT for the tax periods at issue in the
litigation.
In March 2018, the Superior Court denied BCC's motion for judgment on the pleadings and similar motions brought by other
entities. BCC filed a motion for summary judgment with the Superior Court, which was heard in October 2020. In December 2020, the
Superior Court granted BCC’s motion for summary judgment, dismissing the plaintiff's lawsuit. In November 2021, the plaintiff
appealed the order granting our motion for summary judgment. Our responding brief is due in February 2022. We estimate that the
appeal will be heard some time in 2022. We intend to vigorously defend the appeal of this lawsuit.
Express Scripts, Inc. Pharmacy Benefit Management Litigation
In March 2016, we filed a lawsuit against Express Scripts, Inc. (“Express Scripts”), our vendor at the time for PBM services,
captioned Anthem, Inc. v. Express Scripts, Inc., in the U.S. District Court for the Southern District of New York. The lawsuit seeks to
recover over $14,800 in damages for pharmacy pricing that is higher than competitive benchmark pricing under the agreement
between the parties (the “ESI PBM Agreement”), over $158 in damages related to operational breaches, as well as various declarations
under the ESI PBM Agreement, including that Express Scripts: (i) breached its obligation to negotiate in good faith and to agree in
writing to new pricing terms; (ii) was required to provide competitive
-124-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
benchmark pricing to us through the term of the ESI PBM Agreement; (iii) has breached the ESI PBM Agreement; and (iv) is required
under the ESI PBM Agreement to provide post-termination services, at competitive benchmark pricing, for one year following any
termination.
Express Scripts has disputed our contractual claims and is seeking declaratory judgments: (i) regarding the timing of the periodic
pricing review under the ESI PBM Agreement, and (ii) that it has no obligation to ensure that we receive any specific level of pricing,
that we have no contractual right to any change in pricing under the ESI PBM Agreement and that its sole obligation is to negotiate
proposed pricing terms in good faith. In the alternative, Express Scripts claims that we have been unjustly enriched by its payment of
$4,675 at the time we entered into the ESI PBM Agreement. In March 2017, the court granted our motion to dismiss Express Scripts’
counterclaims for (i) breach of the implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing, and (ii) unjust enrichment with prejudice. The only
remaining claims are for breach of contract and declaratory relief. In August 2021, Express Scripts filed a motion for summary
judgment, which we opposed. Express Scripts’ motion for summary judgment is now fully briefed and no decision has been rendered.
We intend to vigorously pursue our claims and defend against any counterclaims, which we believe are without merit; however, the
ultimate outcome cannot be presently determined.
In re Express Scripts/Anthem ERISA Litigation
We are a defendant in a class action lawsuit that was initially filed in June 2016 against Anthem, Inc. and Express Scripts, which
has been consolidated into a single multi-district lawsuit captioned In Re Express Scripts/Anthem ERISA Litigation, in the U.S. District
Court for the Southern District of New York. The consolidated complaint was filed by plaintiffs against Express Scripts and us on
behalf of all persons who are participants in or beneficiaries of any ERISA or non-ERISA healthcare plan from December 1, 2009 to
December 31, 2019 in which we provided prescription drug benefits through the ESI PBM Agreement and paid a percentage based co-
insurance payment in the course of using that prescription drug benefit. The plaintiffs allege that we breached our duties, either under
ERISA or with respect to the implied covenant of good faith and fair dealing implied in the health plans, (i) by failing to adequately
monitor Express Scripts’ pricing under the ESI PBM Agreement, (ii) by placing our own pecuniary interest above the best interests of
our insureds by allegedly agreeing to higher pricing in the ESI PBM Agreement in exchange for the purchase price for our NextRx
PBM business, and (iii) with respect to the non-ERISA members, by negotiating and entering into the ESI PBM Agreement that was
allegedly detrimental to the interests of such non-ERISA members. Plaintiffs seek to hold us and Express Scripts jointly and severally
liable and to recover all losses suffered by the proposed class, equitable relief, disgorgement of alleged ill-gotten gains, injunctive
relief, attorney’s fees and costs and interest.
In April 2017, we filed a motion to dismiss the claims brought against us, and it was granted, without prejudice, in January 2018.
Plaintiffs pursued an appeal with the United States Court of Appeals for the Second Circuit (the “Second Circuit”). In December 2020,
the Second Circuit affirmed the trial court’s order dismissing the ERISA complaint. Plaintiffs filed a Petition for Rehearing and
Rehearing En Banc, which was denied. Plaintiffs filed a writ of certiorari with the United States Supreme Court, which we opposed. In
December 2021, the United States Supreme Court requested that the Solicitor General submit a brief “expressing the views of the
United States” as to whether the Court should grant plaintiffs’ writ. We intend to vigorously defend this suit, which we believe is
without merit; however, its ultimate outcome cannot be presently determined.
Medicare Risk Adjustment Litigation
In March 2020, the U.S. Department of Justice (“DOJ”) filed a civil lawsuit against Anthem, Inc. in the U.S. District Court for the
Southern District of New York in a case captioned United States v. Anthem, Inc. The DOJ’s suit alleges, among other things, that we
falsely certified the accuracy of the diagnosis data we submitted to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (“CMS”) for risk-
adjustment purposes under Medicare Part C and knowingly failed to delete inaccurate diagnosis codes. The DOJ further alleges that,
as a result of these purported acts, we caused CMS to calculate the risk-adjustment payments based on inaccurate diagnosis
information, which enabled us to obtain unspecified amounts of payments in Medicare funds in violation of the False Claims Act. The
DOJ filed an amended complaint in July 2020, alleging the same causes of action but revising some of its allegations. In September
2020, we filed a motion to transfer the lawsuit to the Southern District of Ohio, a motion to dismiss part of the lawsuit, and a motion to
strike certain allegations in the amended complaint. The motions are fully briefed and no decision has been rendered. We intend to
continue to vigorously defend this suit, which we believe is without merit; however, the ultimate outcome cannot be presently
determined.
-125-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Investigations of CareMore and HealthSun
With the assistance of outside counsel, we are conducting investigations of risk-adjustment practices involving data submitted to
CMS (unrelated to our retrospective chart review program) at CareMore Health Plans, Inc. (“CareMore”), one of our California
subsidiaries, and HealthSun Health Plans, Inc. (“HealthSun”), one of our Florida subsidiaries. Our CareMore investigation has resulted
in the termination of CareMore’s relationship with one contracted provider in California. Our HealthSun investigation has focused on
risk adjustment practices initiated prior to our acquisition of HealthSun in December 2017 that continued after the acquisition. We
have voluntarily self-disclosed the existence of both of our investigations to CMS and the Criminal and Civil Divisions of the DOJ.
We are cooperating with the ongoing investigations of the Criminal and Civil Divisions of the DOJ related to these risk adjustment
practices, and have entered into a tolling agreement with the Civil Division of the DOJ related to its investigation. We are analyzing
the scope of potential data corrections to be submitted to CMS and have begun to submit data corrections to CMS. We have also
asserted indemnity claims for escrowed funds under the HealthSun purchase agreement for, among other things, breach of healthcare
and financial representation provisions, based on the conduct discovered during our investigation. In the fourth quarter of 2021, we
resolved matters with both groups of sellers related to our indemnity claims for escrowed funds under the HealthSun purchase
agreement based on conduct discovered during our investigation.
Other Contingencies
From time to time, we and certain of our subsidiaries are parties to various legal proceedings, many of which involve claims for
coverage encountered in the ordinary course of business. We, like Health Maintenance Organizations (“HMOs”) and health insurers
generally, exclude certain healthcare and other services from coverage under our HMO, Preferred Provider Organizations and other
plans. We are, in the ordinary course of business, subject to the claims of our enrollees arising out of decisions to restrict or deny
reimbursement for uncovered services. The loss of even one such claim, if it results in a significant punitive damage award, could have
a material adverse effect on us. In addition, the risk of potential liability under punitive damage theories may increase significantly the
difficulty of obtaining reasonable reimbursement of coverage claims.
In addition to the lawsuits described above, we are also involved in other pending and threatened litigation of the character
incidental to our business, and are from time to time involved as a party in various governmental investigations, audits, reviews and
administrative proceedings. These investigations, audits, reviews and administrative proceedings include routine and special inquiries
by state insurance departments, state attorneys general, the U.S. Attorney General and subcommittees of the U.S. Congress. Such
investigations, audits, reviews and administrative proceedings could result in the imposition of civil or criminal fines, penalties, other
sanctions and additional rules, regulations or other restrictions on our business operations. Any liability that may result from any one
of these actions, or in the aggregate, could have a material adverse effect on our consolidated financial position or results of
operations.
Contractual Obligations and Commitments
In March 2020, we entered into an agreement with a vendor for information technology infrastructure and related management
and support services through June 2025. The new agreement supersedes certain prior agreements for such services and includes
provisions for additional services not provided under those agreements. Our remaining commitment under this agreement at
December 31, 2021 is approximately $1,051. We will have the ability to terminate the agreement upon the occurrence of certain
events, subject to early termination fees.
In the second quarter of 2019, we began using our pharmacy benefits manager IngenioRx to market and offer PBM services to our
affiliated health plan customers, as well as to external customers outside of the health plans we own. The comprehensive prescription
benefits management services portfolio includes, but is not limited to, formulary management, pharmacy networks, prescription drug
database, member services and mail order capabilities. IngenioRx delegates certain PBM administrative functions, such as claims
processing and prescription fulfillment, to CaremarkPCS Health, L.L.C., which is a subsidiary of CVS Health Corporation, pursuant to
a five-year agreement. With IngenioRx, we retain the responsibilities for clinical and formulary strategy and development, member
and employer experiences, operations, sales, marketing, account management and retail network strategy.
-126-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Vulnerability from Concentrations
Financial instruments that potentially subject us to concentrations of credit risk consist primarily of cash equivalents, investment
securities, premium receivables and instruments held through hedging activities. All investment securities are managed by professional
investment managers within policies authorized by our Board of Directors. Such policies limit the amounts that may be invested in any
one issuer and prescribe certain investee company criteria. Concentrations of credit risk with respect to premium receivables are
limited due to the large number of employer groups that constitute our customer base in the states in which we conduct business. As of
December 31, 2021, there were no significant concentrations of financial instruments in a single investee, industry or geographic
location.
15. Capital Stock
Stock Incentive Plans
Our Board of Directors has adopted the 2017 Anthem Incentive Compensation Plan (“2017 Incentive Plan”), which has been
approved by our shareholders. The term of the 2017 Incentive Plan is such that no awards may be granted on or after May 18, 2027.
The 2017 Incentive Plan gives authority to the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors to make incentive awards to our
non-employee directors, employees and consultants, consisting of stock options, stock, restricted stock, restricted stock units, cash-
based awards, stock appreciation rights, performance shares and performance units. The 2017 Incentive Plan limits the number of
available shares for issuance to 37.5 shares, subject to adjustment as set forth in the 2017 Incentive Plan.
Stock options are granted for a fixed number of shares with an exercise price at least equal to the fair value of the shares at the
grant date. Stock options vest over three years in equal annual installments and generally have a term of ten years from the grant date.
Certain option grants contain provisions whereby the employee continues to vest in the award subsequent to termination due to
retirement. Our attribution method for newly granted awards considers all vesting and other provisions, including retirement
eligibility, in determining the requisite service period over which the fair value of the awards will be recognized.
Awards of restricted stock or restricted stock units are issued at the fair value of the stock on the grant date and may also include
one or more performance measures that must be met for the award to vest. For restricted stock or restricted stock units without
performance measures, the restrictions lapse in three equal annual installments. Restricted stock or restricted stock units with
performance measures vest in three year installments. Performance units issued in 2021 will vest in 2024, based on certain revenue
and earnings targets over the three year period of 2021 to 2023. Performance units issued in 2020 will vest in 2023, based on certain
revenue and earnings targets over the three year period of 2020 to 2022. Performance units issued in 2019 will vest in 2022, based on
certain revenue and earnings targets over the three year period of 2019 to 2021.
For the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, we recognized share-based compensation expense of $255, $283 and
$294, respectively, as well as related tax benefits of $65, $74 and $78, respectively.
A summary of stock option activity for the year ended December 31, 2021 is as follows:
Number of
SharesWeighted-Average
Option Price
per ShareWeighted-Average
Remaining
Contractual Life
(Years)Aggregate
Intrinsic
Value
Outstanding at January 1, 2021 3.1 $ 230.00 
Granted 0.7 315.30 
Exercised (0.7) 201.05 
Forfeited or expired (0.2) 287.81 
Outstanding at December 31, 2021 2.9 255.50 6.78$ 599 
Exercisable at December 31, 2021 1.5 215.40 5.45$ 364 
The intrinsic value of options exercised during the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 amounted to $121, $147 and
$188, respectively. We recognized tax benefits of $32, $40 and $52 during the years ended December 31, 2021,
-127-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
2020 and 2019, respectively, from option exercises and disqualifying dispositions. During the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020
and 2019, we received cash of $148, $129 and $143, respectively, from exercises of stock options.
The total fair value of restricted stock awards that vested during the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 was $287,
$335 and $245, respectively.
A summary of the status of nonvested restricted stock activity, including restricted stock units and performance units, for the year
ended December 31, 2021 is as follows:
Restricted
Stock Shares
and UnitsWeighted-Average
Grant Date
Fair Value
per Share
Nonvested at January 1, 2021 1.3 $ 272.51 
Granted 1.0 317.70 
Vested (0.9) 245.48 
Forfeited (0.1) 290.87 
Nonvested at December 31, 2021 1.3 299.65 
During the year ended December 31, 2021, we granted approximately 0.3 restricted stock units that are contingent upon us
achieving certain revenue and earnings targets over the three year period of 2021 to 2023. These grants have been included in the
activity shown above, but will be subject to adjustment at the end of 2023, based on results in the three year period.
As of December 31, 2021, the total remaining unrecognized compensation expense related to nonvested stock options and
restricted stock, including restricted stock units and performance units, amounted to $33 and $165, respectively, which will be
amortized over the weighted-average remaining requisite service periods of 10 months and 13 months, respectively.
As of December 31, 2021, there were approximately 15.8 shares of common stock available for future grants under the 2017
Incentive Plan.
 Fair Value
We use a binomial lattice valuation model to estimate the fair value of all stock options granted. Expected volatility assumptions
used in the binomial lattice model are based on an analysis of implied volatilities of publicly traded options on our stock and historical
volatility of our stock price. The risk-free interest rate is derived from the U.S. Treasury strip rates at the time of the grant. The
expected term of the options was derived from the outputs of the binomial lattice model, which incorporates post-vesting forfeiture
assumptions based on an analysis of historical data. The dividend yield was based on our estimate of future dividend yields. Similar
groups of employees that have dissimilar exercise behavior are considered separately for valuation purposes. We utilize the multiple-
grant approach for recognizing compensation expense associated with each separately vesting portion of the share-based award.
The following weighted-average assumptions were used to estimate the fair values of options granted during the years ended
December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019:
2021 2020 2019
Risk-free interest rate 1.44 % 1.30 % 2.69 %
Volatility factor 30.00 % 26.00 % 25.00 %
Dividend yield (annual) 1.50 % 1.40 % 1.00 %
Weighted-average expected life (years) 5.50 4.30 4.40
-128-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
The following weighted-average fair values were determined for the years ending December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019:
2021 2020 2019
Options granted during the year $ 79.91 $ 54.05 $ 68.66 
Restricted stock awards granted during the year 317.70 272.37 305.88 
The binomial lattice option-pricing model requires the input of highly subjective assumptions including the expected stock price
volatility. Because our stock option grants have characteristics significantly different from those of traded options, and because
changes in the subjective input assumptions can materially affect the fair value estimate, in our opinion, existing models do not
necessarily provide a reliable single measure of the fair value of our stock option grants.
Employee Stock Purchase Plan
We have registered 14.0 shares of common stock for the Employee Stock Purchase Plan (the “Stock Purchase Plan”), which is
intended to provide a means to encourage and assist employees in acquiring a stock ownership interest in Anthem. Pursuant to the
terms of the Stock Purchase Plan, an eligible employee is permitted to purchase no more than $25,000 (actual dollars) worth of stock
in any calendar year, based on the fair value of the stock at the end of each plan quarter. Employees become participants by electing
payroll deductions from 1% to 15% of gross compensation. Once purchased, the stock is accumulated in the employee’s investment
account. The Stock Purchase Plan allows participants to purchase shares of our common stock at a discounted price per share of 90%
of the fair value of a share of common stock on the lower of the first or last trading day of the plan quarter purchase period. The Stock
Purchase Plan discount was recognized as compensation expense for the year ended December 31, 2021, based on GAAP guidance.
There were 0.1 shares issued during the year ended December 31, 2021. As of December 31, 2021, 4.5 shares were available for
issuance under the Stock Purchase Plan.
Use of Capital and Stock Repurchase Program
We regularly review the appropriate use of capital, including acquisitions, common stock and debt security repurchases and
dividends to shareholders. The declaration and payment of any dividends or repurchases of our common stock or debt is at the
discretion of our Board of Directors and depends upon our financial condition, results of operations, future liquidity needs, regulatory
and capital requirements and other factors deemed relevant by our Board of Directors.
A summary of the cash dividend activity for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 is as follows: 
Declaration Date Record Date Payment DateCash Dividend
per Share Total
Year ended December 31, 2021
January 26, 2021 March 10, 2021 March 25, 2021 $ 1.13 $ 277 
April 20, 2021 June 10, 2021 June 25, 2021 1.13 278 
July 20, 2021 September 10, 2021 September 24, 2021 1.13 276 
October 19, 2021 December 3, 2021 December 21, 2021 1.13 273 
Year ended December 31, 2020
January 28, 2020 March 16, 2020 March 27, 2020 $ 0.95 $ 240 
April 28, 2020 June 10, 2020 June 25, 2020 0.95 242 
July 28, 2020 September 10, 2020 September 25, 2020 0.95 238 
October 27, 2020 December 7, 2020 December 22, 2020 0.95 234 
On January 25, 2022, our Audit Committee declared a quarterly cash dividend to shareholders of $1.28 per share on the
outstanding shares of our common stock. This quarterly dividend is payable on March 25, 2022 to the shareholders of record as of
March 10, 2022.
Under our Board of Directors’ authorization, we maintain a common stock repurchase program. On January 26, 2021, our Audit
Committee, pursuant to authorization granted by the Board of Directors, authorized a $5,000 increase to our
-129-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
common stock repurchase program. Repurchases may be made from time to time at prevailing market prices, subject to certain
restrictions on volume, pricing and timing. The repurchases are effected from time to time in the open market, through negotiated
transactions, including accelerated share repurchase agreements, and through plans designed to comply with Rule 10b5-1 under the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended. Our stock repurchase program is discretionary, as we are under no obligation to
repurchase shares. We repurchase shares under the program when we believe it is a prudent use of capital. The excess cost of the
repurchased shares over par value is charged on a pro rata basis to additional paid-in capital and retained earnings.
A summary of common stock repurchases for the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 is as follows:
Years Ended December 31
 2021 2020
Shares repurchased 5.1 9.4 
Average price per share $ 371.46 $ 286.35 
Aggregate cost $ 1,900 $ 2,700 
Authorization remaining at end of year $ 4,192 $ 1,092 
We expect to utilize the remaining authorized amount over a multi-year period, subject to market and industry conditions.
For additional information regarding the use of capital for debt security repurchases, see Note 13, “Debt.”
-130-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
16. Accumulated Other Comprehensive (Loss) Income
A reconciliation of the components of accumulated other comprehensive (loss) income at December 31, 2021, 2020, and 2019 is
as follows:
2021 2020 2019
Net unr ealized investment gains:
Beginning of year balance $ 949 $ 521 $ (159)
Other comprehensive (loss) income before reclassifications, net of tax benefit
(expense) of $121, $(160), and $(198), respectively (357) 478 695 
Amounts reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive income, net of tax
benefit (expense) of $27, $(13), and $(4), respectively (100) (50) (15)
Other comprehensive (loss) income (457) 428 680 
End of year balance 492 949 521 
Non-cr edit components of impairments on investments:
Beginning of year balance (2) (2) (2)
Other comprehensive income, net of tax (expense) benefit of $(1), $0,and $0,
respectively 2 — — 
End of year balance — (2) (2)
Net cash flow hedges:
Beginning of year balance (250) (262) (246)
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax (expense) benefit of $(3), $(3), and
$4, respectively 11 12 (16)
End of year balance (239) (250) (262)
Pension and other  postr etirement benefits:
Beginning of year balance (552) (551) (577)
Other comprehensive income (loss), net of tax expense of $(36), $(2), and $(9),
respectively 123 (1) 26 
End of year balance (429) (552) (551)
Foreign curr ency translation adjustments:
Beginning of year balance 5 (2) (2)
Other comprehensive (loss) income, net of tax benefit (expense) of $2, $(2), and $0 (9) 7 — 
End of year balance (4) 5 (2)
Total:
Total beginning of year accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) 150 (296) (986)
Total other comprehensive (loss) income, net of tax benefit (expense) of $110, $(154),
and $(199), respectively (330) 446 690 
Total other comprehensive loss attributable to noncontrolling interests, net of tax
benefit of $1, $0, and $0, respectively 2 — — 
Total end of year accumulated other comprehensive (loss) income $ (178)$ 150 $ (296)
-131-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
17. Reinsurance
We reinsure certain risks with other companies and assume risk from other companies. We remain primarily liable to
policyholders under ceded insurance contracts and are contingently liable for amounts recoverable from reinsurers in the event that
such reinsurers do not meet their contractual obligations.
A summary of direct, assumed and ceded premiums earned for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
 2021 2020 2019
Direct $ 113,149 $ 100,832 $ 91,131
Assumed 4,298 3,356 3,087
Ceded (74) (79) (45)
Net premiums $ 117,373 $ 104,109 $ 94,173
Percentage—assumed to net premiums 3.7 % 3.2 % 3.3 %
The difference between written premiums and earned premiums is immaterial in each of the years presented above.
A summary of net premiums earned by segment (see Note 20, “Segment Information”) for the years ended December 31, 2021,
2020 and 2019 is as follows:
 2021 2020 2019
Reportable segments:
Commercial & Specialty Business $ 33,209 $ 31,471 $ 31,944 
Government Business 82,520 71,188 62,229 
Other 1,644 1,450 — 
Net premiums $ 117,373 $ 104,109 $ 94,173 
The effect of reinsurance on benefit expense for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
2021 2020 2019
Direct $ 99,007 $ 85,168 $ 79,110 
Assumed 3,719 2,967 2,733 
Ceded (81) (90) (57)
Net benefit expense $ 102,645 $ 88,045 $ 81,786 
 The effect of reinsurance on certain assets and liabilities at December 31, 2021 and 2020 is as follows:
2021 2020
Policy liabilities, assumed $ 500 $ 490 
Unearned income, assumed 96 85 
Premiums payable, ceded 14 12 
Premiums receivable, assumed 248 347 
-132-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
18. Leases
We lease office space and certain computer and related equipment using noncancelable operating leases. Our leases have
remaining lease terms of 1 year to 13 years.
The information related to our leases is as follows:
Balance Sheet Location December 31, 2021 December 31, 2020
Operating Leases
Right-of-use assets Other noncurrent assets $ 628 $ 646 
Lease liabilities, current Other current liabilities 133 110 
Lease liabilities, noncurrent Other noncurrent liabilities 864 847 
Years Ended December 31
2021 2020 2019
Lease Expense
Operating lease expense $ 261$ 438 $ 19
Short-term lease expense 45 50 4
Sublease income (4) (9) (1
Total lease expense $ 302$ 479 $ 22
Our activities as disclosed in Note 4, “Business Optimization Initiatives”, include reducing our office space footprint. As a result,
we performed an interim impairment test during the years ended December 31, 2021 and 2020 and recorded impairment charges of
$136 and $258, respectively, for impairment and abandonment of ROU assets which are included in the operating lease expense
shown above.
Years Ended December 31
2021 2020
Other  information
Operating cash paid for amounts included in the measurement of lease liabilities,
operating leases $ 198$ 207
Right-of-use assets obtained in exchange for new lease liabilities, operating leases $ 334$ 384
Weighted average remaining lease term in years, operating leases 7 7
Weighted average discount rate, operating leases 2.69 % 3.21 %
At December 31, 2021, future lease payments for noncancelable operating leases with initial or remaining terms of one year or
more are as follows:
2022 $ 211 
2023 193 
2024 165 
2025 126 
2026 90 
Thereafter 307 
Total future minimum payments $ 1,092 
Less imputed interest (95)
Total lease liabilities $ 997 
-133-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
19. Earnings per Share
The denominator for basic and diluted earnings per share at December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
2021 2020 2019
Denominator for basic earnings per share—weighted-average shares 243.8 250.8 255.5 
Effect of dilutive securities—employee stock options, non-vested restricted stock
awards, convertible debentures and equity units 3.0 3.5 4.8 
Denominator for diluted earnings per share 246.8 254.3 260.3 
During the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, weighted-average shares related to certain stock options of 0.2, 1.2
and 0.6, respectively, were excluded from the denominator for diluted earnings per share because the stock options were anti-dilutive.
During the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019, we issued approximately 0.3, 0.3 and 0.2 restricted stock units,
respectively, of which vesting was contingent upon us meeting certain earnings targets. Contingent restricted stock units are excluded
from the denominator for diluted earnings per share and are included only if and when the contingency is met. The 2021 contingent
restricted stock units are being measured over the three year period of 2021 through 2023, the 2020 contingent restricted stock units
are being measured over the three year period of 2020 through 2022 and the 2019 contingent restricted stock units are being measured
over the three year period of 2019 through 2021. Contingent restricted stock units generally vest in March of the year following each
measurement period.
20. Segment Information
Beginning in 2020, IngenioRx met the quantitative threshold for a reportable segment based on the FASB guidance. The results of
our operations are now described through four reportable segments: Commercial & Specialty Business, Government Business,
IngenioRx and Other.
Our Commercial & Specialty Business segment offers plans and services to our Individual, Group risk-based, Group fee-based
and BlueCard members. The Commercial & Specialty Business segment offers health products on a full-risk basis; provides a broad
array of administrative managed care services to our fee-based customers; and provides a variety of specialty and other insurance
products and services such as dental, vision, life, disability and supplemental health insurance benefits.
Our Government Business segment includes our Medicare and Medicaid businesses, National Government Services (“NGS”) and
services provided to the federal government in connection with the FEHB business.
Our IngenioRx segment includes our PBM business. IngenioRx markets and offers PBM services to our affiliated health plan
customers, as well as to external customers outside of the health plans we own. IngenioRx has a comprehensive PBM services
portfolio, which includes services such as formulary management, pharmacy networks, prescription drug database, member services
and mail order capabilities.
Our Other segment includes our Diversified Business Group, which is our health services business focused on lowering the cost
and improving the quality of healthcare by enabling and creating new care delivery and payment models, with a special emphasis on
serving those with complex and chronic conditions. This segment also includes certain eliminations and corporate expenses not
allocated to our other reportable segments.
We define operating revenues to include premium income, product revenue and administrative fees and other revenues. Operating
revenues are derived from premiums and fees received, primarily from the sale and administration of health benefit and pharmacy
products and services. Operating gain is calculated as total operating revenue less benefit expense, cost of products sold and selling,
general and administrative expense.
Affiliated revenues represent revenues or costs for services provided to our subsidiaries by IngenioRx and our Diversified
Business Group, as well as certain back-office services provided by our international businesses, and are recorded at cost or
management’s estimate of fair market value. These affiliated revenues are eliminated in consolidation.®
-134-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
Through our participation in various federal government programs, we generated approximately 20.7%, 20.3% and 20.7% of our
total consolidated revenues from agencies of the U.S. government for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020, and 2019,
respectively. These revenues are contained in the Government Business segment.
The accounting policies of the segments are consistent with those described in the summary of significant accounting policies in
Note 2, “Basis of Presentation and Significant Accounting Policies,” except that certain shared administrative expenses for each
segment are recognized on a pro rata allocated basis, which in the aggregate approximates the consolidated expense. Any difference
between the allocated expenses and actual consolidated expense is included in other expenses not allocated to reportable segments. We
evaluate performance of the reportable segments based on operating gain or loss as defined above. We evaluate net investment income,
net gains (losses) on financial instruments, interest expense, amortization expense, gain or loss on extinguishment of debt, income
taxes and assets and liabilities on a consolidated basis, as these items are managed in a corporate shared service environment and are
not the responsibility of segment operating management.
For our 2019 segment reporting, operating gain generated from IngenioRx activities was allocated and included in our
Commercial & Specialty Business and Government Business based upon their utilization of those services, which aligns with the
method by which we assessed the 2019 operating performance of our reportable segments. Beginning January 1, 2020, we are
managing the operating performance of each of our segments on a standalone basis. Prior year 2019 allocations were not restated to
conform to the 2020 presentation; however, operating margins for IngenioRx were approximately 8% in 2019.
Financial data by reportable segment for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
Commercial &
Specialty
BusinessGovernment
Business IngenioRx Other Eliminations Total
Year ended December 31, 2021
Operating revenue - unaffiliated $ 38,809 $ 82,919 12,655 $ 2,560 $ — $136,943 
Operating revenue - affiliated — — 12,776 7,690 (20,466) — 
Operating gain (loss) 2,753 3,061 1,684 (9) — 7,489 
Depreciation and amortization of property
and equipment — — — 668 — 668 
Year ended December 31, 2020
Operating revenue - unaffiliated $ 36,699 $ 71,572 10,384 $ 2,153 $ — $120,808 
Operating revenue - affiliated — — 11,527 3,904 (15,431) — 
Operating gain (loss) 2,681 2,444 1,361 (126) — 6,360 
Depreciation and amortization of property
and equipment — — — 638 — 638 
Year ended December 31, 2019
Operating revenue - unaffiliated $ 37,421 $ 62,632 2,007 $ 1,081 $ — $103,141 
Operating revenue - affiliated — — 3,395 1,212 (4,607) — 
Operating gain (loss) 4,032 2,056 — (89) — 5,999 
Depreciation and amortization of property
and equipment — — — 675 — 675 
-135-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
 The major product revenues for each of the reportable segments for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 are as
follows:
2021 2020 2019
Commercial & Specialty Business
Managed care products $ 31,564 $ 29,815 $ 30,311 
Managed care services 5,711 5,296 5,451 
Dental/Vision products and services 1,363 1,231 1,302 
Other 171 357 357 
Total Commercial & Specialty Business 38,809 36,699 37,421 
Government Business
Managed care products 82,519 71,188 62,229 
Managed care services 400 384 403 
Total Government Business 82,919 71,572 62,632 
IngenioRx
Pharmacy products and services 25,431 21,911 5,402 
Other
Integrated health services 9,645 5,787 2,149 
Other 605 270 144 
Total Other Business 10,250 6,057 2,293 
Eliminations
Eliminations (20,466) (15,431) (4,607)
Total product revenues $ 136,943 $ 120,808 $ 103,141 
The classification between managed care products and managed care services in the above table primarily distinguishes between
the levels of risk assumed. Managed care products represent insurance products where we bear the insurance risk, whereas managed
care services represent product offerings where we provide claims adjudication and other administrative services to the customer, but
the customer principally bears the insurance risk. 
Asset, liability and equity details by reportable segment have not been disclosed, as we do not internally report such information. 
A reconciliation of reportable segments’ operating revenue to the amounts of total revenues included in our consolidated
statements of income for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
2021 2020 2019
Reportable segments’ operating revenues $ 136,943 $ 120,808 $ 103,141 
Net investment income 1,378 877 1,005 
Net gains on financial instruments 318 182 67 
Total revenues $ 138,639 $ 121,867 $ 104,213 
-136-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
A reconciliation of reportable segments’ operating gain to income before income tax expense included in our consolidated
statements of income for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019 is as follows:
2021 2020 2019
Reportable segments’ operating gain $ 7,489 $ 6,360 $ 5,999 
Net investment income 1,378 877 1,005 
Net gains on financial instruments 318 182 67 
Interest expense (798) (784) (746)
Amortization of other intangible assets (441) (361) (338)
Loss on extinguishment of debt (21) (36) (2)
Income before income tax expense $ 7,925 $ 6,238 $ 5,985 
21. Related Party Transactions
We have an equity investment in APC Passe, LLC, which offers Medicaid products in Arkansas. During the years ended
December 31, 2021 and 2020, in the normal course of business, we assumed premiums of $462 and $446, respectively, from APC
Passe, LLC, which is included in our total assumed premiums (see Note 17, “Reinsurance”).
22. Statutory Information
The majority of our insurance and HMO subsidiaries report their accounts in conformity with accounting practices prescribed or
permitted by state insurance regulatory authorities, commonly referred to as statutory accounting, which vary in certain respects from
GAAP. However, certain of our insurance and HMO subsidiaries, including BCC, Blue Cross of California Partnership Plan, Inc.,
Golden West Health Plan, Inc., Beacon Health Options of California, Inc. and CareMore Health Plan are regulated by the California
Department of Managed Health Care (“DMHC”) and report their accounts in conformity with GAAP (these entities are collectively
referred to as the “DMHC regulated entities”). Typical differences of GAAP reporting as compared to statutory reporting are the
recognition of all assets including those that are non-admitted for statutory purposes and recognition of all deferred tax assets without
regard to statutory limits. The National Association of Insurance Commissioners (“NAIC”) developed a codified version of the
statutory accounting principles, designed to foster more consistency among the states for accounting guidelines and reporting.
Prescribed statutory accounting practices are set forth in a variety of publications of the NAIC as well as state laws, regulations and
general administrative rules.
Our statutory basis insurance and HMO subsidiaries are subject to risk-based capital (“RBC”) requirements. RBC is a method
developed by the NAIC to determine the minimum amount of statutory capital appropriate for an insurance company or HMO to
support its overall business operations in consideration of its size and risk profile. The formula for determining the amount of RBC
specifies various factors, weighted based on the perceived degree of risk, which are applied to certain financial balances and financial
activity. Below minimum RBC requirements are classified within certain levels, each of which requires specified corrective action.
Additionally, the DMHC regulated entities are subject to capital and solvency requirements as prescribed by the DMHC. As of
December 31, 2021 and 2020, all of our regulated subsidiaries exceeded the minimum applicable mandatory RBC requirements and/or
capital and solvency requirements of their applicable governmental regulator.
The statutory RBC necessary to satisfy regulatory requirements of our statutory basis insurance and HMO subsidiaries was
approximately 6,962 and $5,800 as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively. The tangible net equity required for the DMHC
regulated entities was approximately $690 and $600 as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively. Statutory-basis capital and
surplus of our insurance and HMO subsidiaries and capital and surplus of our other regulated subsidiaries, excluding the DMHC
regulated entities, was 16,178 and $13,717 at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively. GAAP equity of the DMHC regulated
entities was $3,886 and $3,851 at December 31, 2021 and 2020, respectively.
Our ability to pay dividends and credit obligations is significantly dependent on receipt of dividends from our subsidiaries. The
payment of dividends to us by our insurance and HMO subsidiaries without prior approval of the insurance departments of each
subsidiary’s domiciliary jurisdiction is limited by formula. Dividends in excess of these amounts are subject to prior approval by the
respective state insurance departments or the DMHC. During 2021, our insurance and HMO
-137-
Anthem, Inc.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements (continued)
subsidiaries paid aggregate cash dividends of $3,134 to the parent company, including cash dividends which required prior approval
from regulatory authorities. We currently estimate that approximately $3,000 of dividends will be paid to the parent company in 2022.
ITEM 9. CHANGES IN AND DISAGREEMENTS WITH ACCOUNTANTS ON ACCOUNTING AND FINANCIAL
DISCLOSURE.
There have been no changes in or disagreements with our independent registered public accounting firm on accounting or
financial disclosures.
ITEM 9A. CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES.
Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
We carried out an evaluation as of December 31, 2021, under the supervision and with the participation of our management,
including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, of the effectiveness of the design and operation of our disclosure
controls and procedures as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) of the Exchange Act. Based upon that evaluation, our Chief Executive Officer
and Chief Financial Officer concluded that our disclosure controls and procedures are effective in timely alerting them to material
information relating to us (including our consolidated subsidiaries) required to be disclosed in our reports under the Exchange Act. In
addition, based on that evaluation, our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer concluded that our disclosure controls and
procedures were effective in ensuring that information required to be disclosed by us in the reports that we file or submit under the
Exchange Act is accumulated and communicated to our management, including our Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial
Officer, as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosures.
Management’s Report on Internal Control over Financial Reporting 
Management, under the supervision and with the participation of the principal executive officer and principal financial officer, of
Anthem, Inc. (the “Company”) is responsible for establishing and maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting
(“Internal Control”), as such term is defined in the Exchange Act. The Company’s Internal Control is designed to provide reasonable
assurance regarding the reliability of the Company’s financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external
reporting purposes in accordance with GAAP. The Company’s Internal Control includes those policies and procedures that (i) pertain
to the maintenance of records that in reasonable detail accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the
Company; (ii) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in
accordance with GAAP, and that receipts and expenditures of the Company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of
management and directors of the Company; and (iii) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of
unauthorized acquisition, use or disposition of the Company’s assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of inherent limitations in any Internal Control, no matter how well designed, misstatements due to error or fraud may
occur and not be detected. Accordingly, even effective Internal Control can provide only reasonable assurance regarding the reliability
of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with GAAP.
Management, under the supervision and with the participation of the principal executive officer and principal financial officer,
assessed the effectiveness of the Company’s Internal Control as of December 31, 2021. Management’s assessment was based on
criteria established in Internal Control—Integrated Framework (2013) issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission.
The Company completed its acquisitions of myNEXUS, Inc. and MMM Holdings, LLC on April 28, 2021 and June 29, 2021,
respectively. As permitted by the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, management’s assessment as of December 31, 2021 did
not include the Internal Control of myNEXUS, Inc. and MMM Holdings, LLC, which are included in the Company's consolidated
financial statements as of December 31, 2021. Such operations of myNEXUS, Inc. and MMM Holdings, LLC constituted 5% and 11%
of the Company’s total assets and net assets, respectively, as of December 31, 2021, and 2% and 0% of the Company's total revenues
and net income for the year then ended.
-138-
Based on management’s assessment, which excluded assessments of Internal Control of myNEXUS, Inc. and MMM Holdings,
LLC, management has concluded that the Company’s Internal Control was effective as of December 31, 2021 to provide reasonable
assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external reporting purposes in
accordance with GAAP.
Ernst & Young LLP, the Company’s independent registered public accounting firm, has audited the consolidated financial
statements of the Company for the year ended December 31, 2021, and has also issued an audit report dated February 16, 2022, on the
effectiveness of the Company’s Internal Control as of December 31, 2021, which is included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
/S/    GAIL K. BOUDREAUX  /S/    JOHN E. GALLINA
President and Chief Executive Officer Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
There have been no changes in our internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the three months ended
December 31, 2021 that have materially affected, or are reasonably likely to materially affect, our internal control over financial
reporting.
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
To the Shareholders and the Board of Directors of Anthem, Inc.
Opinion on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
We have audited Anthem, Inc.’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2021, based on criteria established in
Internal Control–Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission (2013
framework) (the COSO criteria). In our opinion, Anthem, Inc. (the Company) maintained, in all material respects, effective internal
control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2021, based on the COSO criteria.
As indicated in the accompanying Management’s Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting, management’s assessment of
and conclusion on the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting did not include the internal controls of myNEXUS, Inc.
and MMM Holdings, LLC, which are included in the 2021 consolidated financial statements of the Company and constituted 5% and
11% of total and net assets, respectively, as of December 31, 2021 and 2% and 0% of revenues and net income, respectively, for the
year then ended. Our audit of internal control over financial reporting of the Company also did not include evaluations of the internal
control over financial reporting of myNEXUS, Inc. and MMM Holdings, LLC.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States)
(PCAOB), the consolidated balance sheets of Anthem, Inc. as of December 31, 2021 and 2020, the related consolidated statements of
income, comprehensive income, shareholders’ equity and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31,
2021, and the related notes and financial statement schedule listed in the Index at Item 15(c) and our report dated February 16, 2022
expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for its assessment of
the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting included in the accompanying Management’s Report on Internal Control
Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’s internal control over financial reporting based
on our audit. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the
Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange
Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit
to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained in all material respects.
Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a material weakness
exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the assessed risk,
-139-
and performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our audit provides a
reasonable basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of
financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting
principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that (1) pertain to the
maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions of the assets of the
company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in
accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and expenditures of the company are being made only in
accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding
prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or disposition of the company’s assets that could have a material effect
on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also, projections
of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate because of changes in
conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
/s/    Ernst & Young LLP
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 16, 2022
-140-
ITEM 9B. OTHER INFORMATION.
None.
ITEM 9C. DISCLOSURE REGARDING FOREIGN JURISDICTIONS THAT PREVENT INSPECTIONS.
None.
PART III
ITEM 10. DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE.
The information required by this Item concerning our Executive Officers is included in Part I, Item 1, “Business - Information
about our Executive Officers.” The information required by this Item concerning our Directors and nominees for Director, information
about our Audit Committee members and financial expert(s), disclosure of any delinquent filers under Section 16(a) of the Exchange
Act and our Code of Conduct is incorporated herein by reference from our definitive Proxy Statement for our 2022 Annual Meeting of
Shareholders, which will be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A within 120 days after the end of our last fiscal year.
ITEM 11. EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION.
The information required by this Item concerning remuneration of our Executive Officers and Directors, material transactions
involving such Executive Officers and Directors and Compensation Committee interlocks, as well as the Compensation and Talent
Committee Report and CEO Pay Ratio disclosure are incorporated herein by reference from our definitive Proxy Statement for our
2022 Annual Meeting of Shareholders, which will be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A within 120 days after the end of
our last fiscal year.
ITEM 12. SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED
STOCKHOLDER MATTERS.
Securities Authorized for Issuance under Equity Compensation Plans
Securities authorized for issuance under our equity compensation plans as of December 31, 2021 are as follows:
Plan
CategoryNumber of securities to be
issued upon exercise of
outstanding options, warrants
and rights
(a)Weighted-average
exercise price of
outstanding options, warrants
and rights
(b)Number of securities
remaining available for
future issuance under equity
compensation plans (excluding
securities reflected in column
(a))
(c)
Equity compensation plans approved by shareholders as of
December 31, 2021 4,797,556 $255.49 20,283,759
1 We have no equity compensation plans pursuant to which awards may be granted in the future that have not been approved by shareholders.
2 Includes shares that may be issued under the Anthem Incentive Compensation Plan and the Anthem 2017 Incentive Compensation Plan pursuant
to the following outstanding awards: 2,878,054 stock options, 600,636 unvested restricted stock units, and 1,318,866 performance stock units
(assuming that the outstanding performance stock units are earned at the maximum award level).
3 Represents the weighted average exercise price of outstanding stock options. Does not take into consideration outstanding restricted stock units
or performance stock units, which, once vested, may be converted into shares of our common stock on a one-for -one basis upon distribution at
no additional cost.
4 Excludes securities reflected in the first column, “Number of securities to be issued upon exercise of outstanding options, warrants and rights”.
Includes 15,81 1,636 shares of common stock available for issuance as stock options, restricted stock awards, performance stock awards,
performance awards and stock appreciation rights under the Anthem 2017 Incentive Compensation Plan at December 31, 2021. Includes
4,472,123 shares of common stock available for issuance under the Stock Purchase Plan at December 31, 2021.
 The information required by this Item concerning the stock ownership of management and five percent beneficial owners is
incorporated herein by reference from our definitive Proxy Statement for our 2022 Annual Meeting of12 3 4
-141-
Shareholders, which will be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A within 120 days after the end of our last fiscal year.
ITEM 13. CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE.
The information required by this Item concerning certain relationships and related person transactions and Director independence
is incorporated herein by reference from our definitive Proxy Statement for our 2022 Annual Meeting of Shareholders, which will be
filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A within 120 days after the end of our last fiscal year.
ITEM 14. PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES.
The information required by this Item concerning principal accountant fees and services is incorporated herein by reference from
our definitive Proxy Statement for our 2022 Annual Meeting of Shareholders, which will be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation
14A within 120 days after the end of our last fiscal year.
-142-
PART IV
ITEM 15. EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES.
(a) 1. Financial Statements:
The following consolidated financial statements of the Company are set forth in Part II, Item 8:
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2021 and 2020
Consolidated Statements of Income for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020, and 2019
Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020, and 2019
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Consolidated Statements of Shareholders’ Equity for the years ended December 31, 2021, 2020 and 2019
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
2. Financial Statement Schedule:
The following financial statement schedule of the Company is included in Item 15(c):
Schedule II—Condensed Financial Information of Registrant (Parent Company Only).
All other schedules for which provision is made in the applicable accounting regulations of the SEC are not required
under the related instructions, are inapplicable, or the required information is included in the consolidated financial statements,
and therefore, have been omitted.
3. Exhibits required to be filed as part of this report:
Exhibit
Number Exhibit
3.1 Amended and Restated Articles of Incorporation of the Company, as amended and restated effective May 15, 2019,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on May 15, 2019.
3.2 Bylaws of the Company, as amended effective September 30, 2020, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on October 6, 2020.
4.1 Form of Specimen Certificate of the Company’s common stock, $0.01 par value per share, incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Post-Effective Amendment No.1 to Form S-8 Registration Statement filed on May 23,
2017.
4.2 Indenture, dated as of December 9, 2004, between the Company and The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A., as
trustee, including the Form of the Company’s 5.950% Notes due 2034, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the
Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 15, 2004.
4.3 Indenture, dated as of January 10, 2006, between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company,
N.A. (formerly known as The Bank of New York Trust Company, N.A.), as trustee, incorporated by reference to Exhibit
4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on January 11, 2006.
(a)Form of 5.85% Notes due 2036, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on January 11, 2006.
(b)Form of 6.375% Notes due 2037, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on June 8, 2007.
(c)Form of 5.800% Notes due 2040, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on August 12, 2010.
(d)Form of 3.125% Notes due 2022, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on May 7, 2012.
-143-
Exhibit
Number Exhibit
(e)Form of 4.625% Notes due 2042, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on May 7, 2012.
(f)Form of 3.300% Notes due 2023, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on September 10, 2012.
(g)Form of 4.650% Notes due 2043, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on September 10, 2012.
(h)Form of 5.100% Notes due 2044, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on July 31, 2013.
(i)Form of 3.500% Notes due 2024, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on August 12, 2014.
(j)Form of 4.650% Notes due 2044, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on August 12, 2014.
(k)Form of 4.850% Notes due 2054, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on August 12, 2014.
4.4 Indenture dated as of October 9, 2012 between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company, N.A.
as trustee, including the Form of the 2.750% Senior Convertible Debentures due 2042, incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on October 9, 2012.
4.5 Subordinated Indenture, dated as of May 12, 2015, between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust
Company, N.A., as trustee, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed
on May 12, 2015.
4.6 Indenture dated as of November 21, 2017 between the Company and The Bank of New York Mellon Trust Company,
N.A. as trustee, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on
November 21, 2017.
(a)Form of 2.950% Notes due 2022, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on November 21, 2017.
(b)Form of 3.350% Notes due 2024, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on November 21, 2017.
(c)Form of 3.650% Notes due 2027, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.5 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on November 21, 2017.
(d)Form of 4.375% Notes due 2047, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.6 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on November 21, 2017.
(e)Form of 4.101% Notes due 2028, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on March 2, 2018.
(f)Form of 4.550% Notes due 2048, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on March 2, 2018.
(g)Form of 2.375% Notes due 2025, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on September 9, 2019.
(h)Form of 2.875% Notes due 2029, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on September 9, 2019.
(i)Form of 3.700% Notes due 2049, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on September 9, 2019.
(j)Form of 2.250% Notes due 2030, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on May 5, 2020.
-144-
Exhibit
Number Exhibit
(k)Form of 3.125% Notes due 2050, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on May 5, 2020.
(l)Form of 0.450% Notes due 2023, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on March 17, 2021.
(m)Form of 1.500% Notes due 2026, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.2 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on March 17, 2021.
(n)Form of 2.550% Notes due 2031, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.3 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on March 17, 2021.
(o)Form of 3.600% Notes due 2051, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 to the Company’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed on March 17, 2021.
4.7 Upon the request of the Securities and Exchange Commission, the Company will furnish copies of any other
instruments defining the rights of holders of long-term debt of the Company or its subsidiaries.
4.8 Description of the Company’s Securities Registered Pursuant to Section 12 of the Exchange Act, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 4.8 to the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2020.
10.1* Anthem Incentive Compensation Plan, as amended and restated effective December 2, 2014, incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on December 2, 2014.
(a)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement for 2015, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(n) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2015.
(b)Form of Amendment, dated March 9, 2016, to Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award
Agreement for 2014, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2(m) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016.
(c)Form of Amendment, dated March 9, 2016, to Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award
Agreement for 2015, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2(p) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form
10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016.
(d)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement for 2016 and 2017,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2(s) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended March 31, 2016.
10.2 *2017 Anthem Incentive Compensation Plan, as amended and restated effective October 1, 2019, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2019.
(a)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement for 2018, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(d) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2018.
(b)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement commencing July 2018,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2(h) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter
ended June 30, 2018.
(c)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement for 2019, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(l) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2019.
(d)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement for 2019, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(m) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2019.
(e)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Performance Stock Unit Award Agreement for 2019, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(n) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2019.
-145-
Exhibit
Number Exhibit
(f)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement for 2020, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(l) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2020.
(g)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement for 2020, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(m) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2020.
(h)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Performance Stock Unit Award Agreement for 2020, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(n) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2020.
(i)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement for 2021, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(m) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2021.
(j)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Restricted Stock Unit Award Agreement for 2021, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(n) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2021.
(k)Form of Incentive Compensation Plan Performance Stock Unit Award Agreement for 2021, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2(o) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31,
2021.
10.3 *Anthem, Inc. Comprehensive Nonqualified Deferred Compensation Plan, as amended and restated effective October 1,
2019, incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
September 30, 2019.
10.4*Anthem, Inc. Executive Agreement Plan, as amended and restated effective December 2, 2014, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.4 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2014.
(a)First Amendment, dated March 9, 2016, to Executive Agreement Plan, incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.4(a) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended March 31, 2016.
(b)Second Amendment, dated January 6, 2017, to Executive Agreement Plan, incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.3(b) to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2016.
(c)Third Amendment, dated August 27, 2018, to Executive Agreement Plan, incorporated by reference to Exhibit
10.4(c) to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2018.
10.5*Anthem, Inc. Executive Salary Continuation Plan, as amended and restated effective December 2, 2014, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.5 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2015.
10.6*Anthem, Inc. Directed Executive Compensation Plan amended effective January 1, 2020, incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.6 to the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2020.
10.7*Anthem, Inc. Board of Directors Compensation Program, as amended effective May 15, 2019, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.7 to the Company’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2019.
10.8*Anthem Board of Directors’ Deferred Compensation Plan, as amended and restated effective December 2, 2014,
incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.8 to the Company’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December
31, 2014.
10.9* (a)Form of Employment Agreement between the Company and each of the following: John E. Gallina, Peter D.
Haytaian, and Gloria McCarthy, incorporated by reference to Exhibit A to Exhibit 10.41 to the Company’s
Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended September 30, 2007.
(b)Form of Employment Agreement between the Company and Gail Boudreaux, incorporated by reference to Exhibit
A to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on November 6, 2017.
-146-
Exhibit
Number Exhibit
(c)Form of Employment Agreement between the Company and each of the following: Charles Morgan Kendrick,
Felicia F. Norwood, and Blair W. Todt incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.9(d) to the Company’s Quarterly
Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended June 30, 2018.
10.10*Offer Letter, by and between the Company and Gail Boudreaux, dated as of November 5, 2017, incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.1 to the Company’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed on November 6, 2017.
10.11 Blue Cross License Agreement by and between Blue Cross Blue Shield Association and the Company, including
revisions, if any, adopted by the Member Plans through September 23, 2021.
10.12 Blue Shield License Agreement by and between Blue Cross Blue Shield Association and the Company, including
revisions, if any, adopted by the Member Plans through September 23, 2021.
21 Subsidiaries of the Company.
23 Consent of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm.
31.1 Certification of Chief Executive Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) and Rule 15d-14(a) of the Exchange Act Rules, as
adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
31.2 Certification of Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) and Rule 15d-14(a) of the Exchange Act Rules, as
adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32.1 Certification of Chief Executive Officer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32.2 Certification of Chief Financial Officer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the
Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
101 The following materials from Anthem, Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K for the year ended December 31, 2021,
formatted in Inline XBRL (Inline Extensible Business Reporting Language): (i) the Consolidated Balance Sheets; (ii)
the Consolidated Statements of Income; (iii) the Consolidated Statements of Comprehensive Income; (iv) the
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows; (v) the Consolidated Statements of Shareholders’ Equity; (vi) the Notes to
Consolidated Financial Statements and (vii) Financial Statement Schedule II. The instance document does not appear in
the Interactive Data File because its XBRL tags are embedded within the Inline XBRL document.
104 Cover Page Interactive Data File formatted in Inline XBRL and contained in Exhibit 101.
* Indicates management contracts or compensatory plans or arrangements.
(b) Exhibits
The response to this portion of Item 15 is set forth in paragraph (a) 3 above.
(c) Financial Statement Schedule
Schedule II—Condensed Financial Information of Registrant (Parent Company Only).
ITEM 16. FORM 10-K SUMMARY.
None.
-147-
Schedule II—Condensed Financial Information of Registrant
Anthem, Inc. (Parent Company Only)
Balance Sheets
(In millions, except shar e data)December  31,
2021December  31,
2020
Assets
Current assets:
Cash and cash equivalents $ 630 $ 700 
Fixed maturity securities (amortized cost of $ 512 and $ 594; allowance for credit losses of $ 1 and $ 0) 515 608 
Equity securities 49 439 
Other receivables 40 41 
Net due from subsidiaries 446 — 
Other current assets 655 800 
Total current assets 2,335  2,588  
Other invested assets 808 664 
Property and equipment, net 207 209 
Deferred tax assets, net 77 391 
Investments in subsidiaries 56,375  51,739  
Other noncurrent assets 265 211 
Total assets $ 60,067  $ 55,802  
Liabilities and shar eholders’  equity
Liabilities
Current liabilities:
Accounts payable and accrued expenses $ 559 $ 429 
Net due to subsidiaries — 1,239  
Current portion of long-term debt 1,599  700 
Other current liabilities 344 494 
Total current liabilities 2,502  2,862  
Long-term debt, less current portion 21,132  19,310  
Other noncurrent liabilities 373 431 
Total liabilities 24,007  22,603  
Commitments and contingencies—Note 5
Shar eholders’  equity
Preferred stock, without par value, shares authorized - 100,000,000 ; shares issued and outstanding - none — — 
Common stock, par value $ 0.01, shares authorized - 900,000,000 ; shares issued and outstanding - 241,770,746
and 245,401,430 2 3 
Additional paid-in capital 9,148  9,244  
Retained earnings 27,088  23,802  
Accumulated other comprehensive (loss) income (178) 150 
Total shar eholders’  equity 36,060  33,199  
Total liabilities and shar eholders’  equity $ 60,067  $ 55,802  
 
See accompanying notes.
-148-
Anthem, Inc. (Parent Company Only)
Statements of Income
Years ended December 31
(In millions) 2021 2020 2019
Revenues
Net investment income $ 6 $ 65 $ 81 
Net gains (losses) on financial instruments 6 28 (85)
Administrative fees and other revenue 24 22 22 
Total revenues 36 115 18 
Expenses
General and administrative expense 119 169 88 
Interest expense 794 779 723 
Loss on extinguishment of debt 21 36 2 
Total expenses 934 984 813 
Loss before income tax credits and equity in net income of subsidiaries (898) (869) (795)
Income tax credits (244) (386) (251)
Equity in net income of subsidiaries 6,758 5,055 5,351 
Shareholders’ net income $ 6,104 $ 4,572 $ 4,807 
See accompanying notes.
-149-
Anthem, Inc. (Parent Company Only)
Statements of Comprehensive Income
Years ended December 31
(in millions) 2021 2020 2019
Shareholders' net income $ 6,104 $ 4,572 $ 4,807 
Other comprehensive (loss) income, net of tax:
Change in net unrealized gains/losses on investments (455) 428 680 
Change in non-credit component of impairment losses on investments 2 — — 
Change in net unrealized gains/losses on cash flow hedges 11 12 (16)
Change in net periodic pension and postretirement costs 123 (1) 26 
Foreign currency translation adjustments (9) 7 — 
Other comprehensive (loss) income (328) 446 690 
Total shareholders’ comprehensive income $ 5,776 $ 5,018 $ 5,497 
 
See accompanying notes.
-150-
Anthem, Inc. (Parent Company Only)
Statements of Cash Flows
Years ended December  31
(In millions) 2021 2020 2019
Net cash pr ovided by operating activities $ 2,038  $ 4,810  $ 2,411 
Investing activities
Purchases of investments (2,059 ) (2,729 ) (9,682 )
Proceeds from sales, maturities, calls and redemptions of investments 2,449  2,593  9,457  
Issuance of note to subsidiary (1,500 ) — — 
Capitalization of subsidiaries (807) (2,460 ) (232)
Changes in securities lending collateral 173 (234) 18 
Purchases of property and equipment, net of sales (77) (107) (54)
Other , net — 11 — 
Net cash used in investing activities (1,821 ) (2,926 ) (493)
Financing activities
Net proceeds from (repayments of) commercial paper borrowings 50 (150) (297)
Proceeds from long-term borrowings 3,462  2,484  2,473  
Repayments of long-term borrowings (1,068 ) (1,932 ) (1,123 )
Changes in securities lending payable (173) 234 (18)
Repurchase and retirement of common stock (1,900 ) (2,700 ) (1,701 )
Cash dividends (1,158 ) (1,000 ) (856)
Proceeds from issuance of common stock under employee stock plans 203 176 187 
Taxes paid through withholding of common stock under employee stock plans (102) (128) (84)
Other , net 399 14 29 
Net cash used in financing activities (287) (3,002 ) (1,390 )
Change in cash and cash equivalents (70) (1,118) 528 
Cash and cash equivalents at beginning of year 700 1,818  1,290  
Cash and cash equivalents at end of year $ 630 $ 700 $ 1,818  
See accompanying notes.
-151-
Anthem, Inc.
(Parent Company Only)
Notes to Condensed Financial Statements
December 31, 2021
(In Millions, Except Per Share Data)
1. Basis of Presentation and Significant Accounting Policies
In the parent company only financial statements of Anthem, Inc. (“Anthem”), Anthem’s investment in subsidiaries is stated at cost
plus equity in undistributed earnings of the subsidiaries. Anthem’s share of net income of its unconsolidated subsidiaries is included in
income using the equity method of accounting.
Certain amounts presented in the parent company only financial statements are eliminated in the consolidated financial statements
of Anthem.
Anthem’s parent company only financial statements should be read in conjunction with Anthem’s audited consolidated financial
statements and the accompanying notes included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
2. Subsidiary Transactions
Dividends from Subsidiaries
Anthem received cash dividends from subsidiaries of $3,134, $3,618 and $3,790 during 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Dividends to Subsidiaries
Certain subsidiaries of Anthem own shares of Anthem common stock. Anthem paid cash dividends to subsidiaries related to these
shares of common stock in the amount of $54, $46 and $38 during 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Investments in Subsidiaries
Capital contributions to subsidiaries were $3,271, $2,460 and $232 during 2021, 2020 and 2019, respectively.
Amounts Due From and To Subsidiaries
At December 31, 2021 and 2020, Anthem reported amounts due from and to subsidiaries of $446 and $1,239, respectively. The
amounts due from subsidiaries primarily include amounts for allocated administrative expenses or daily cash management activities.
These items are routinely settled, and as such, are classified as current assets or liabilities.
On June 29, 2021 Anthem entered into a short-term loan agreement with a subsidiary for the amount of $1,500, which is also
included in amounts due from subsidiaries.
Guarantees on Behalf of Subsidiaries
Anthem guarantees contractual or financial obligations or solvency requirements for certain of its subsidiaries. These guarantees
approximated $530 at December 31, 2021. There were no payments made on these guarantees in 2021.
3. Derivative Financial Instruments
The information regarding derivative financial instruments contained in Note 6, “Derivative Financial Instruments,” of the Notes
to Consolidated Financial Statements of Anthem and its subsidiaries, included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K,
is incorporated herein by reference.
-152-
4. Long-Term Debt
The information regarding long-term debt contained in Note 13, “Debt,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements of
Anthem and its subsidiaries, included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K, is incorporated herein by reference.
5. Commitments and Contingencies
The information regarding commitments and contingencies contained in Note 14, “Commitments and Contingencies,” of the
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements of Anthem and its subsidiaries, included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form
10-K, is incorporated herein by reference.
6. Capital Stock
The information regarding capital stock contained in Note 15, “Capital Stock,” of the Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
of Anthem and its subsidiaries, included in Part II, Item 8 of this Annual Report on Form 10-K, is incorporated herein by reference.
-153-
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this
report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
 
ANTHEM, INC.
By: /s/    GAIL K. BOUDREAUX       
Gail K. Boudreaux
President and Chief Executive Officer
Dated: February 16, 2022
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following persons
on behalf of the registrant and in the capacities and on the dates indicated. 
Signature   Title Date
/s/    GAIL K. BOUDREAUX   President and Chief Executive Officer, Director
(Principal Executive Officer)February 16, 2022
Gail K. Boudreaux
/s/    JOHN E. GALLINA          Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer
(Principal Financial Officer)February 16, 2022
John E. Gallina
/s/    RONALD W. PENCZEK          Chief Accounting Officer and Controller (Principal
Accounting Officer)February 16, 2022
Ronald W. Penczek
/s/    ELIZABETH E. TALLETT Chair of the Board February 16, 2022
Elizabeth E. Tallett
/s/ R. KERRY CLARK         Director February 16, 2022
R. Kerry Clark
/s/ SUSAN D. DEVORE Director February 16, 2022
Susan D. DeVore
/s/ ROBERT L. DIXON, JR.          Director February 16, 2022
Robert L. Dixon, Jr.
/s/    LEWIS HAY III       Director February 16, 2022
Lewis Hay III
/s/    BAHIJA JALLAL   Director February 16, 2022
Bahija Jallal
/s/    ANTONIO F. NERI Director February 16, 2022
Antonio F. Neri
/s/    RAMIRO G. PERU          Director February 16, 2022
Ramiro G. Peru
/s/ RYAN M. SCHNEIDER Director February 16, 2022
Ryan M. Schneider
-154-
